Transvaginal sonography for preoperative assessment of deep endometriosis.To determinate transvaginal scan (TVS) accuracy in the preoperative evaluation of deep endometriosis in a large cohort of patients with subsequent laparoscopic assessment.A retrospective study was performed in a tertiary referral center for endometriosis. Transvaginal scan reports were retrieved from an electronic database of all patients who underwent laparoscopy for pelvic pain or infertility in 2009. The accuracy of TVS was assessed for 10 different sites of pelvic endometriosis.Four hundred twenty women were included in the study. Sensitivity and specificity of TVS were 61% and 99%, respectively, for bladder endometriosis, 52% and 96% for endometriosis of rectovaginal septum, 65% and 99% for rectum endometriosis, and 69% and 98% for endometriosis of the sigmoid colon.TVS appears to be useful for the detection of endometriosis located in the bladder and involving the sigmoid colon, the rectovaginal septum, and the rectum.Agreement and reproducibility in identification of endometriosis using magnetic resonance imaging.Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is a promising technique in the study of endometriosis, allowing a complete mapping of lesions before surgery. However, the value of MRI in the diagnosis of endometriosis in the bladder, in superficial peritoneal lesions, and in ovarian foci and uterosacral ligaments is still under debate.To assess inter- and intra-observer agreement in the evaluation of endometriosis in different anatomical locations using MRI.From June 2006 to February 2008, 83 female patients (mean age 39, range 19-49 years) who had undergone MRI examination for suspected endometriosis were evaluated by two radiologists. MRI at 1.5 Tesla was performed with SE and TSE sequences, T1- and T2-weighted with and without fat suppression. Each examination was completed with gadolinium administration. Each dataset was independently evaluated by the radiologists for the presence or absence of endometriosis. The location (ovaries, uterosacral ligaments (USLs), pouch of Douglas, vagina, rectosigmoid, rectovaginal septum, and bladder) of suspected lesions was recorded. Cohen kappa statistical analysis was performed to calculate agreement between measurements. After 2 months the data were analyzed again by the two observers to assess intra-observer agreement.Of the 83 MRI examinations performed, 12 patients demonstrated no evidence of endometriosis. In the remaining 71 studies, 157 endometriotic lesions ranging in size from 0.4 to 6.2 cm were detected. Of the 157 lesions, 53 (33.75% incidence) were smaller than 1 cm. In the ovaries, the inter-observer agreement was 92.77% and the kappa value was 0.802 (95% CI, 0.695-0.91). In the bladder the inter-observer agreement was 96.39% and the kappa value was 0.553 (95% CI 0.056-1). In the USLs the inter-observer agreement was 90.96% and the kappa value 0.583 (95% CI, 0.381-0.784). In the rectovaginal septum the inter-observer agreement was 94.58% and the kappa value 0.739 (95% CI, 0.572-0.905). In the rectovaginal pouch the inter-observer agreement was 88.55% and the kappa value 0.608 (95% CI, 0.443-0.774). In the vaginal fornix the inter-observer agreement was 94.58% and the kappa value 0.726 (95% CI, 0.552-0.901). In the rectosigmoid the inter-observer agreement was 89.76% and the kappa value 0.589 (95% CI, 0.389-0.768).The results of our study indicate that MRI has a high inter- and intra-observer agreement in the identification of endometriosis located in the ovary, rectosigmoid, and rectovaginal septum, whereas the agreement is suboptimal for the identification of endometriosis located in the USLs.Value of thin-section oblique axial T2-weighted magnetic resonance images to assess uterosacral ligament endometriosis.Thin-section oblique axial magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is useful in staging endometrial and cervical carcinomas but there are no data on its contribution to assessing deep endometriosis. We evaluated the contribution of this MRI technique to diagnosis of uterosacral ligament (USL) endometriosis.In this retrospective study, two radiologists, who were blinded to the surgical and histological results, compared the results from conventional sagittal and axial MRI with those from conventional plus thin-section (3 mm) oblique axial MRI in 100 symptomatic patients. Descriptive statistical analyses including sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, accuracy and positive and negative likelihood ratios were performed. Kappa for inter-observer agreement was calculated.Conventional MR images for the diagnosis of left/right USL endometriosis revealed accuracies of 69/76 and 59/75%, sensitivities of 66/71 and 52/71% and specificities of 76/86 and 76/82% for senior and junior readers, respectively. The combination of conventional and thin-section oblique axial MR images revealed accuracies of 82/87 and 74/81%, sensitivities of 89/93 and 73/81% and specificities of 61/72 and 76/79%, for senior and junior readers, respectively. When conventional MRI combined with oblique axial T2-weighted MRI was compared with conventional MRI use only, significant differences in diagnostic accuracies were observed for right (P = 0.04) and left (P = 0.01) USL endometriosis.Thin-section oblique axial T2-weighted imaging can improve the success of conventional MRI for assessment of USL endometriosis. Further prospective studies are required before this new MR protocol is performed routinely for suspected pelvic endometriosis.Acoustic streaming cannot discriminate reliably between endometriomas and other types of adnexal lesion: a multicenter study of 633 adnexal masses.To determine the ability of acoustic streaming to discriminate between endometriomas and other adnexal masses.We used data from 1938 patients with an adnexal mass included in Phase 2 of the International Ovarian Tumor Analysis (IOTA) study. All patients had been examined by transvaginal gray-scale and Doppler ultrasound following a standardized research protocol. Assessment of acoustic streaming was voluntary and was carried out only in lesions containing echogenic cyst fluid. Acoustic streaming was defined as movement of particles inside the cyst fluid during gray-scale and/or color Doppler examination provided that the probe had been held still for two seconds to ensure that the movement of the particles was not caused by movement of the probe or the patient. Only centers where acoustic streaming had been evaluated in > 90% of cases were included. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative likelihood ratios (LR+, LR-), and positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV) of acoustic streaming with regard to endometrioma were calculated.460 (24%) masses were excluded because they were examined in centers where </= 90% of the masses with echogenic cyst fluid had been evaluated for the presence of acoustic streaming. Acoustic streaming was evaluated in 633 of 646 lesions containing echogenic cyst fluid. It was present in 19 (9%) of 209 endometriomas and in 55 (13%) of 424 other lesions. This corresponds to a sensitivity of absent acoustic streaming with regard to endometrioma of 91% (190/209), a specificity of 13% (55/424), LR+ of 1.04, LR- of 0.69, PPV of 34% (190/559) and NPV of 74% (55/74).Acoustic streaming cannot discriminate reliably between endometriomas and other adnexal lesions, and the presence of acoustic streaming does not exclude an endometrioma.Three-dimensional ultrasound and three-dimensional power Doppler improve the preoperative evaluation of complex benign ovarian lesions.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of three-dimensional ultrasound (3D-US) and three-dimensional power-Doppler (3DPD-US) as adjuncts to conventional B-mode-US in evaluation of complex benign ovarian lesions.Transvaginal B-mode-US, 3D-US and 3DPD-US were performed in 29 patients with unilateral ovarian lesion. Patients were classified as low or high risk for malignancy according to a standardized scoring system composed of ten morphological and vascular parameters. Preoperative scores were matched to the histological results and the diagnostic performance of the scoring system was calculated.Seven out of the 16 cases of endometriomas (44%) were graded as low risk masses according to B-mode-US, while the addition of 3D-US and 3DPD-US increased the accuracy to 56% and 94%, respectively. All dermoid cysts were classified as high risk cases by B-mode-US, but 3D-US and 3DPD-US correctly classified 14% and 57% of cases, respectively. The use of B-mode-US, 3D-US and 3DPD-US correctly classified all four cystadenomas. Only the use of 3DPD-US correctly classified one out of two hemorrhagic corpus luteum cases, whereas the other imaging modalities characterized these lesions as high risk. The overall diagnostic accuracy increased from 38%, 48%, ana 83% with the application of B-mode-US alone, or combined with 3D-US and 3DPD-US, respectively.Conventional ultrasound supplemented with 3D-US and 3DPD-US and the evaluation of findings according to a specific scoring system can facilitate the preoperative classification of complex benign ovarian lesions.The efficiency of transvaginal ultrasonography in the diagnosis of endometrioma.To assess the efficiency of transvaginal ultrasonography in the screening of endometriomas and in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian masses.Prospective study with surgical and pathological confirmation of the sonographic diagnosis.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology at the University of Cagliari, Cagliari, Italy.All premenopausal nonpregnant women (n = 236) submitted to laparotomy or laparoscopy from May 1991 to December 1992.Transvaginal ultrasonographic examinations were done within 1 week before surgery. Ultrasonographic diagnosis was compared with surgical and histopathological findings.The visualization of round-shaped homogeneous hypoechoic "tissue" of low-level echoes within the ovary was chosen as characteristic ultrasonographic finding of endometrioma. Sensitivity, specificity, and predicted values were calculated for each visualized ovary (group A) to assess the efficiency in the screening, and for each visualized cyst (group B) to assess the efficiency in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian masses.Four hundred twenty-three of 466 ovaries were visualized. Of the 82 visualized cysts, 27 were suspected to be endometriomas, and the diagnosis was confirmed by pathology in 21. The sensitivity and the specificity were 75% and 99%, respectively, in group A, and 84% and 90%, respectively, in group B.The study demonstrates that transvaginal ultrasonography has an efficiency of 88% in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian masses with a specificity of 90%.Results and role of rectal endoscopic ultrasonography for patients with deep pelvic endometriosis.The objective of this work was to assess the advantages and the role of rectal endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) when establishing evidence of infiltration of the rectal wall in patients with proven deep pelvic endometriosis. To this end we performed a retrospective study between July 1993 and December 1996 of a continuous series of 38 patients who presented with deep pelvic endometriosis which was confirmed histologically. The EUS results were considered normal in nine cases (23.7%). In 12 cases (31.6%) EUS revealed an image compatible with infiltration of the uterosacral ligaments and/or the rectovaginal septum without any associated bowel infiltration. In 17 cases (44.7%) EUS revealed an image compatible with deep infiltration of the intestinal wall. Sixteen of these 17 patients underwent laparotomy with bowel resection. The histological results confirmed in each of these 16 patients (100%) that there was deep infiltration of the intestinal wall by endometriotic lesions. The seventeenth patient refused such major surgery by laparotomy, and underwent partial laparoscopy due to the risk of bowel injury. For the 21 patients with no EUS evidence of rectal infiltration complete laparoscopic surgical exeresis was achieved in every case (100%) without broaching the intestinal wall. These preliminary results enable us to state that EUS, which is a simple and non-invasive technique, provides a reliable indication as to the presence of deep bowel infiltration in patients with retroperitoneal endometriotic lesions. EUS used pre-operatively enables patients to be selected for treatment via laparotomy or by laparoscopic surgery.Learning curve in the detection of ovarian and deep endometriosis by using Magnetic Resonance: comparison with surgical results.Determining if Magnetic Resonance Imaging (MRI) accuracy in diagnosing endometriosis is related to radiologist's expertise.Written informed consent was obtained from all patients. This study is compliant to STARD method. Thirty patients (mean age 34; range 21-45 years) who had undergone MRI study for suspected endometriosis underwent surgery were retrospectively evaluated. MRI at 1.5T was performed with SE and TSE sequences, T1 and T2-weighted with and without fat suppression. Four localizations were analyzed: ovary, uterosacral ligaments (USL), vaginal fornix and Rectum\Sigma\Douglas (R.S.D.). One radiologist evaluated each dataset; sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV, accuracy, LR+ and LR- were calculated according to the surgical results (first analysis). Dataset were then re-analyzed 12 months (second analysis) and 24 months (third analysis) later. McNemar test was applied to determine differences between the three analysis.Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy for the ovary at the first analysis were 88.9%, 87% and 88%, at the second 92.6%, 87% and 90% whereas at the third 92.6%, 91.3% and 92%. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy for the USLs at the first analysis were 62.5%, 76.9% and 70%, at the second 72%, 80.8% and 76% whereas at the third 80%, 84.6% and 82%. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy for the vaginal fornix at the first analysis were 63.2%, 64.5% and 64%, at the second 73.7%, 77.4% and 76% whereas at the third 73.7%, 83.9% and 80%. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy for the R.S.D. at the first analysis were 39.1%, 81.5% and 62%, at the second 62.5%, 85.2% and 76% whereas at the third 73.9%, 88.9% and 82%. McNemar test indicated a significant statistical difference in sensitivity in detecting nodules of endometriosis in R.S.D. between first and third analysis (p=0.0215). The mean review time decreased (p=0.0001).Accuracy of MRI in diagnosing endometriosis increased with radiologist's expertise and the improvement was statistically significant in determining RSD involvement.Rectosigmoid endometriosis: endoscopic ultrasound features and clinical implications.The main area of the gastrointestinal tract affected by deep pelvic endometriosis is the rectosigmoid colon in 3-37% of cases. Due to the risk of infiltration and the clinical symptoms of endometriosis, with pain and infertility, the condition may require surgical resection. Preoperative imaging diagnosis of rectosigmoid involvement is therefore important. Rectal endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), which is already used for the staging of anorectal carcinoma and submucosal lesions, may be a promising technique for this indication. The present study was conducted in order to describe the endosonographic appearance of rectosigmoid endometriosis, and to define the potential relevance of the technique to the choice of resection method.Between 1993 and 1997, 46 women (mean age 31) with deep pelvic endometriosis underwent imaging investigations and surgical resection. The clinical and imaging findings, and the surgical and histological features identified--mainly with regard to infiltration of the rectal wall--were compared retrospectively. The impact of the EUS findings on the decision on whether or not to carry out resection, either by laparoscopy or open abdominal surgery, was also examined.When there was deep pelvic endometriosis with suspected rectal wall infiltration, EUS showed normal anatomy in nine patients, endometriotic lesions without rectal wall infiltration in 12, and typical rectal infiltration in 25. The lesions were confirmed by the surgical findings during therapeutic laparoscopy (n = 22) and laparotomy (n = 25), as well as by clinical follow-up. Rectal wall infiltration, demonstrated in all cases using EUS, had initially been suspected on the basis of clinical examinations, rectoscopy, barium enema, computed tomography, and magnetic resonance imaging in 62%, 50%, 33%, 67% and 66% of cases, respectively.EUS is a simple and noninvasive technique capable of correctly diagnosing rectal wall infiltration in deep pelvic endometriosis. It may be helpful in determining the choice between laparoscopy and laparotomy when complete resection is indicated.Three-dimensional sonography for diagnosis of rectovaginal septum endometriosis: interobserver agreement.The aim of this study was to evaluate the interobserver agreement for diagnosis of deep endometriosis of the rectovaginal septum using introital 3-dimensional (3D) sonography.Two experienced observers (observers A and B) performed a retrospective review of stored 3D sonographic volumes from a sample of 84 consecutive patients with a clinical suspicion of endometriosis. Each observer, independently and blinded to each other, evaluated the presence or absence of involvement of the rectovaginal septum. When no lesion was seen, the observers were asked to judge whether the acquisition of the volume was suboptimal for interpretation or whether no lesion on the rectovaginal septum was detectable. One inadequate acquisition case was discarded; a total of 83 cases were evaluated. To calculate the performance of introital 3D sonography, 7 discordant cases were reviewed by a third observer. Interobserver agreement was assessed by calculating the κ index, and the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for the 3 observers were also determined.Interobserver agreement was 0.816 (95% confidence interval, 0.69-0.93), representing very good agreement. Sensitivity was 74.1%; specificity, 85.7%; positive predictive value, 71.4%; and negative predictive value, 87.3%.Our results show that introital 3D sonography for diagnosis of deep endometriosis of the rectovaginal septum is reproducible, with very good interobserver agreement.Can transvaginal sonography predict infiltration depth in patients with deep infiltrating endometriosis of the rectum?Patients with deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) of the rectum often benefit from surgical treatment, including disc or segmental bowel resection, in terms of pain relief and treatment of infertility. The aim of the present study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) for preoperative detection of rectal DIE. Furthermore, we aimed to investigate whether TVS can predict infiltration depth based on the distortion of characteristic sonomorphologic features of the rectal wall.Two-hundred patients with symptoms of endometriosis were prospectively assessed by TVS for the presence of rectal DIE before undergoing laparoscopic radical resection of endometriosis including segmental resection of the bowel in affected cases. Sensitivities, specificities, positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV), positive and negative likelihood ratios (LHR) and test accuracies were then calculated for the presence of infiltration of the serosal/smooth muscle (S/M) layer and submucosal/mucosal (MUC) layer as demonstrated by TVS and confirmed by histopathological analysis.Rectal endometriosis was confirmed in 43 out of 195 (22%) cases. The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV, test accuracy and positive and negative LHR of TVS on S/M infiltration were 98%, 99%, 98%, 99%, 99%,150.24 and 0.02, respectively, whereas respective data on MUC involvement were 62%, 96%, 53%, 97%, 93.8%, 16 and 0.4.TVS is a highly valuable tool in detecting rectal endometriosis preoperatively. Within this, S/M endometriotic infiltration can be accurately predicted, whereas TVS is less valuable for detection of MUC involvement.Susceptibility-weighted MRI of endometrioma: preliminary results.Susceptibility-weighted MRI combines magnitude and phase information from fully velocity-compensated gradient-echo sequences and depicts as signal voids the susceptibility effects caused by local inhomogeneity of the magnetic field. Our objective, based on MRI of 60 pathologically proven ovarian cystic lesions, including 42 endometriomas and 18 nonendometrial cysts, was to evaluate hemosiderin deposition within the walls of endometriomas on susceptibility-weighted MR images. Two radiologists blinded to the final diagnosis retrospectively reviewed the images in consensus.On susceptibility-weighted MR images, punctate or curved linear signal voids along the cyst wall were observed in 39 endometriomas (92.9%) and in no nonendometrial cysts. The signal voids were more prominent on 3-T than on 1.5-T images, reflecting the higher sensitivity of 3-T MRI to magnetic susceptibility effects. Thirty-two endometriomas (76.2%) met definitive MRI criteria, that is, hyperintensity on T1-weighted images and hypointensity on T2-weighted images, and 41 endometriomas (97.6%) were correctly diagnosed with susceptibility-weighted MRI.Endometriosis of the posterior cul-de-sac: clinical presentation and findings at transvaginal ultrasound.The purpose of our study was to evaluate the clinical findings and transvaginal ultrasound features of posterior cul-de-sac endometriosis.A retrospective search of cases over a 13-year period was performed and yielded 25 patients with posterior cul-de-sac endometriosis. The diagnosis of posterior cul-de-sac endometriosis was confirmed by histology (n = 13), conventional barium enema (n = 13), colonoscopy (n = 8), CT (n = 8), MRI (n = 17), diagnostic laparoscopy (n = 14), and laparotomy (n = 13). All patients underwent transvaginal and abdominal ultrasound including power Doppler examination. Two radiologists working in consensus analyzed the clinical data and reviewed the imaging studies.All 25 patients presented with lower abdominal pain that was cyclic in six patients. Eleven patients were unintended childless. Rectal discomfort was mentioned by 17 patients, two of whom also reported rectal blood loss. At physical examination, eight patients had a palpable mass in the posterior cul-de-sac. Transvaginal ultrasound detected one or more hypoechoic masses in the posterior cul-de-sac in all 25 patients. All masses were solid, noncompressible, and localized on the serosal surface of the rectosigmoid with sparing of mucosa and submucosa. The lesions had a rounded or ovoid shape and a mean sagittal diameter of 37 mm with vascularity. The masses had a spiculated or tethering contour in 19 patients. Abdominal ultrasound detected thick-walled adnexal cysts in 11 patients, hydronephrosis in eight, and involvement of the ileocecal region in five.Patients with endometriosis of the posterior cul-de-sac frequently present with atypical noncyclic symptoms. The transvaginal ultrasound features characteristic of posterior cul-de-sac endometriosis are a solid, often spiculated, noncompressible mass near the posterior cul-de-sac that is localized at the serosal surface of the rectosigmoid, spares the mucosa and submucosa, and is vascular.Deep infiltrating endometriosis: CT imaging evaluation.To retrospectively evaluate the feasibility of computed tomography (CT) in depicting deep-infiltrating endometriosis.The study population included 54 patients (age: mean, 35.5 years; range, 23-48 years) with histologically confirmed ovarian endometriomas between January 2007 and July 2009. All the patients underwent preoperative CT imaging before laparotomy or laparoscopy. The CT images were evaluated for the presence of a tethered appearance of the rectum in the direction of the uterus, stranding of periuterine pelvic fat, thickening of the uterosacral ligament, and retroflexed uterus. Two radiologists performed a blinded and independent review for each CT finding. The sensitivity, the specificity, the positive predictive value, the negative predictive value, and the accuracy of each CT finding and kappa statistics were determined.Deep-infiltrating endometriosis was confirmed after surgery and pathologic examination in 34 patients (63.0%). The most specific finding for the diagnosis of deep-infiltrating endometriosis was tethered appearance of rectum in the direction of the uterus (90.0%). The mean sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy values of all the CT findings except that of retroflexed uterus were 56.9%, 70.0%, 78.1%, 60.4%, and 61.7%, respectively. The mean kappa value was 0.82 (range, 0.67-0.96).Computed tomographic imaging may constitute another potential option as a complementary imaging modality for the evaluation of deep-infiltrating endometriosis.Pelvic endometriosis: MR imaging.The value of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging at 0.35 T in detecting, characterizing, and staging pelvic endometriosis was prospectively investigated in 30 consecutive women in whom this disease was clinically suspected. MR findings were correlated with the results of laparoscopy (13 women) and laparotomy (17 women). Surgical examination revealed a normal pelvis in five patients and endometriosis in 25. Three of the five normal cases and 16 of the 25 cases of endometriosis were correctly identified with MR imaging (sensitivity, 64%; specificity, 60%; accuracy, 63%). MR imaging demonstrated seven of eight endometriomas but only 14 of 29 adhesions and only six of 45 endometrial implants. While MR imaging demonstrated endometriomas, ovarian adhesions, and extraperitoneal endometrial implants, it could not accurately depict extraovarian endometrial adhesions and intraperitoneal endometrial implants. In addition, MR imaging findings did not correlate with the surgically determined severity of the disease. These limitations indicate that MR imaging cannot be used as the primary modality in the detection, characterization, and staging of endometriosis; laparoscopy remains the procedure of choice.Transvaginal sonographic diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma.To assess the efficacy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) in differentiating endometriomas from other adnexal masses.One thousand thirty-five adnexal masses undergoing laparoscopy or laparotomy were evaluated prospectively using TVS. Masses diagnosed as endometrioma according to their sonographic appearance were divided into two groups: those with a round shape, regular margins, thick walls and homogeneous, low-level echoes (group A); or those with irregular margins, internal septations and an anechoic appearance (group B).The sensitivity of TVS in diagnosing endometriomas was 86.50% and the specificity 99.11%. The positive predictive value (PPV) and the negative predictive value of the test were calculated to be 91.45% and 98.14%, respectively. By using the criteria determining group A, the PPV of the test increased to 97%, whereas group B had a lower PPV (70.85%).We propose that the accuracy of TVS in diagnosing endometriomas may be beneficial in various clinical conditions.Endoscopic rectal ultrasound and elastosonography are useful in flow chart for the diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis with rectal involvement.Endometriosis is defined by the presence of endometrial glands and stroma outside the uterus. The disease causes pelvic pain, dysmenorrhea, dyspareunia, dyschezia and urinary symptoms. The aim of this study was to assess the usefulness of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and elastosonography for detecting rectosigmoid endometriosis and to compare the findings, in selected and symptomatic patients, with surgical specimens in order to select the best surgical strategy.Sixty-three consecutive patients (mean age 34.2; range 25-50 years) with diagnosis of endometriosis were referred for rectal endosonography to evaluate the rectal involvement. Patients complained of abdominal pain, rectal bleeding, constipation and dysmenorrhea. Sub-stenosis of the rectosigmoid lumen was found endoscopically in one patient (1.5%), bulging in 21 (33.3%), mucosal hyperemia or edema in one (1.5%), and no lesions in 39 patients (61.9%); no abdominal masses or obstruction were reported. Each woman completed a self-administered 100-point questionnaire to evaluate endometriosis-related pain (intensity of symptoms: 0 = absent, 100 = unbearable). After clinical imaging evaluation, 10 symptomatic patients (mean age 32.2; range 26-45 years) were evaluated for surgery.EUS detected endometriotic lesions in all patients as a hypoechoic mass, poorly vascularized with irregular, undefined margins. In cases where the rectosigmoid wall was involved, there was invasion of the fourth layer. All patients who were operated had histologic findings of endometriotic lesions involving the rectal wall, as indicated by EUS.EUS and elastosonography offers a non-invasive and sensitive technique to better define the endometriotic infiltration in the rectosigmoid wall.Role of transvaginal sonography in the detection of endometriomata.Endometriosis is a common cause of pelvic pain and infertility in young women. Transvaginal sonography is major means for diagnosing ovarian In our study, we scanned 60 patients with endometriomata who underwent laparotomy or laparoscopy. We compared preoperative ultrasonographic diagnosis with histological reports. The sonographic criteria for the diagnosis of endometriomata were (1) cystic structure with low, homogeneous echogenicity and (2) thick cystic wall with regular margins. In 50 patients, sonography suggested an endometrioma. In 47 cases, the diagnosis was correct. The false-positive cases were all caused by cystic teratomas with a homogeneous sonographic pattern. Ten false-negative cases were diagnosed by ultra-sonography as functional ovarian cysts (5), teratomas (3), and benign ovarian cystoma (1). Only 1 case of a 5-mm endometrioma was demonstrated by laparoscopy but not by TVS. The sensitivity of TVS for diagnosing endometriomata was 82.4% and specificity 97.7%; the positive and negative predictive values were 94% and 92.8%, respectively. The diagnostic accuracy of TVS was 93%. In our experience, TVS is a very specific means for diagnosing endometriomata when the typical pattern is detected; however, the sensitivity of the technique needs to be improved.Diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis by magnetic resonance imaging using "fat-saturation" technique.To assess the usefulness of fat-saturated magnetic resonance (MR) imaging for detecting small endometrial implants.Prospective evaluation by conventional and fat-saturated MR imaging.Shimane Medical University Hospital, Izumo, Japan.Fifty-one consecutive patients with clinically suspected pelvic endometriosis.Magnetic resonance images < 2 weeks before laparoscopy or laparotomy.The location, number, and size of lesions.Surgery revealed a normal pelvis in 5 patients, endometriosis in 44 (42 with pigmented lesions and 2 with nonpigmented lesions and adhesions), and other cystic lesions in 2. With fat-saturated MR imaging, overall sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 89%, 71%, 95%, and 50%, respectively. At surgery, 122 pigmented lesions of endometriosis were detected. Conventional MR images indicated lesions of endometriosis in 74. When fat-saturated images were used, 103 lesions were detected. With conventional MR images, only one of 34 small endometrial implants (2 to 3 mm in diameter) was detected. However, the addition of fat-saturated images increased the detection rate to 15 of 34, and all lesions > 4 mm in diameter.Conventional MR imaging for detecting small endometrial implants was improved by addition of the fat-saturation technique. Therefore, fat-saturation MR imaging is an acceptable for detecting small endometriomas.Deep infiltrating endometriosis of the bowel wall: the comet sign.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the appearance of deep infiltrating endometriosis of the bowel wall in the cul-de-sac and determine the characteristic appearance of these lesions. We searched our database between January 1, 2011, and December 31, 2013, for all patients who had sonographic findings of suspected deep infiltrating endometriosis of the bowel with obliteration of the cul-de-sac. The medical record of each patient was examined retrospectively for evidence of surgical confirmation of disease. The sonographic appearance, shape, and size of the bowel wall lesions were evaluated to develop criteria for deep infiltrating endometriosis of the rectosigmoid and cul-de-sac. The search of our database revealed 35 patients with sonographic findings of pelvic bowel wall endometriosis associated with obliteration of the cul-de-sac. Ten of these patients had surgical confirmation of bowel wall endometriosis after the scan, and another 4 patients had surgical evidence of endometriosis from prior surgery. All of the patients who underwent surgery subsequent to sonography had confirmation of their bowel wall infiltrative endometriosis. Sonographically, the bowel lesions were solid, focal, and tubular with slightly irregular margins and in most cases a thinner section or a "tail" at one end, resembling a comet. This study confirms that bowel wall implants have a very characteristic appearance, and extending the transvaginal examination to include an evaluation of the rectosigmoid seeking these bowel lesions is valuable, especially in any patient presenting with a history of pelvic pain. The diagnosis of endometriomas using colour Doppler energy imaging.We studied the role of colour Doppler energy (CDE) (or power Doppler) imaging in the differentiation between endometriomas and other adnexal masses in premenopausal non-pregnant women. A total of 170 consecutive patients with persistent adnexal masses was submitted to B-mode transvaginal ultrasonography associated with CDE imaging evaluation. Plasma concentrations of CA125 were measured before surgery. Using CDE imaging evaluation of vessel distribution, the occurrence of one of the following findings was considered to indicate the likely presence of endometrioma: (i) a round-shaped homogeneous hypoechoic 'tissue' of low-level echoes without papillary proliferations associated with 'poor' vascularization; (ii) a round-shaped homogeneous hypoechoic 'tissue' of low-level echoes with an echogenic portion in which no flow was detected. The overall agreement between the test result and the actual outcome was calculated using the k index. The CDE imaging evaluation was more accurate in the diagnosis of endometriomas compared with B-mode ultrasonography alone (k = 0.88 and 0.80 respectively). According to the logistic regression equation obtained, the probability of the presence of endometrioma varied between a minimum of 1.4% for patients with no risk factors to a maximum of 95.6% for patients with two risk factors (CDE result and value of CA125 >25 IU/ml).Magnetic resonance imaging characteristics of deep endometriosis.The aim of this study was to describe magnetic resonance (MR) imaging findings in histopathologically proven deep endometriosis infiltrating the uterosacral ligaments, the pouch of Douglas, the rectum or the bladder. Twenty patients presenting with a clinical suspicion of deep endometriosis underwent preoperative MR imaging. Sagittal and axial fast T2- and axial T1-weighted spin echo MR sequences were performed. Four patients had post-contrast images. MR results, including morphology and signal intensity of each lesion, were compared to intraoperative gross appearance and histopathology. Histopathology diagnosed 24 lesions of deep endometriosis in the uterosacral ligaments (n = 12), the pouch of Douglas (n = 2), the rectum (n = 3), the bladder (n = 7). Uterosacral ligaments with deep endometriosis were statistically different from normal uterosacral ligaments for proximal nodularity (P = 0.001). There was no difference in signal intensity between normal and abnormal uterosacral ligaments. Contrast-enhanced SE images in four patients with detrusor invasion showed an interruption of the hypointense detrusor by the enhancing bladder endometriosis. Rectal endometriosis was missed in two of three patients and showed non-specific rectal wall thickening in one patient. It is concluded that MR imaging can diagnose deep endometriosis of uterosacral ligaments, the bladder and the pouch of Douglas, but lacks sensitivity in detecting rectal endometriosis without rectal distension.Rectal endoscopic ultrasound with a radial probe in the assessment of rectovaginal endometriosis.To evaluate the accuracy of rectal endoscopic ultrasound and to evaluate endometriosis in the rectovaginal septum, rectum, and sigmoid walls.Validation of diagnostic test (Canadian Task Force classification II-1).Tertiary care hospital.Thirty-two consecutive women clinically suspected of having rectovaginal septum endometriosis without previous surgical treatment.Colonoscopy, transrectal ultrasound, and rectal endoscopic ultrasound, followed by laparoscopy or laparotomy.The disease was classified according to 1996 standards of the American Society of Reproductive Medicine. Images obtained by colonoscopy, endoscopic ultrasound, and surgery and histologic findings were compared. In 6 patients endometriosis infiltrated bowel muscularis wall, in 20 it infiltrated rectovaginal septum, and in the remaining 6 there was no evidence of lesions. In all women in whom infiltration of the intestinal wall was suspected, rectal endoscopic ultrasound and colonoscopy confirmed the lesions (sensitivity 100%, specificity 67%).Endoscopic ultrasound was useful in preoperative assessment of women with endometriosis.Accuracy of transvaginal sonography and rectal endoscopic sonography in the diagnosis of deep infiltrating endometriosis.To compare the accuracy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) and rectal endoscopic sonography (RES) for the diagnosis of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE), with respect to surgical and histological findings.This was a longitudinal study of 81 consecutive patients referred for surgical management of DIE, who underwent both TVS and RES preoperatively. The diagnostic criteria were identical for TVS and RES, and were based on visualization of hypoechoic areas in specific locations (uterosacral ligaments, vagina, rectovaginal septum and intestine). We calculated the sensitivity, specificity, predictive values and accuracy of TVS and RES for the diagnosis of DIE.Endometriosis was confirmed histologically in 80/81 (98.7%) patients. Endometriomas and DIE were present in 43.2% and 97.5% of the women, respectively. For the diagnosis of DIE overall, TVS and RES, respectively, had a sensitivity of 87.3% and 74.7%, a positive predictive value of 98.6% and 98.3%, and an accuracy of 86.4% and 74%. For the diagnosis of uterosacral endometriosis, they had a sensitivity of 80.8% and 46.6%, a specificity of 75% and 50.0%, a positive predictive value of 96.7% and 89.5% and a negative predictive value of 30% and 9.3%. For the diagnosis of intestinal endometriosis, they had a sensitivity of 92.6% and 88.9%, a specificity of 100% and 92.6%, a positive predictive value of 100% and 96% and a negative predictive value of 87% and 80.6%.TVS is apparently more accurate than is RES for predicting DIE in specific locations, and should thus be the first-line imaging technique in this setting.Diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal ultrasound examination for assigning a specific diagnosis to adnexal masses.To determine the sensitivity and specificity of subjective evaluation of gray-scale and Doppler ultrasound findings (here called pattern recognition) when used by experienced ultrasound examiners with regard to making a specific diagnosis of adnexal masses.Within the framework of a European multicenter study, the International Ovarian Tumor Analysis study, comprising nine ultrasound centers, women with at least one adnexal mass were examined with gray-scale and color Doppler ultrasonography by experienced ultrasound examiners. A standardized examination technique, and standardized terms and definitions were used. Using pattern recognition the examiners classified each mass as benign or malignant and suggested a specific diagnosis (e.g. dermoid cyst or endometrioma). The reference standard was the histology of the surgically removed adnexal tumors.A total of 1066 women were included, of whom 800 had a benign mass and 266 a malignant mass. A specific diagnosis based on ultrasound findings was suggested in 899 (84%) tumors. The specificity was high for all diagnoses (range, 94-100%). The sensitivity was highest for benign teratoma/dermoid cysts (86%, 100/116), hydrosalpinges (86%, 18/21), peritoneal pseudocysts (80%, 4/5) and endometriomas (77%, 153/199), and lowest for functional cysts (17%, 4/24), paraovarian/parasalpingeal cysts (14%, 3/21), benign rare tumors (11%, 1/9), adenofibromas (8%, 3/39), simple cysts (6%, 1/18) and struma ovarii (0%, 0/5). The positive and negative likelihood ratios of pattern recognition with regard to dermoid cysts, hydrosalpinges and endometriomas were 68.2 and 0.14, 38.9 and 0.15, and 33.3 and 0.24, respectively. Dermoid cysts, hydrosalpinges, functional cysts, paraovarian cysts, peritoneal pseudocysts, fibromas/fibrothecomas and simple cysts were never misdiagnosed as malignancies by the ultrasound examiner, whereas more than 10% of inflammatory processes, adenofibromas and rare benign tumors including struma ovarii were misdiagnosed as malignancies.Using subjective evaluation of gray-scale and Doppler ultrasound findings it is possible to make an almost conclusive diagnosis of a dermoid cyst, endometrioma and hydrosalpinx. Many other adnexal pathologies can be recognized but not confidently confirmed or excluded.Learning curve for the detection of pouch of Douglas obliteration and deep infiltrating endometriosis of the rectum.How long does it take to be proficient in diagnosing pouch of Douglas (POD) obliteration and deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) of the rectum with transvaginal sonography (TVS)?Sonographers familiar with the general use of TVS are expected to be proficient in the diagnosis of endometriosis nodules of the rectum and the detection of POD obliteration using the 'sliding sign' after ∼40 examinations, performed in a referral clinic for pelvic pain.With rectal DIE, the reasons for the obvious diagnostic problems are complex. Menstrual pain or cramps are still considered to be 'normal' and do not provide a reason for patients and even health-care providers to seek expert help. Furthermore, the performance of TVS for diagnosing pelvic endometriosis has been shown to be accurate only in experienced hands.This prospective study included 121 selected patients with suspected endometriosis.Symptomatic patients, referred to a pelvic pain clinic, were examined by an expert sonographer (E.S.) and consecutively by two trainees (T1/2).The learning curve using the cumulative sum shows that the trainees, listed as T1/T2, reached the predefined level of proficiency in detecting bowel nodules after examining 42 and 37 patients, for T1 and T2, respectively. The prevalence rate of bowel nodules demonstrated by the ES was 21%. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values (PPV, NPV) as well as the accuracy for TVS of T1 and T2 in comparison with the results of ES were 72 and 89, 96 and 95, 87 and 80, 90 and 98, and 89 and 94%, respectively. The prevalence rate of POD obliteration, as demonstrated by a negative sliding sign, was 27%. The trainees reached the predefined level of proficiency after examining 42 and 33 patients, for T1 and T2, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV as well as the accuracy of TVS for T1 and T2 in comparison with the results of the ES were 83 and 89, 95 and 95, 91 and 80, 90 and 98, and 91 and 94%, respectively.We performed this analysis in a tertiary referral centre with a high number of advanced cases of DIE, not reflecting a standard population.Integrated in TVS training courses, typical sonographic video clips for DIE of the rectum, including the use of disease-specific signs, could help to improve diagnostic accuracy in DIE and shorten diagnostic delays.No funding was received for this study. None of the authors has any competing interests.Transvaginal ultrasound after bowel preparation to assist surgical planning for bowel endometriosis resection.The characterization of common ovarian cysts in premenopausal women.The evaluation of the predictive value of transvaginal ultrasound in the assessment of benign adnexal pathology in premenopausal women, based on the recognition of characteristic morphologic patterns particular to endometriotic and dermoid ovarian cysts.This was a prospective study. All premenopausal women undergoing surgery for a suspected ovarian cyst underwent a transvaginal ultrasound examination in the week prior to surgery. Between June 1997 and January 2000, 132 women underwent surgery for a suspected ovarian endometrioma or dermoid cyst. The endpoints were either the direct visualization of the cyst wall and contents at surgery, or the histologic evaluation of removed tissues.Of 83 suspected endometriomas (11 bilateral), 80 were confirmed at surgery and of 68 suspected benign cystic teratomas (eight bilateral), 66 were confirmed by histology. The positive predictive value of transvaginal ultrasonography for the diagnosis of endometrioma and dermoid cysts was 96.4% and 97.1%, respectively. The false positive rates were 3.8% and 3.0%, respectively. There were no malignancies in either group.Based on the recognition of characteristic ultrasound patterns alone, the positive predictive value of transvaginal ultrasonography for the diagnosis of these common, benign cysts in premenopausal women is very high and can be used reliably to select women for appropriate surgery.Endometriosis: appearance and detection at MR imaging.Thirty-nine magnetic resonance (MR) studies were performed on 31 women with surgically proved endometriosis. A total of 88 endometriotic lesions ranging in size from 0.2 to 7.5 cm were detected on 24 of 30 MR images of women. The signal intensities ranged from hyperintense on all pulse sequences (41 of 88) to hypointense on all sequences (24 of 88); the remainder demonstrated signal intensities corresponding to the appearances of acute, subacute, and chronic hematomas. Hypointense or signal-void rims on both T1- and T2-weighted images were detected in 35 lesions. Identification of the disease with MR imaging versus concurrent surgery was compared for 76 sites in 19 patients. Findings were true-positive in 24 cases, false-negative in ten, true-negative in 32, and false-positive in seven, resulting in an MR sensitivity of 71% and specificity of 82%. Adhesions obscured the disease at laparoscopy in three patients. MR imaging cannot be used as a substitute for laparoscopy in the definitive diagnosis or staging of endometriosis. However, it can be used to monitor treatment response in place of laparoscopy once a diagnosis is firmly established.The value of pelvic MRI in the diagnosis of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration in cases of deep pelvic endometriosis.The objective of our study was to define relevant MRI signs allowing preoperative diagnosis of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration in patients with deep pelvic endometriosis.This retrospective study included patients who underwent pelvic MRI completed by a laparoscopic examination. Three radiologists performed the MRI review blinded and recorded the following signs: sign 1, retroflexed uterus; sign 2, retrouterine mass; sign 3, displacement of intraperitoneal fluid; sign 4, elevation of the fornix; and sign 5, adherence of bowel loops. Laparoscopic results provided the criterion standard for diagnosis of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration. The performance of MRI was evaluated by calculating the average sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of MRI results of the two more experienced radiologists for each sign and for combinations of signs. Interobserver agreement for each sign and impression for posterior cul-de-sac obliteration were calculated for all radiologists.Sixty-three patients were included in the study. Posterior cul-de-sac obliteration was diagnosed in 43 patients at laparoscopy. The mean sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of each sign and impression of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration were, respectively, as follows: sign 1, 24.4%, 77.5%, 41.3%; sign 2, 97.1%, 83.7%, 92.8%; sign 3, 95.0%, 88.7%, 93.1%; sign 4, 30.2%, 97.5%, 51.6%; sign 5, 83.7%, 91.2%, 86.1%; and impression of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration, 91.9%, 91.2%, 91.7%. Interobserver concordance varied from 0.26 to 0.81 with best results obtained with the combination of signs 2, 3, and 5. Best concordances for junior radiologist evaluations were obtained with assessment of sign 3.MRI allows posterior cul-de-sac obliteration diagnosis. Pelvic fluid displacement may be the sign with greatest utility when considering both diagnostic accuracy and interobserver agreement.Assessment of pelvic endometriosis: correlation of US and MRI with laparoscopic findings.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the contribution of ultrasound (US) and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in the diagnosis and local staging of endometriosis by comparing results with laparoscopic findings.We evaluated 36 consecutive women with suspected or clinically diagnosed endometriosis. Thirty-two out of 36 patients met the following inclusion criteria: transabdominal and endocavitary (US) examination and MR imaging, followed by laparoscopy performed within 2 weeks. US and MR findings were classified based on location, number and morphology (small nodules, large nodules, laminar lesions, cystic lesions, complex lesions, adhesions, cul-de-sac obliteration).Laparoscopy, considered the gold standard, identified 143 lesions in 32 patients. US detected 101 lesions, and MR detected 92 lesions, which were subsequently divided by morphologic appearance. Sensitivity and specificity of the two imaging techniques in the recognition of the different locations were 58% and 25%, respectively, for US and 56% and 50%, respectively, for MR imaging. Results of the two techniques in the different locations examined were similar, with the exception of lesions in the rectovaginal septum, which were better detected by US, and for adhesions and cul-de-sac obliteration, which were more easily detected by MR.Both US and MR are accurate in the diagnosis of endometriosis. There are no significant differences in staging of pelvic endometriosis between US and MR. US examination is the primary evaluation in cases of suspected disease and for the rectovaginal septum. MR examination is recommended for correct classification in doubtful cases and in cases of suspected extrapelvic lesions and adhesions.The prediction of pouch of Douglas obliteration using offline analysis of the transvaginal ultrasound 'sliding sign' technique: inter- and intra-observer reproducibility.What is the inter-/intra-observer agreement and diagnostic accuracy among gynaecological and non-gynaecological ultrasound specialists in the prediction of pouch of Douglas (POD) obliteration (secondary to endometriosis) at offline analysis of two-dimensional videos using the dynamic real-time transvaginal ultrasound (TVS) 'sliding sign' technique?The inter-/intra-observer agreement and diagnostic accuracy for the interpretation of the TVS 'sliding sign' in the prediction of POD obliteration was found to be very acceptable, ranging from substantial to almost perfect agreement for the observers who specialized in gynaecological ultrasound.Women with POD obliteration at laparoscopy are at an increased risk of bowel endometriosis; therefore, the pre-operative diagnosis of POD obliteration is important in the surgical planning for these women. Previous studies have used TVS to predict POD obliteration prior to laparoscopy, with a sensitivity of 72-83% and specificity of 97-100%. However, there have not been any reproducibility studies performed to validate the use of TVS in the prediction of POD obliteration pre-operatively.This was a reproducibility study which involved the offline viewing of pre-recorded video sets of 30 women presenting with chronic pelvic pain, in order to determine POD obliteration using the TVS 'sliding sign' technique. The videos were selected on real-time representative quality/quantity; they were not obtained from sequential patients. There were a total of six observers, including four gynaecological ultrasound specialists and two fetal medicine specialists. The study was conducted over a period of 1 month (March 2012-April 2012).The four gynaecological ultrasound observers performed daily gynaecological scanning, while the other two observers were primarily fetal medicine sonologists. Each sonologist viewed the TVS 'sliding sign' video in two anatomical locations (retro-cervix and posterior uterine fundus), i.e. 60 videos in total. The POD was deemed not obliterated, if 'sliding sign' was positive in both anatomical locations (i.e. anterior rectum/rectosigmoid glided smoothly across the retro-cervix/posterior fundus, respectively). If the 'sliding sign' was negative (i.e. anterior rectum/rectosigmoid did not glide smoothly over retro-cervix/posterior fundal region, respectively), the POD was deemed obliterated. Diagnostic accuracy and inter-observer agreement among the six sonologists was evaluated. The same sonologist was also asked to reanalyse the same videos, albeit in a different order, at least 7 days later to assess for intra-observer agreement. A separate analysis of the inter- and intra-observer correlation was also performed to determine the agreement among the four observers who specialized in gynaecological ultrasound. Cohen's κ coefficient <0 meant that there was poor agreement, 0.01-0.20 slight agreement, 0.21-0.40 fair agreement, 0.41-0.60 moderate agreement, 0.61-0.80 substantial agreement and 0.81-0.99 almost perfect agreement.Agreement (Cohen's κ) between all six observers for the interpretation of the 'sliding sign' for both sets of videos in both regions (retro-cervix and fundus) ranged from 0.354 to 0.927 (fair agreement to almost perfect agreement) compared with 0.630-0.927 (substantial agreement to almost perfect agreement) when only the gynaecological sonologists were included. The overall multiple rater agreement for the interpretation of the 'sliding sign' for both video sets and both regions was Fleiss' κ 0.454 (P-value <0.01) for all six observers and 0.646 (P-value <0.01) for the four gynaecological ultrasound specialists. The multiple rater agreement for all six or all four observers was higher for the retro-cervical region versus the fundal region (Fleiss' κ 0.542 versus 0.370 and 0.732 versus 0.560, respectively). The intra-observer agreement among the six observers for the interpretation of the 'sliding sign' and prediction of POD obliteration ranged from Cohen's κ 0.60-0.95 and 0.46-1.0 (P-value <0.01), respectively. After excluding the fetal medicine specialists, the intra-observer agreement for the interpretation of the 'sliding sign' and the prediction of POD obliteration ranged from Cohen's κ 0.71-0.95 and 0.67-1.0, respectively, indicating substantial to almost perfect agreement. When comparing the four gynaecological observers for the prediction of POD obliteration using the TVS 'sliding sign' (after excluding cases with the POD outcome classified as 'unsure' by the observers), the results for accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value were 93.1-100, 92.9-100, 90.9-100, 77.8-100 and 97.7-100%, respectively.The 'gold standard' for the diagnosis of POD obliteration is laparoscopy; however, laparoscopic data were available only for 24 out of 30 (80%) TVS 'sliding sign' cases included in this study. Although this should not affect the inter- and intra-observer agreement findings, the ability to draw conclusions regarding the diagnostic accuracy of the TVS 'sliding sign' in the prediction of POD obliteration is somewhat limited. In addition, the diagnostic accuracy findings should be interpreted with the caveat that the cases classified as 'unsure' for the prediction of POD obliteration were excluded from the analysis.We have validated the dynamic real-time TVS 'sliding sign' technique for the prediction of POD obliteration, and this simple ultrasound-based test appears to have very acceptable inter-/intra-observer agreement for those who are experienced in gynaecological ultrasound. Given that women with POD obliteration at laparoscopy have an increased risk of bowel endometriosis and requirement for bowel surgery, the TVS 'sliding sign' test should be considered in the pre-operative imaging work-up for all women with suspected endometriosis, to allow for appropriate surgical planning. We believe the TVS 'sliding sign' technique may be easily learned by sonologists/sonographers who are familiar with performing gynaecological ultrasound, and that further studies are required to confirm the diagnostic accuracy of this new ultrasound technique amongst sonologists/sonographers with various levels of experience.This study received no specific grant from any funding agency in the public, commercial or not-for-profit sectors and the authors declare no competing interests.Value of endorectal ultrasonography for diagnosing rectovaginal septal endometriosis infiltrating the rectum.Rectovaginal septal endometriosis (RVSE) can pose serious therapeutic problems when there is infiltration of the rectal septum (which occurs in approximately half of the cases). The aim of this study was to assess the value of endoscopic ultrasonography in diagnosing rectal wall involvement by pelvic endometriosis.A prospective study was carried out from May 1998 to March 2003 at a single hospital center. The 30 patients included in the study presented with suspected RVSE and underwent systematic anorectal endoscopic ultrasonographic exploration prior to the surgical intervention. The endoscopic ultrasonography was carried out under general anesthesia with a 7.5-MHz miniprobe equipped with a distal balloon.The anorectal endoscopic ultrasonographic examination (EUS) showed the presence of endometriosis in the rectovaginal septum in 26 patients (88 %), in the uterosacral ligaments in 10 patients (33 %), and in the ovaries in two patients (6 %). At EUS, the nodules were infiltrating the rectal wall in 17 patients (56 %). The surgical exploration demonstrated endometriosis in the rectovaginal septum in 26 cases, the uterosacral ligaments in 22 cases, and the ovaries in 16 cases. The rectal wall was completely infiltrated in 12 cases and only partly in four cases, and intestinal tract resection was required in 10 cases. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive value of anorectal endoscopic ultrasonography as a means of diagnosing endometriosis of the rectovaginal septum and infiltration of the rectal wall were found to be 96 %, 100 %, 100 % and 83 %, and 92 %, 66 %, 64 % and 92 %, respectively; and the diagnostic accuracy was at 96 % and 80 %, respectively. The sensitivity for detecting nodules in the uterosacral ligaments or in the ovaries was 42 % and 14 %, respectively, leading to diagnostic accuracy rates of 56 % and 53 %.In terms of its sensitivity and its negative predictive value, anorectal endoscopic ultrasonography is a very effective means of detecting endometriosis of the rectovaginal septum and assessing possible infiltration of the rectal wall. However, this method is not as accurate for nodules located far from the EUS probe, as is the case with the uterosacral ligaments and ovaries.Diagnostic confidence analysis in the magnetic resonance imaging of ovarian and deep endometriosis: comparison with surgical results.To assess the diagnostic confidence of multiple readers in the magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) diagnosis of endometriosis.Sixty-five patients (mean age 33; range 19-45 years) who had undergone MRI were retrospectively evaluated. Five regions were analysed and the presence of endometriosis was scored on a five-point scale in order to assess the diagnostic confidence. Statistical analysis included receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis, the Cohen weighted test and sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV), accuracy, positive likelihood ratio (LR+) and negative likelihood ratio (LR-).The areas under the curve (AUC) in the detection of ovarian endometrioma were 0.942, 0.893 and 0.883 for readers 1, 2 and 3, respectively; in the uterosacral ligament (USL) AUCs were 0.907, 0.804 and 0.842; in the vaginal fornix (VF) 0.819, 0.733 and 0.69; in the anterior compartment 0.916, 0.833 and 0.873; and in the rectum/sigma/pouch of Douglas (RSD) 0.936, 0.856 and 0.834.Diagnostic confidence of the observers is different according to the region of the nodules of endometriosis and it can be challenging in the VF and for the less experience readers also in the AC and RSD. Moreover the degree of uncertain diagnosis for the less expert readers may reach up to one third of the examinations.• Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is increasingly used to assess endometriosis • The diagnostic confidence of observers varies according to the location of endometriosis • The diagnosis is more difficult to establish by MRI in some anatomical locations • Specific training should be given concerning those locations that cause difficulty.Characterization of hemorrhagic adnexal lesions with MR imaging: blinded reader study.To assess the performance of published criteria for differentiation of endometriomas from other hemorrhagic adnexal lesions with magnetic resonance (MR) imaging, 74 lesions with pathologic proof in 46 patients were evaluated by means of a 1.5-T system with use of conventional T1-weighted and either T2-weighted spin-echo (SE) or fast SE sequences. The MR images were independently presented to each of three blinded readers, and receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis was performed. The criterion of a cyst with high signal intensity on short repetition time (TR)/echo time (TE) images and shading on long TR/TE images had a mean sensitivity of 68%, mean specificity of 83%, and mean accuracy of 76% for diagnosis of endometrioma. Ancillary findings previously reported to be suggestive of endometrioma (eg, low-signal-intensity rims, adhesions, bowel tethering, and implants) were proved inaccurate and showed low interobserver agreement. ROC analysis showed similar area measurements among the three radiologists for diagnosis of endometrioma. MR imaging had only moderate accuracy in distinction of endometriomas from other hemorrhagic adnexal lesions.Evaluation of colonic involvement in endometriosis: double-contrast barium enema vs. magnetic resonance imaging.The purpose of the study was to compare the accuracy of double-contrast barium enema (DCBE) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the diagnosis of intestinal endometriosis using the histological examination on resected specimen as comparative standard.Eighty-three consecutive patients with suspected intestinal endometriosis, resected between 2005 and 2007, were prospectively evaluated. All of the women underwent preoperative DCBE and MRI on the same day. We evaluated number, site (rectum, sigmoid, cecum), and size of the lesions. The imaging findings were correlated with those resulting at pathology.Among the 65 women who underwent surgery, 50/65 (76.9%) were found to have bowel endometriosis, with 9/50 (18%) patients presenting two lesions; DCBE allowed to detect 50/59 (84.7%) lesions. MRI allowed to detect 42/59 (71.1%) lesions. DCBE showed sensibility, specificity, PPV, NPV, and accuracy of respectively 84.7, 93.7, 98.0, 62.5, and 86.6%, MRI of 71.1, 83.3, 93.3, 46.8, and 74.6%.DCBE is more accurate than unenhanced MRI in the diagnosis of bowel endometriosis, and should be preferred in the preoperative management of this disease, since it usually enables a proper surgical planning.Diagnosis of the most frequent benign ovarian cysts: is ultrasonography accurate and reproducible?To evaluate the reproducibility and the accuracy of B-mode ultrasonographic features of three different kinds of benign ovarian cysts: ovarian endometrioma, mature teratoma, and serous cyst.Digitally stored B-mode sonographic images of 98 women submitted to surgery for the presence of an adnexal mass were evaluated by five different examiners with different degrees of experience. The histological type of each mass was predicted on the basis of the B-mode typical benign findings, as in the case of endometrioma (groundglass endocystic pattern), cystic teratoma (echogenic pattern with or without acoustic shadow), and serous cyst (anechoic cyst without endocystic vegetations). To assess the reproducibility of the B-mode findings, intraobserver and interobserver agreements were calculated using the kappa index.The intraobserver agreement was good or very good for all examiners and for all patterns (kappa = 0.71-1) except for the dermoid cyst, which showed moderate agreement (kappa = 0.42) for the highly experienced operator. The interobserver agreement was good for all experts for endometrioma (kappa = 0.66-0.78) and for serous cyst (kappa = 0.82-1), whereas it was moderate or good for cystic teratoma (kappa = 0.51-0.72). Interobserver agreement between experts and highly experienced operators was fair (kappa = 0.33-0.36) for teratoma and good or very good for endometrioma (kappa = 0.70-0.83) and serous cyst (kappa = 0.76-0.82). For different kinds of cysts, the accuracy was comparable among different operators.Typical features of benign masses using grayscale transvaginal ultrasonography are reproducible even in moderately experienced examiners, although more experience was associated with better interobserver agreement. The diagnostic performance of different operators with different degrees of experience is similar.Ultrasound mapping of pelvic endometriosis: does the location and number of lesions affect the diagnostic accuracy? A multicentre diagnostic accuracy study.Endometriosis is a common condition which causes pain and reduced fertility. Treatment can be difficult, especially for severe disease, and an accurate preoperative assessment would greatly help in the managment of these patients. The objective of this study is to assess the accuracy of pre-operative transvaginal ultrasound scanning (TVS) in identifying the specific features of pelvic endometriosis and pelvic adhesions in comparison with laparoscopy.Consecutive women with clinically suspected or proven pelvic endometriosis, who were booked for laparoscopy, were invited to join the study. They all underwent a systematic transvaginal ultrasound examination in order to identify discrete endometriotic lesions and pelvic adhesions. The accuracy of ultrasound diagnosis was determined by comparing pre-operative ultrasound to laparoscopy findings.198 women who underwent preoperative TVS and laparoscopy were included in the final analysis. At laparoscopy 126/198 (63.6%) women had evidence of pelvic endometriosis. 28/126 (22.8%) of them had endometriosis in a single location whilst the remaining 98/126 (77.2%) had endometriosis in two or more locations. Positive likelihood ratios (LR+) for the ultrasound diagnosis of ovarian endometriomas, moderate or severe ovarian adhesions, pouch of Douglas adhesions, and bladder deeply infiltrating endometriosis (DIE), recto-sigmoid colon DIE, rectovaginal DIE, uterovesical fold DIE and uterosacral ligament DIE were >10, whilst for pelvic side wall DIE and any ovarian adhesions the + LH was 8.421 and 9.81 respectively.The negative likelihood ratio (LR-) was: <0.1 for bladder DIE; 0.1-0.2 for ovarian endometriomas, moderate or severe ovarian adhesions, and pouch of Douglas adhesions; 0.5-1 for rectovaginal, uterovesical fold, pelvic side wall and uterosacral ligament DIE. The accuracy of TVS for the diagnosis of both total number of endometriotic lesions and DIE lesions significantly improved with increasing total number of lesions.Our study has shown that the TVS diagnosis of endometriotic lesion is very specific and false positive results are rare. Negative findings are less reliable and women with significant symptoms may still benefit from further investigation even if TVS findings are normal. The accuracy of ultrasound diagnosis is significantly affected by the location and number of endometriotic lesions.Role of color Doppler ultrasonography in the diagnosis of endometriotic cyst.We studied the role of color Doppler ultrasonography in the distinction between endometriomas and other adnexal masses. Three hundred and fifty-two ovarian lesions were studied, comparing sonographic diagnosis with pathologic findings. On color Doppler sonography, an endometriotic cyst usually appeared as a cystic lesion with diffuse internal echoes and low vascularization. The sensitivity and specificity of color Doppler transvaginal sonography in detecting endometriotic cysts were 91.8% and 95.3%, respectively. The positive and negative predictive values were 95.5% and 91.5%, respectively. In our experience, transvaginal sonography with color Doppler interrogation is a useful technique in the diagnosis of pathologic ovarian conditions, including cystic endometriosis.Endorectal ultrasound accuracy in the diagnosis of rectal endometriosis infiltration depth.To evaluate the accuracy of endorectal ultrasound examination to ascertain the deepest rectal layer involved in rectal endometriosis.Retrospective study.Department of obstetrics and gynecology at a university hospital in France.Women presenting with rectal endometriosis who had undergone rectal resection during a 22-month period.Endorectal ultrasonography.The predicted rectal infiltration depth by using endorectal examination was compared with histological findings. The level of agreement was evaluated by using the coefficients of concordance kappa and weighted kappa.Sixteen women were included in the study. Rectal resection was segmental in 14 cases and was limited in 2 cases. The agreement between 2 examinations was considered good in 9 cases (56%). Endorectal ultrasound overestimated the depth of infiltration in 5 cases and underestimated it in 2 cases. The coefficients of concordance kappa (95% confidence interval) and weighted kappa (95% confidence interval) were, respectively, 0.17 (0-0.34) and 0.22 (0.04-0.4), corresponding to poor concordance between the endorectal ultrasonography and histological examination.Accuracy in the prediction of rectal-layer involvement in endorectal ultrasonography appears to be limited. This information should not be considered sufficient when selecting the type of rectal-resection procedure.Evaluation of endometriosis in uterosacral ligaments by transrectal ultrasonography.Uterosacral ligaments are one of the common targets of pelvic endometriosis, which is usually clinically rather than surgically diagnosed. This study was performed to determine if uterosacral ligaments infiltrated by endometriosis could be detected by transrectal ultrasonography. Uterosacral ligaments in non-endometriosis subjects (n = 64) were observed as low echoic homogeneous arcs in both sides of the uterine cervix. Patients who had endometriosis (n = 29) on the ligaments showed thick and irregularly-shaped uterosacral ligaments by the transrectal ultrasound examination. The results also suggested that the thickness of uterosacral ligaments was associated with the clinical symptoms. Transrectal ultrasonography may provide quantitative information to manage patients with infiltrating endometriosis.Transrectal ultrasound and the diagnosis of rectovaginal endometriosis: a prospective observational study.Rectovaginal endometriosis is a severe form of pelvic endometriosis in which pharmacological treatment is relatively ineffective (Vercellini et al., Fertil Steril. 2005;84:1375-87). Laparoscopic surgical treatment is effective, but has the potential risks of bowel perforation and colostomy formation (Darai et al., Am J Obstet Gynecol. 2005;192:394-400). Transrectal ultrasound scanning can be applied as a preoperative tool to predict the presence of rectovaginal endometriosis and bowel wall involvement (Abrao et al., J Am Assoc Gynecol Laparosc. 2004;11:50-4).Thirty-two women underwent transrectal ultrasound followed by therapeutic laparoscopy. Likelihood ratios and post-test prevalences were calculated with Fagan's normogram. This was then extrapolated with the aid of a mathematical model to a low-risk population.A positive likelihood ratio was found to be 10.89 (95% confidence ratio (CI): 1.62-73.15) and a negative likelihood ratio was found to be 0.24 (95% CI: 0.1-0.57). The pre-test prevalence of rectovaginal endometriosis was 56%. The positive post-test prevalence probability was 93%, and the negative post-test prevalence probability was 23%.Preoperative transrectal ultrasound scanning for rectovaginal endometriosis is an extremely accurate predictive test, and strongly predicts the need for extensive laparoscopic dissection and potential bowel resection.Diagnosis of colorectal endometriosis: contribution of contrast enhanced MR-colonography.To investigate the contribution of contrast-enhanced MR-colonography (CE-MR-C) for the diagnosis of intestinal endometriosis.One hundred and four women with suspected endometriosis were prospectively enrolled. All patients were subjected to MRI consisting of two phases: pelvic high-resolution MRI (HR-MRI) followed by CE-MR-C after colonic distension using a 1.5-liter water enema and injection of 0.15 ml/kg of 0.5 M gadolinium-DTPA with T1w high-resolution isotropic volume (THRIVE) and balanced turbo field echo (BTFE) images. HR-MRI and CE-MR-C were considered as two datasets, which were independently reviewed by two radiologists with 12 and 2 years' experience respectively. The presence of deep pelvic endometriotic lesions with particular attention to colorectal involvement was recorded.MRI findings correlated with laparoscopy in all cases. Thanks to CE-MR-C images, sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and accuracy for diagnosis of colorectal endometriosis increased from 76%, 96%, 84%, 93% and 91%, to 95%, 97%, 91%, 99% and 97% for the most experienced radiologist and from 62%, 93%, 72%, 89% and 85%, to 86%, 94%, 82%, 96% and 92% for the less experienced radiologist; moreover, the interobserver agreement increased from 0.63 to 0.80 (Cohen's K test).CE-MR-C allows easier recognition of colorectal endometriosis and higher interobserver agreement.Multislice computed tomography with colon water distension (MSCT-c) in the study of intestinal and ureteral endometriosis.This study evaluates retrospectively the accuracy and reproducibility of multislice computed tomography with colon water distension (MSCT-c) in diagnosing bowel (BE) and ureteral (UE) endometriosis. Sixty-four patients underwent MSCT-c and videolaparoscopic surgery. Two radiologists reviewed MSCT-c examinations: sensitivity and specificity were calculated, considering histological exam as reference standard. In the BE cases, the degree of bowel wall infiltration was also assessed. Sensitivity and specificity for both readers were 100% and 97.6% for BE and 72.2% and 100% for UE; the interobserver agreement was excellent. The degree of bowel wall involvement was correctly defined in 90.9% of cases. MSCT-c is an accurate and reproducible technique but-considering the age of the patients-delivers a nonnegligible radiation dose.Ultrasound mapping system for the surgical management of deep infiltrating endometriosis.To assess the accuracy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) in defining size and location of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) with laparoscopic/histologic confirmation.Prospective observational study.University hospital.One hundred four women with suspected DIE on the basis of TVS.Patients with DIE underwent TVS evaluation before laparoscopic surgery. An accurate mapping of the extent of the disease was recorded during TVS and at laparoscopy. This new mapping system was developed to assess the extent of endometriosis by measuring the size and depth of the lesions at the various pelvic locations.Surgical and histologic confirmation of the ultrasonographic data to evaluate the presence and location of DIE and creation of a new mapping methodology for detecting DIE by TVS.Depending on the different location of the lesions, the accuracy of TVS ranged from 76%-97%. The lowest sensitivity (59%) and accuracy (76%) were obtained for TVS in the diagnosis of vaginal endometriosis, whereas the greatest accuracy (97%) was shown in detecting bladder lesions and Douglas obliteration.This new ultrasound mapping system is accurate for detecting the extent of DIE and may be useful for preoperative planning and intraoperative management of symptomatic patients with DIE.Diagnosis of pelvic adhesions in patients with endometrioma: the role of transvaginal ultrasonography.To estimate the diagnostic value of transvaginal ultrasonography in the detection of pelvic adhesions in women suspected of having endometriomas at ultrasonography.Prospective observational study.Academic Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology.One hundred thirteen women who underwent surgery for an endometrioma.All patients underwent transvaginal ultrasonography before surgery, and at ultrasonography the presence of fixation of the ovary to the uterus was considered characteristic of the presence of pelvic adhesions.Sensitivity, specificity, and likelihood ratios were calculated with 95% confidence intervals (CIs).The sensitivity and specificity of the fixation to the uterus of at least one ovary were respectively 89% (95% CI 84%-92%) and 90% (95% CI 76%-97%). The likelihood ratio for fixation of at least one ovary to the uterus was 8.92 (95% CI 3.04-26) and for a "normal" ultrasound examination 0.12 (95% CI 0.06-0.23). The pretest probability of pelvic adhesions was 74%, and this probability increased to 96% when fixation of at least one ovary to the uterus was present and fell to 27% when this ultrasonographic finding was absent.Transvaginal ultrasonography seems to be able to detect or exclude the presence of adhesions in women with ultrasonographic suspicion of endometrioma.[Double-contrast barium enema in the diagnosis of intestinal deeply infiltrating endometriosis].to evaluate the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value of double contrast barium enema (DCBE) for the diagnoses of rectum and sigmoid endometriosis.prospective transversal study including 37 patients with suspicion of deep endometriosis. Patients were submitted to DCBE, according to the standard technique described in the literature, and then, to laparoscopy. The results of laparoscopy and the DCBE images were interpreted and compared, based on the histological evaluation. Statistical analysis was done by association (chi2 test) and agreement analyses (Kappa's test).patients' average age was 35.8+/-4.4 years old (age group from 28 to 48 years), 85.6% of them being white and 14.4%, black women. Deep endometriosis was confirmed by laparoscopy and histological exam in all the studied patients. Intestinal endometriosis was confirmed by histological exam in 27 women (72.9%) of them. DCBE demonstrated suggestive radiologic signs of intestinal infiltration by endometriosis in 24 women (64.9%) and no signs in 13 women (35.1%). The method sensitivity was 67.5%, specificity 53.8%, positive predictive value, 77.8% and negative predictive value, 70%. Among the 24 abnormal exams, 16 (43.2%) presented radiologic speculum-type image, 16 (43.2%), an image compatible with stenosis, and four (10.8%), double contour.the DCBE presents high sensitivity and high positive predictive value, in the diagnosis of the rectum and sigmoid endometriosis. Radiologic images speculum and stenosis-type present high sensitivity and positive predictive value for the intestinal infiltration by endometriosis.Adnexal masses: comparison of specificity of endovaginal US and pelvic MR imaging.In a prospective study, 32 women with suspected pelvic masses at physical examination underwent both endovaginal ultrasound (US) and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging to compare their ability in diagnosis of adnexal masses. Criteria for the diagnosis of various types of adnexal masses with MR imaging and endovaginal US were prospectively defined, and the ability of either modality to allow a specific diagnosis was assessed. For each modality, measures of sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were obtained. Results indicated higher diagnostic capability of endovaginal US for simple cysts (five of five), hemorrhagic cysts (eight of nine), endometriomas (nine of 14), and ovarian carcinomas (three of three). MR imaging demonstrated higher diagnostic capability for dermoids (three of three). MR imaging and endovaginal US showed equal diagnostic capability for pedunculated fibroids (two of two). For all masses, observers, and observations, the overall sensitivity of endovaginal US was 76% versus 49% for MR imaging, and the overall accuracy of endovaginal US was 83% versus 70% for MR imaging. The authors suggest that endovaginal US is a better modality than MR imaging for the assessment of suspected pelvic masses.[Preoperative imaging of deeply infiltrating endometriosis in: Transvaginal sonography, rectal endoscopic sonography and magnetic resonance imaging].Compare the accuracy of transvaginal ultrasonography (TVUS), rectal endoscopic sonography (RES), and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) before deeply infiltrating endometriosis surgery.A retrospective study with 25 deeply endometriosis patients underwent the three imaging examinations before surgery. Calculation of sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy for the different locations: ovaries, uterosacral ligaments and torus, rectovaginal septum, rectosigmoid junction, bladder.Ovarian and deep pelvic endometriosis was found in surgery and confirmed by histology in all patients. Sensitivity and specificity are respectively: for ovaries: 88.2% and 71% of TVUS; 80% and 81.2% of RES; 87.5% and 71% of MRI. For uterosacral ligaments: 63% and 82,6% of TVUS; 37% and 100% of RES; 69% and 82.6% of MRI. For torus: 57.1% and 100% of TVUS; 76.2% and 100% of RES; 76.2% and 100% of MRI. For rectovaginal septum: 63.2% and 100% for TVUS; 89.5% and 66.7% of EER; 47.4% and 100% of MRI. For rectosigmoid junction: 73.7% and 66.7% of TVUS; 94.7% and 66.7% of RES; 89.5% and 50% of MRI. For bladder: 16.7% and 100% of TVUS; 16.7% and 100% of RES; 33.3% and 89.5% of MRI.We found that TVUS is the more performant for endometriomas, it is MRI for torus, uterosacral ligaments and little bladder lesions, RES for rectovaginal septum and rectosigmoid junction. So in the clinical practice, the three imaging examinations are complementary for the preoperative assessment of deeply endometriosis.Staging of pelvic endometriosis based on MRI findings versus laparoscopic classification according to the American Fertility Society.Preoperative staging of pelvic endometriosis helps the gynecologist plan therapy and offers a prognosis to patients. We compared a staging system of pelvic endometriosis based on magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) findings with the American Fertility Society (AFS) laparoscopic classification.Forty-four consecutive females with clinically suspected endometriosis underwent MRI examination to demonstrate the presence of endometriomas and pelvic implants. Laparoscopy was performed within 2 weeks. An MRI score was developed to classify endometriosis into four classes comparable to those of AFS laparoscopic staging. Concordance between MRI and laparoscopic classification was evaluated with kappa statistics.Laparoscopy confirmed 60 of 61 endometriomas detected by MRI. Implants were discovered in 20 of 44 patients with MRI and in 23 of 44 with laparoscopy. MRI detected 50 endometrial implants of 65 detected by laparoscopy (76.9%). With regard to endometriosis staging, we obtained a concordance between MRI and AFS classification in 42 of 44 patients (kappa = 0.913).Although MRI has limitations such as suboptimal depiction of small implants and adhesions, this technique is very useful to guide laparoscopy. Moreover, the optimal concordance (95%) between our proposed MRI staging and the AFS laparoscopic classification demonstrated a new advantage of MRI in preoperative staging of endometriosis.Is routine diagnostic laparoscopy for infertility still justified? A pilot study assessing the use of hysterosalpingo-contrast sonography and magnetic resonance imaging.We assessed the value of hysterosalpingo-contrast sonography (HyCoSy) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) as alternatives to laparoscopy and dye insufflation with or without hysteroscopy in the investigation of infertility. A total of 19 women had all three procedures, in addition, one became pregnant after HyCoSy alone. The findings were: uterine fibroids (n = 5), minimal-mild endometriosis (n = 4) and moderate-severe endometriosis (n = 3) including one case of bilateral endometriomas, endometrial polyp (n = 1), polycystic ovaries (n = 2), bilateral dermoid cysts (n = 1), haemorrhagic corpus luteal cyst (n = 1) and minimal adhesions (n = 3). At laparoscopy, 31/37 tubes were patent and there was 84% concordance with the tubal patency findings at HyCoSy. The uterine fibroids and ovarian cysts were detected using transvaginal scanning; the endometrial polyp and a congenital uterine anomaly were identified using HyCoSy. These findings were detected using MRI, but in addition the technique distinguished the dermoid cysts from the endometriomas, identified the two other cases of moderate-severe endometriosis, fibroids <2 cm (n = 2) and adenomyosis (n = 5), and interpreted the haemorrhagic corpus luteum as an endometrioma. Our data suggest that women with normal HyCoSy and MRI findings have a normal pelvis and may not need routine surgical investigation.Endometriosis detection by US with laparoscopic correlation.Endometriosis is a common cause of female infertility. It may affect as many as 40% of infertile women and may be the sole contributing factor to infertility in 15%. A study was undertaken to determine the usefulness of the routine pelvic ultrasound (US) examination in the detection of endometriosis by correlating pelvic US findings with laparoscopic findings in 85 patients who underwent both examinations. Forty-eight patients (56.5%) had no laparoscopic evidence of endometriosis, and 37 patients (43.6%) had endometriosis. Eight of the patients had abnormal sonograms; of these patients, only four had sonographic abnormalities that corresponded to laparoscopically identified endometriosis. Thus, US was successful in detecting endometriosis in only four (10.8%) of 37 patients. US is neither sensitive nor specific in diagnosing endometriosis. Furthermore, we believe that US does not have a significant role in the diagnosis or management of endometriosis in patients in whom a pelvic mass or other obvious pelvic abnormality is not suspected.Accuracy of rectal endoscopic ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of rectal involvement for patients presenting with deeply infiltrating endometriosis.To compare the accuracy of rectal endoscopic ultrasonography (REU) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) for predicting rectal wall involvement in patients presenting histologically proven deeply infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).This was a retrospective study of a continuous series of 81 patients presenting histologically proven DIE who underwent preoperative investigations using both REU and MRI. The sonographer and the radiologist, who were unaware of the clinical findings and patient history, but knew that DIE was suspected, were asked whether there was involvement of the digestive wall.Rectal DIE was confirmed histologically in 34 of the 81 (42%) patients. For the diagnosis of rectal involvement, sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive value for REU were 97.1%, 89.4%, 86.8% and 97.7% and for MRI they were 76.5%, 97.9%, 96.3% and 85.2%.The sensitivity and negative predictive value of REU were higher than those of MRI suggesting that REU performs better than MRI in the diagnosis of rectal involvement for patients presenting with DIE. Prospective studies with a large number of patients are needed in order to validate these preliminary results.Diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal sonography for deep pelvic endometriosis.To determine the accuracy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) for the diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis.In a prospective study, 142 women with clinical signs of endometriosis underwent TVS followed by surgical and histopathological investigations. The presence and extent of endometriosis involving the uterosacral ligaments, vagina, rectovaginal septum, intestines, bladder and ovaries shown by TVS were compared with surgical and histological findings. The sensitivity, specificity, predictive values and accuracy of TVS for predicting deep pelvic endometriosis were assessed.Ovarian and deep pelvic endometriosis were found by surgery and histology in respectively 83 (58.5%) and 79 (55.6%) of the 142 patients. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of TVS for the diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis were 78.5%, 95.2%, 95.4% and 77.9%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of TVS for endometriotic involvement of the uterosacral ligaments, vagina, rectovaginal septum and intestines were 70.6% and 95.9%, 29.4% and 100%, 28.6% and 99.3%, and 87.2% and 96.8%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of TVS for bladder involvement were 71.4% and 100%, respectively.TVS accurately diagnoses intestinal and bladder endometriosis, but is less accurate for uterosacral, vaginal and rectovaginal septum involvement.Transvaginal ultrasound and computed tomography combined with clinical parameters and CA-125 determinations in the differential diagnosis of persistent ovarian cysts in premenopausal women.The purpose of this prospective study was to compare the accuracy of computed tomography (CT) and transvaginal ultrasonography in the differential diagnosis of persistent cystic ovarian lesions. The candidates for this study were 161 premenopausal non-pregnant women with an adnexal mass. After a 3-month follow-up, 83 masses persisted and were examined by both techniques before surgery. We also evaluated the CA-125 plasma levels. The CT and ultrasonographic diagnoses were then compared with the histopathological diagnosis. The overall agreement between the test results and the actual outcome was calculated by means of the kappa statistic. Transvaginal ultrasonography has a closer accuracy in the diagnosis of serous cysts and serous cystadenoma, ovarian carcinoma and endometrioma (value of kappa: 0.78, 0.73 and 0.80, respectively) than CT, even if the latter is associated with clinical and biochemical parameters such as patient's age and CA-125 plasma levels. Only in the diagnosis of cystic teratoma, is transvaginal ultrasonography less accurate than CT. In conclusion, in premenopausal women, transvaginal ultrasonography remains a cost-effective method in the diagnosis of most cystic ovarian lesions.Sonographic assessment of non-malignant ovarian cysts: does sonohistology exist?Transvaginal ultrasound (TVU) is feasible and accurate in the differentiation between non-malignant and malignant ovarian abnormalities. However, despite the clinical relevance, the accuracy of TVU in the differentiation between the many different non-malignant cysts is unknown.Between 1992 and 2002, all women who had surgery at our centre because of a non-malignant ovarian cyst were included prospectively in this study. The sonographic characteristics as well as the expected histological diagnosis (the 'sonohistological diagnosis') were evaluated pre-operatively. This diagnosis was compared with the histopathological diagnosis, and diagnostic parameters [with 95% confidence interval (CI)] of the sonohistological diagnosis were calculated. Logistic models, with the sonographic characteristics as variables, were constructed for each histopathological diagnosis.A total of 406 women were included consecutively. The overall diagnostic accuracy of the sonohistological diagnosis was 60% (95% CI 0.56-0.65). Only in cases of simple ovarian cysts did the diagnostic accuracy of the respective logistic model exceed that of the sonohistological diagnosis (0.88 versus 0.81, P < 0.01). The diagnostic accuracy of the sonohistological diagnosis for endometriotic and dermoid ovarian cysts was significantly better compared with the respective logistic model (0.84 versus 0.71, P < 0.01 and 0.87 versus 0.82, P = 0.03, respectively).In approximately half of the non-malignant ovarian cysts, TVU is capable of distinguishing between the different histopathological diagnoses of non-malignant ovarian masses. Only in the diagnosis of simple ovarian cysts might use of the logistic models be helpful.Nodular endometriosis: dynamic MR imaging.In this study we aimed to investigate the value of contrast enhanced dynamic MR imaging (DMI) in the diagnosis of nodular abdominal endometriosis.Fourteen patients with surgically and pathologically proven endometriosis were examined with DMI. The patients were 22-54 years old (mean age 30.8 years). The dynamic MR studies of these patients were retrospectively reviewed by two radiologists who were aware of the clinical data. Nodular masses showing enhancement were evaluated for size, margins, and signal intensity on T1- and T2-weighted MR sequences. The protocol was tailored to selectively determine the diagnostic utility of signal intensity time course analysis for the behavior of nodular endometriosis and endometrial tissue, in DMI. Contrast-enhanced DMI was performed and the time-intensity curves of the lesions and the uterine endometrial tissue of each patient were compared. Mean enhancement values were calculated. Each DMI was evaluated for signal intensity value.In 8 (57%) of 14 patients, we found endometriosis in the abdominal wall. All patients with abdominal wall endometriosis had pelvic surgical operation history. Diameter of nodular endometriosis determined in the abdominus muscle ranged between 3 and 40 mm. Of eight cases, five had only one lesion and three had multiple lesions. Remaining 6 (43%) cases had deep pelvic endometriosis located in the uterosacral ligaments (n = 3), rectosigmoid (n = 2), and rectovaginal septum (n = 1). Diameter of pelvic endometriosis ranged between 9 and 53 mm. Noncontrast mean signal intensity of endometriosis and endometrial tissue were 280 +/- 73 and 216 +/- 20, respectively. The mean values of both endometriosis and normal endometrial tissue were calculated for each patient examined with five-slice DMI. All of the curves showed significant correlation. The lesion showed significant enhancement in the course of time similar to the endometrial tissue in all patients.Our study was inspired from the fact that endometriosis is the ectopic endometrial tissue and we thought that endometrial tissue and endometriomas should have similar vascularity. In this way imaging with MR, getting the time-intensity curves and experiencing the correlation between the endometriosis and endometrial tissue may support the diagnosis in the cases with suspected endometriosis. This first study shows that the ectopic nodular endometriosis can easily be identified with dynamic MRI. It may be used to differentiate nodular endometriosis from the other pathologic conditions of abdominal wall and pelvis.Comparison of transvaginal sonography and bimanual pelvic examination in patients with laparoscopically confirmed endometriosis.To determine the usefulness of noninvasive clinical tests to diagnose symptomatic endometriosis, we retrospectively reviewed the medical records of 91 patients with chronic pelvic pain and laparoscopically confirmed endometriosis. Thirty-seven women (41%) had pelvic peritoneal endometrial implants with adhesions; in 44 (48%) the ovaries were also affected, and in 10 (11%) the disease involved both the uterus and ovaries. Seventy-nine (87%) women had dysmenorrhea, dyspareunia, or both. Forty-three (47%) had a normal bimanual pelvic examination and 37 (41%) an unremarkable transvaginal sonographic evaluation (no significant difference). The women were divided into two groups: group 1, in whom the disease extended to the ovaries and uterus, and group 2, those in whom only peritoneal implants and adhesions were present. In group 1, 48 women (89%) had an abnormal ultrasonographic evaluation compared with only 4 (11%) in group 2 (p <0.001). Our findings indicate that bimanual pelvic examination and transvaginal sonography are equally accurate in detecting endometriosis; however, when the uterine surface and ovaries are involved, the latter is more informative. Therefore, patients with chronic pelvic pain, especially pain related to menstruation or coitus, should be evaluated laparoscopically to diagnose mild endometriosis adequately.The value of MRI in assessing parametrial involvement in endometriosis.What is the accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the diagnosis of parametrial endometriosis in comparison with surgicopathological findings?MRI displayed an accuracy of 96.4% in the preoperative diagnosis of parametrial involvement by deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).MRI is the best technique for preoperative mapping of DIE. This preliminary paper shows that T2-weighted MRI is a valuable tool for the preoperative evaluation of parametrial involvement by endometriosis.A retrospective study of an MRI database was used to identify examinations performed in women, who had a clinical suspicion of pelvic endometriosis (n=666), between 2005 and 2009 in a university medical centre in France.Exclusion criteria were previous surgery for DIE, incomplete surgical evaluation, repeat MRI examinations and incomplete MR protocol. Only symptomatic patients who underwent surgery with a pathological correlation were included (n=83). An experienced radiologist, blind to the surgical and histological findings, evaluated sagittal, axial and thin-section oblique axial MR images obtained from the 83 patients.Descriptive statistics and Fisher exact test were used.The prevalence of DIE and parametrial endometriosis was 76/83 (91.6%) and 12/83 (14.5%), respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, accuracy and positive and negative likelihood ratios for the diagnosis of parametrial endometriosis of low signal intensity on T2-weighted MRI, pelvic wall involvement and ureteral dilatation, were 83.3%, 98.6%, 90.9%, 97.2%, 96.4%, 59.2 and 0.17, 58.3%, 98.6%, 87.5%, 93.3%, 92.8%, 41.4 and 0.42 and 16.7%, 100%, 100%, 87.7%, 88%, infinity and 0.83, respectively, with the patient as the unit of analysis. BIAS AND LIMITATIONS: The study design was retrospective, and thus prone to bias. Only one experienced reader performed the analysis, so no data are available on intra- or interobserver variability. GENERALISABILITY: At present, no consensus exists on the optimal MR protocol to be used for the evaluation of DIE, thus limiting the wider implications of this study.No funding was obtained for this study. The authors have no conflict of interest.Ultrasound as a diagnostic aid in endometriosis.Transvaginal ultrasonography combined with water-contrast in the rectum in the diagnosis of rectovaginal endometriosis infiltrating the bowel.This prospective study evaluated the efficacy of transvaginal ultrasonography combined with water-contrast in the rectum (RWC-TVS) in the diagnosis of rectal infiltration in 35 women with rectovaginal endometriosis; ultrasonographic findings were compared with surgery and histology. The sensitivity of RWC-TVS in identifying rectal infiltration reaching at least the muscular layer was 100%, the specificity was 85.7%, the positive predictive value was 91.3%, and the negative predictive value was 100%. In 4 of 5 (80.0%) nodules reaching the submucosa, the depth of infiltration was underestimated by RWC-TVS. The RWC-TVS reliably determined the largest diameter of the endometriotic nodules and was well tolerated by the patients.Deep pelvic endometriosis: MR imaging for diagnosis and prediction of extension of disease.To prospectively evaluate the accuracy of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging for the preoperative diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis and extension of the disease.One hundred ninety-five patients (mean age, 34.2 years; range, 20-71 years) who were suspected of having pelvic endometriosis were recruited at two institutions. Two experienced radiologists evaluated the MR images independently. Deep pelvic endometriosis was defined as implants or tissue masses that appeared as hypointense areas and/or hyperintense foci on T1- or T2-weighted MR images in the following locations: torus uterinus, uterosacral ligaments (USLs), vagina, rectovaginal septum, rectosigmoid, and bladder. MR imaging results were compared with surgical and pathologic findings. Sensitivity, specificity, predictive values, and accuracy of MR imaging for prediction of deep pelvic endometriosis were assessed.Pelvic endometriosis was confirmed at pathologic examination in 163 (83.6%) of 195 patients. Endometriomas, peritoneal lesions, and deep pelvic endometriosis were diagnosed on the basis of surgical findings, alone or combined with pathologic findings, in 111 (68.1%), 83 (50.9%), and 103 (63.2%) of 163 patients, respectively. Torus uterinus and USL were the most frequent sites of deep pelvic endometriosis. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of MR imaging for deep pelvic endometriosis were 90.3% (93 of 103), 91% (84 of 92), 92.1% (93 of 101), 89% (84 of 94), and 90.8% (177 of 195), respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy, respectively, of MR imaging for the diagnosis of endometriosis in specific sites were as follows: USL, 76% (57 of 75), 83.3% (100 of 120), and 80.5% (157 of 195); vagina, 76% (16 of 21), 95.4% (166 of 174), and 93.3% (182 of 195); rectovaginal septum, 80% (eight of 10), 97.8% (181 of 185), and 96.9% (189 of 195); rectosigmoid, 88% (53 of 60), 97.8% (132 of 135), and 94.9% (185 of 195); and bladder, 88% (14 of 16), 98.9% (177 of 179), and 97.9% (191 of 195).MR imaging demonstrates high accuracy in prediction of deep pelvic endometriosis in specific locations.[Value of pelvic MRI in the preoperative diagnosis of endometriosis].To determine the value of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the pelvis in the preoperative diagnosis of endometriosis.Over a period of 8 months, preoperative MRI of the pelvis were obtained in 13 patients with suspected endometriosis (mean patient age 34.6 years; range 25 - 47 years).In 9 of 13 patients (69 %), the diagnosis of endometriosis was made by MRI and confirmed by laparoscopy in 8 cases. In 2 of 13 patients, endometriotic lesions were detectable by laparoscopy only. In the remaining 2 patients, no endometriosis was visible on MRI or by laparoscopy. MRI was able to visualize a total of 19 endometriotic lesions, with 14 (74 %) confirmed by histopathologic examination following laparoscopy. Five of these 19 lesions (26 %) visible on MRI were not seen by laparoscopy. Using laparoscopy and subsequent histopathologic examination, 27 endometriotic lesions were diagnosed, with 13 (48 %) not seen on the preoperative MRI.MRI and laparoscopy are complementary diagnostic tools that will best document the full extent of endometriosis when combined. MRI can visualize additional lesions inaccessible to laparoscopy. Thus, MRI of the pelvis should used preoperatively for surgical treatment planning.[Magnetic resonance imaging as a non-invasive detection tool for extraovarian endometriosis--own experience].Endometriosis--due to its high incidence, associated pain and infertility--constitutes an important problem in gynecological practice. The Polish Gynecological Society Expert Panel recommends to perform magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) prior to laparoscopy The purpose of this study is to present the usefulness of MRI in the diagnosis of extraovarian endometriosis on the basis of own experience.The material consisted of 35 patients, aged 15-52 (mean 36.5 years), who were diagnosed with extraovarian endometriosis on MRI. MR examinations were performed with 1.5 T scanners according to a routine protocol, which incorporates the LAVA sequence of dynamic contrast studies protocol because of thin sections.Extraovarian endometriosis was isolated in 24 patients (68.6%), while in 11 (31.4%) it coexisted with ovarian endometriomas. In 23 cases (65.7%) extraovarian endometriosis was found in one place, in 12 (34.3%)--in two or more locations. Endometriosis was found in the following locations: abdominal wall--11 cases (37.4%), uterine body--9 (25.7%), posterior vaginal fornix--7 (20%), wall of the rectum and sigmoid colon--5 (14.3%), pararectal space--5, uterine cervix--4 (11.4%), Douglas pouch--3 (8.6%), Fallopian tube--2 (5.7%), wall of the small intestine--1 (2.8%), and urinary bladder--1. Adhesions were observed in 28.6% of the patients.MRI is an important addition to the non-invasive diagnosis of extraovarian endometriosis and should be performed before treatment, especially surgical one. The inclusion of fat saturated T1 sequence from the dynamic contrast examination in the study protocol increases the likelihood of detecting small endometrial implants.Deeply infiltrating endometriosis: evaluation of retro-cervical space on MRI after vaginal opacification.To prospectively investigate diagnostic value and tolerability of MRI after intra-vaginal gel opacification for diagnosis and preoperative assessment of deeply infiltrating endometriosis.Sixty-three women with clinical suspicion of deeply infiltrating endometriosis were previously examined with trans-vaginal ultrasonography and then with MRI pre and post administration of vaginal gel. We evaluated the tolerability of this procedure with a scoring scale from 0 to 3. We also assessed with a score from 1 to 4 the visibility of four regions: Douglas-pouch, utero-sacral-ligaments, posterior-vaginal-fornix and recto-vaginal-septum. All patients underwent laparoscopic surgery after MRI.Five patients considered procedure intolerable. Visibility of utero-sacral-ligaments and posterior-vaginal-fornix showed to be increased with gel (p<0.001). In 57 out of 80 patients the MRI has allowed us to diagnose deeply infiltrating endometriosis. Overall, the percentages of MRI-sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were respectively 67.8%, 95.3%, 89.4 and 83.5% without gel, and 90.8%, 94.6%, 90.8% and 94.6% with gel; trans-vaginal ultrasonography sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 57.5%, 96.6%, 90.9% and 79.5%. In evaluation of utero-sacral-ligaments trans-vaginal ultrasonography, MRI without gel and with gel sensitivity was respectively 61.9%, 47.6% and 81%; for recto-vaginal-septum these values were 12.5%, 68.7% and 93.7%; for pouch of Douglas 82%, 87% and 97.4%; finally for posterior-vaginal-fornix 27.3%, 36.4% and 81.8%.MRI with gel opacification of vagina should be recommended for suspicion of deep infiltrating endometriosis, in particular for the added value in evaluation of recto-vaginal septum, utero-sacral ligaments and posterior vaginal fornix.Endorectal ultrasonography in predicting rectal wall infiltration in patients with deep pelvic endometriosis: a modern tool for an ancient disease.This study evaluated the validity of endorectal ultrasonography in predicting rectal infiltration in patients with deep pelvic endometriosis.Patients were recruited consecutively in the Department of Surgical Gynecology of Diaconesses Hospital from April 1996 to July 2003. Inclusion criteria were the suspicion of deep pelvic endometriosis on the basis of outpatient history and/or clinical symptoms with a mass palpable on bimanual examination that might infiltrate the rectal wall. There were no exclusion criteria. Endorectal ultrasonography was performed by the same investigator with a 7.5-MHz to 10-MHz rigid probe, producing a 360 degrees view of the rectal wall and adjacent areas. We used surgical and histopathologic findings as the "gold standard" to evaluate the validity of endorectal ultrasonography.This study was based on 37 patients (mean age, 35.8 (range, 26-46) years) who underwent surgery. The time between endorectal ultrasonography and surgery ranged from 4 to 529 (mean, 88.7) days. Eight patients had endometriosis nodules penetrating the rectal wall. Endorectal ultrasonography showed sensitivity, specificity, a positive predictive value, and a negative predictive value of 87.5, 97, 87.5, and 97 percent, respectively, in the diagnosis of infiltration of the rectal wall by endometriosis.Endorectal ultrasonography is a reliable technique for visualizing rectal infiltration in patients with deep pelvic endometriosis. It should be more widely used by gynecologists because knowing about rectal infiltration before surgery is fundamental to defining the best possible surgical approach.Comparison of diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal ultrasound with laparoscopy in the management of patients with adnexal masses.The aims of this study was (a) to compare the diagnostic accuracy of ultrasound examination with laparoscopic findings and both with the gold standard (histology) in the management of benign ovarian lesions, and (b) to assess the feasibility of laparoscopy in their diagnosis and management.Prospective, comparative study (Canadian Task Force Classification II-2). A total of 117 women 15-59 years old were examined at outpatient department and had transvaginal ultrasound assessment. Ninety-eight women (three postmenopausal) with 105 cystic ovarian lesions met inclusion criteria and underwent operative laparoscopy. Histology was performed in all cases.Although laparoscopy showed an overall higher performance compared to transvaginal ultrasound, statistically significant difference was found only in the detection of endometriomas compared to ultrasound (P = 0.004 for sensitivity and P = 0.046 for specificity).Laparoscopy exhibits higher diagnostic accuracy, especially in endometriomas, compared to transvaginal scan. Laparoscopic diagnosis appears to be safe and accurate. Conservative laparoscopic management of benign adnexal masses is safe and with low morbidity.Deep infiltrating endometriosis of the bowel: MR imaging as a method to predict muscular invasion.To evaluate magnetic resonance (MR) imaging morphologic- and signal intensity abnormalities of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) of the bowel wall and to assess its value in predicting depth and extent of bowel wall infiltration.This single-center study was performed in a tertiary referral center for endometriosis. All patients (n = 28) who underwent segmental bowel resection (2004-2010) were retrospectively studied. MR images were analyzed by two experienced readers independently (number of lesions, location, size, signal intensity, and depth of bowel wall infiltration) and this was correlated with histopathology.The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy for diagnosis of endometriosis infiltrating the muscular layer of the bowel were 100%, 75%, 96%, 100%, and 96%, respectively. The inter-rater agreement was 0.84. "Fan shaped" configurations with hypointensity on T2- and T1-weighted imaging were characteristic for thickening of indigenous smooth muscle and smooth muscle hyperplasia at histopathology, as a consequence of infiltration by endometriosis. Thickening of the (sub)mucosa corresponded to edema with or without infiltration of endometriosis.MR imaging at 1.5 Tesla is useful to predict muscular infiltration of the bowel in endometriosis, whereas it is of limited value in diagnosis of (sub)mucosal infiltration.Deep pelvic endometriosis: limited additional diagnostic value of postcontrast in comparison with conventional MR images.To determine the value of postcontrast MR imaging (MRI) in cases of suspected pelvic endometriosis by assessing interobserver variability of MR imaging according to the endometriotic locations.This retrospective study included 158 patients with clinical suspicion of endometriosis who had undergone surgery after MRI between January 2004 and April 2009. Three radiologists with different degrees of experience were independently asked to determine the presence of rectosigmoid colon, vaginal, and bladder endometriosis using both conventional and a combination of conventional and postcontrast MRI. Descriptive analysis, ROC analysis and interobserver agreements (kappa values) were calculated.Rectosigmoid colon, vaginal, and bladder endometriosis was present in 65, 39 and eight patients, respectively. The accuracy of conventional assessment for readers 1, 2, and 3 for rectosigmoid colon, vaginal and bladder endometriosis was 77.2%, 74.1% and 96.8%, and 73.4%, 76.6% and 98.7%, and 86.1%, 88.6% and 99.4%, respectively. The accuracy of conventional and postcontrast MR images for readers 1, 2, and 3 for rectosigmoid colon, vaginal and bladder endometriosis was 77.8%, 78.5% and 98.1%, and 83.5%, 83.5% and 99.4%, and 87.3%, 89.2% and 99.4%, respectively.Interobserver variability of MRI using conventional MRI alone is excellent for the diagnosis of DPE. No significant benefit of intravenous gadolinium, rectal or vaginal administration has been demonstrated.Efficacy of hysterosalpingography in evaluating endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common disease in young women being evaluated for infertility. Although endometriosis may cause tubal abnormalities on hysterosalpingography, efficacy of radiographic evaluation in this disease is not clear. We reviewed the radiographic and laparoscopic examinations in 50 women being studied for infertility. Laparoscopy was normal in 15 women and showed endometriosis in 35 patients. Endometriosis was staged at laparoscopy using the classification of the American Fertility Society. Radiographic examinations were reviewed blindly and tubal status noted in each patient. Criteria for tubal abnormality included incomplete or absent filling and ampullary dilatation or convolution. Radiographic efficacy was determined by correlating the tubal appearance to the severity and location of endometriosis. A total of 98 tubes were correlated but only 10 (10%) were felt to be involved by endometriosis based on laparoscopic findings. Radiologic sensitivity was 40% (4 of 10) and specificity was 83% (73 of 88). Positive predictive value was 21% (4 of 19) due to 15 false-positive diagnoses in tubes uninvolved by endometriosis. In conclusion, endometriosis, regardless of its severity, rarely causes radiographic abnormalities on hysterosalpingography because of the location of disease in the pelvis.Accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging and rectal endoscopic sonography for the prediction of location of deep pelvic endometriosis.We compared the accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and rectal endoscopic sonography (RES) for the diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis (DPE), with respect to surgical and histological findings.Longitudinal study of 88 consecutive patients referred for surgical management of DPE, who underwent both MRI and RES pre operatively. The diagnostic criteria were identical for MRI and RES and were based on visualization of hypointense/hypoechoic areas in specific locations. DPE was diagnosed when at least one site was involved. We calculated the sensitivity, specificity, predictive values, accuracy and 95% confidence interval of MRI and RES for DPE.DPE and endometriomas were present in 97.7 and 39.7% of women, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of MRI and RES, respectively, were 84.8 and 45.6%, 88.8 and 40%, 98.5 and 87.8% and 40 and 8.5% for uterosacral endometriosis; 77.7 and 7.4%, 70% and 100, 85.3 and 100% and 89.7 and 70.9% for vaginal endometriosis and 88.3 and 90%, 92.8 and 89.3%, 96.4 and 94.7% and 78.8 and 80.6% for colorectal endometriosis.MRI is more accurate than RES for the diagnosis of uterosacral and vaginal endometriosis, whereas the two methods are similarly accurate for colorectal endometriosis.[Diagnostic value of transvaginal ultrasound in the detection of ovarian endometriosis].The aim of the study was to estimate of efficiency of endovaginal ultrasonography in diagnosis of ovarian endometriosis. The study was performed in 59 women with ovarian tumors. Ultrasound examinations were performed with Aloka 2000 using 5.0 MHz transducers. The endovaginal ultrasonography is very useful in diagnosis of ovarian endometriosis, showing sensitivity--90%, specificity--68%, positive predictive value--75%, negative predictive value--86%. Ultrasound examination is an important tool in noninvasive diagnostic procedure of adnexal pathology.Anatomic significance of a positive barium enema in deep infiltrating endometriosis of the large bowel.The anatomopathological significance of a positive double-contrast barium enema (DCBE) for suspicion of deep infiltrating endometriosis of the large bowel was studied. This is a retrospective study of a prospective database.A large-bowel resection was proposed for patients who were suspicious for large-bowel endometriosis and had a positive DCBE. In a series of 73 patients, 71 large-bowel resections were performed. Histology and immunohistochemistry with the monoclonal antibody CD-10 were performed on the resection specimen. Outcome measures were the length of the resected specimen, the largest diameter of the lesion, the positivity of the resection margins, and the degree of infiltration of the large bowel. We also compared the mean largest diameters of the lesions with the degree of infiltration of the large bowel.Between December 1997 and October 2005, 80 patients were suspicious for large-bowel endometriosis: 73 (91%) had positive DCBEs, and 7 (9%) had negative DCBEs. Of the 73 with positive DCBEs, 4 (5%) refused digestive resection and 1 (1.4%) was excluded. Three patients underwent two large-bowel resections because of the presence of bifocal lesions (left and right colon). A total of 71 resections were performed. In case of positive DCBE, the perivisceral fat and the whole muscularis were infiltrated in 100% of cases. The infiltration reached the submucosa and the mucosa respectively in 82% and 18% of cases. A total of 9.9% of resection margins were positive at histology but only focally. The mean largest diameter of the lesions infiltrating the whole thickness of the large bowel was not statistically different from the mean largest diameter of more superficial lesions.Findings of mass effect with indentations and ridging of the mucosa on DCBE in a setting suspicious for large-bowel endometriosis correspond well with pathologic findings of deep infiltration of the large-bowel wall. Clinicians dealing with deep infiltrating endometriosis should be aware of these findings, which could influence their choice of surgical treatment.The use of ultrasound-based 'soft markers' for the prediction of pelvic pathology in women with chronic pelvic pain--can we reduce the need for laparoscopy?To assess the accuracy of new transvaginal ultrasound-scan-based markers and to compare them to conventional ultrasound methods used in the detection of common pelvic pathology in women with chronic pelvic pain (CPP).A prospective observational study.Teaching hospital.A total of 120 consecutive women with CPP undergoing transvaginal ultrasonography before either diagnostic or operative laparoscopy.Anatomical abnormalities, e.g. endometrioma or hydrosalpinx (hard markers), were documented. The woman was then assessed for the presence or absence of 'soft markers' (reduced ovarian mobility and site-specific pelvic tenderness).Presence or absence of pelvic pathology noted during laparoscopy.Seventy women had pelvic pathology, of whom 51 had endometriosis alone, 7 both endometriosis and pelvic adhesions, 6 pelvic adhesions, 1 hydrosalpinx with endometriosis and 5 hydrosalpinx and pelvic adhesions. The likelihood ratio for the hard markers was infinity (specificity was 100%), for the soft makers 1.9 (95% CI 1.2-3.1) and for a 'normal' ultrasound 0.18 (0.09-0.34). The pre-test probability of pelvic disease in our population of women with CPP was 58%, and this probability of disease was raised to 100% with the presence of hard markers and to 73% with the presence of soft markers. The pre-test probability of 58% fell to 20% when ultrasound finding was found to be normal.This new approach improves the detection and exclusion of significant pathology in women with CPP and may lead to a reduction in the number of unnecessary laparoscopies carried out on women with CPP.The potential value of magnetic resonance imaging in infertility.The potential value of magnetic resonance imaging as a diagnostic tool in infertility was investigated. Twenty-six women with primary or secondary infertility and symptoms of dysmenorrhoea or menorrhagia were studied prospectively using conventional T1- and T2-weighted spin-echo techniques. Positive diagnoses were obtained in 20 of 26 (76.9%) patients. Of these, 18 (69.2%) had lesions likely to be significantly contributing to infertility. Adenomyosis was detected in 14 patients (53.8%) with 11 showing the diffuse pattern while three had discrete adenomyomas. Cystic lesions typical of endometriosis were detected in seven patients (26.9%), four of these also had evidence of adenomyosis. The endometriotic lesions were also seen at laparoscopy in each case. Five patients (19.2%) had leiomyomas, one in a patient with adenomyosis and endometriosis and one in a patient with endometriosis alone. Only one patient had submucous leiomyomas causing significant distortion of the endometrial mucosa likely to affect fertility. Magnetic resonance imaging is valuable in the investigation of unexplained infertility where it provides a high diagnostic yield particularly if uterine pathology is suspected.Scoring system for prediction of ovarian endometriosis based on transvaginal color and pulsed Doppler sonography.To develop a new noninvasive scoring system using clinical signs and symptoms, CA-125 levels, sonographic findings, and transvaginal color and pulsed Doppler parameters for preoperative recognition of ovarian endometriosis.A 5-year prospective study in patients undergoing laparotomy and laparoscopy.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, University of Zagreb, Sveti Duh Hospital, Zagreb, Croatia.Six hundred fifty-six benign and malignant adnexal masses, among which 103 were surgically proved to be ovarian endometriosis.All patients undergoing laparotomy and laparoscopy were examined by transvaginal ultrasonography with color Doppler imaging. Serum levels of CA-125 were measured the day before surgery.The total score was applied in all patients with adnexal masses.The scoring system proved to be very useful in distinguishing ovarian endometriosis from other benign and malignant ovarian lesions, with a sensitivity of 99.02% and a specificity of 99.64%, compared with morphological scoring system's sensitivity of 83.91% and specificity of 97.12%.The new noninvasive scoring system improves significantly the ability to discriminate between endometriosis and other benign and malignant ovarian entities.A logistic model for the prediction of endometriosis.To develop a model that uses individual and lesion characteristics to help surgeons choose lesions that have a high probability of containing histologically confirmed endometriosis.Secondary analysis of prospectively collected information.Government research hospital in the United States.Healthy women 18-45 years of age, with chronic pelvic pain and possible endometriosis, who were enrolled in a clinical trial.All participants underwent laparoscopy, and information was collected on all visible lesions. Lesion data were randomly allocated to a training and test data set.Predictive logistic regression, with the outcome of interest being histologic diagnosis of endometriosis.After validation, the model was applied to the complete data set, with a sensitivity of 88.4% and specificity of 24.6%. The positive predictive value was 69.2%, and the negative predictive value was 53.3%, equating to correct classification of a lesion of 66.5%. Mixed color; larger width; and location in the ovarian fossa, colon, or appendix were most strongly associated with the presence of endometriosis.This model identified characteristics that indicate high and low probabilities of biopsy-proven endometriosis. It is useful as a guide in choosing appropriate lesions for biopsy, but the improvement using the model is not great enough to replace histologic confirmation of endometriosis.Role of EUS and EUS-guided FNA in the diagnosis of symptomatic rectosigmoid endometriosis.Rectosigmoid endometriosis is an underrecognized cause of GI symptoms in women. Pelvic magnetic resonance imaging and CT have a low sensitivity in making this diagnosis. The role of EUS and EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) in the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis in symptomatic patients is not well studied.A review of medical records identified 5 women who were diagnosed with rectosigmoid endometriosis by EUS and EUS-FNA over a period of 1 year.Five women with nonspecific GI complaints underwent EUS examination of a rectosigmoid subepithelial mass found on colonoscopy. EUS revealed a hypoechoic lesion infiltrating the muscularis propria and the serosa of the rectal wall, and extending outside the rectal wall, findings consistent with rectosigmoid endometriosis. This diagnosis was confirmed by EUS-FNA, surgical exploration, and/or the patient's clinical course.EUS and EUS-FNA are noninvasive, sensitive techniques for the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis in symptomatic patients.The role of endovaginal ultrasound in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian cysts.Endometriomas have a prevalence of 24% among all ovarian cysts. Various sonographic features have been proposed to identify endometriomas. Although the visualization of ovarian masses with low-level internal echoes is suggestive for the endometriotic origin of the cyst, no data are yet available on the specificity of endovaginal ultrasonography in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian masses. To address this issue, the sensitivity, specificity, negative and positive predictive values of endovaginal ultrasonography in comparison with pathology were calculated for each visualized cyst. The study population (n = 251) consisted of all premenopausal non pregnant women submitted to laparotomy or laparoscopy between May 1991 and March 1993 at the Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology of the University of Cagliari. Within one week before surgery, all patients underwent endovaginal ultrasonography and 93 ovarian cysts were visualized. After the scan, the physician gave prospective impressions as to the presence of endometriomas using the visualization of round-shaped homogeneous hypoechoic "tissue" of low-level echoes within the ovary as characteristic ultrasonographic finding. Ultrasonographic impression was compared with histopathological diagnosis. Out of 93 adnexal masses detected by ultrasound, 31 were suspected to be endometriomas and the diagnosis was confirmed in 24. The sensitivity and the specificity of endovaginal ultrasonography in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian cysts were 83% and 89%, respectively. This specificity (89%) is comparable with that obtainable with magnetic resonance imaging (91%).Double-contrast enema in pelvic endometriosis.The radiographic findings on barium enema in 42 patients with endometriosis were reviewed and correlated with those at surgical and laparoscopic examination. Radiographic abnormalities were detected in 27 patients. In nine patients, purely extrinsic mass effect was identified; bowel wall involvement in these patients was not present at laparoscopy. In 16 of 18 patients subsequently shown to have bowel wall involvement, mass effect with fine mucosal crenulation was identified. Annular or polypoid involvement was also noted. Mass effect with crenulation, although not entirely specific, appears to be a characteristic finding in patients with bowel wall involvement due to endometriosis.Adding cancer antigen 125 screening to gray scale sonography for predicting specific diagnosis of benign adnexal masses in premenopausal women: is it worthwhile?The purpose of this study was to assess whether a single determination of the serum cancer antigen 125 (CA-125) level provides additional information to sonography for specific diagnosis of benign adnexal masses in premenopausal women.We conducted a retrospective study comprising 1058 premenopausal women (mean age, 34.8 years) with histologically proven benign adnexal masses. All women had undergone transvaginal sonography and serum CA-125 determination within 1 week before surgery and tumor removal. According to "pattern recognition" analysis, a presumptive diagnosis was provided on gray scale transvaginal sonography for all masses. Positive and negative likelihood ratios were calculated for gray scale sonography and gray scale sonography plus CA-125.Eighty-five women had bilateral masses (1143 masses analyzed). In 7 women with bilateral masses, the histologic diagnoses of the masses were discordant and were excluded. Histologic diagnoses were as follows: endometrioma, n = 452; dermoid cyst, n = 180; serous cyst, n = 158; hemorrhagic cyst, n = 119; mucinous cyst, n = 54; hydrosalpinx, n = 37; and other, n = 109. The median CA-125 level was significantly higher in endometrioma (71.9 IU/mL; range: 5-2620 IU/mL) and hydrosalpinx (59.2 IU/mL; range, 5-601 IU/mL) compared to all other tumor types (P < .001). The CA-125 level was 35 IU/mL or higher in 74% of endometriomas, 58% of hydrosalpinges, 34% of hemorrhagic cysts, 18% of mucinous cysts, 14% of dermoid cysts, and 8% of serous cysts. The positive and negative likelihood ratios for sonography and sonography plus CA-125 (335 IU/mL) for each kind of tumor were not statistically different except for endometrioma, for which the positive likelihood ratio for sonography plus CA-125 (55.0; 95% confidence interval, 27.5-109.9) was significantly higher than for sonography alone (19.2; 95% confidence interval, 13.6-27.1).Cancer antigen 125 screening does not add useful information for specific diagnosis of benign adnexal tumors, except for endometrioma. An elevated CA-125 level significantly increases the probability of such a lesion.Bowel endometriosis: preoperative diagnostic accuracy of 3.0-T MR enterography--initial results.To prospectively determine the accuracy of 3.0-T magnetic resonance (MR) enterography in the preoperative assessment of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) lesions located in the bowel above the rectosigmoid junction.Institutional review board approval for this study was obtained, and each patient gave written informed consent. Over 18 months, patients with known pelvic DIE who were scheduled for surgery were recruited. Consecutive patients suspected of having bowel endometriosis above the rectosigmoid junction underwent 3.0-T MR enterography. Two blinded readers independently performed a systematic analysis of nine bowel segments above the rectosigmoid junction. MR images were compared with surgical and pathologic findings. Efficacy parameters were calculated with 95% confidence intervals (CIs). Interobserver agreement was assessed with κ statistics.Among the 43 patients enrolled in this study, 33 underwent surgery and were included in the final analyses. Sixteen (48%) patients had bowel DIE lesions located above the rectosigmoid junction at surgery and histopathologic examination. Twenty-six lesions were analyzed, including four ileal, two ileocecal, three cecal, three appendicular, and 14 sigmoid colon lesions. For the diagnosis of these lesions, MR imaging showed sensitivities of 92% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 81.7, 100) for reader 1 and 96% (95% CI: 87.1, 100) for reader 2 and specificities of 100% (95% CI: 98.8, 100) for both readers. The κ value was 0.97.These results show 3.0-T MR enterography is accurate in the preoperative diagnosis and mapping of bowel DIE lesions located above the rectosigmoid junction. Online supplemental material is available for this article.[MR imaging features of deep pelvic endometriosis: correlation with laparoscopy].Deep pelvic endometriosis is an invalidating disorder affecting the retrocervical region, rectosigmoid colon and urinary bladder generally requiring surgical management. MRI is the preoperative imaging modality of choice. The purpose of this paper is to describe the MR imaging features of deep pelvic endometriosis with laparoscopic correlation.Thirty-five patients with clinical suspicion of deep pelvic endometriosis underwent pelvic MRI. Results of MRI, including morphological and signal characteristics features of the lesions were compared to laparoscopic fidings.Laparoscopy detected lesions of deep pelvic endometriosis of the uterosacral ligaments (n=10), torus uterinum (n=9), rectosigmoid (n=11), Douglas pouch (n=9), recto-vaginal septum (n=6), bladder (n=4) and posterior vaginal cul-de-sac (n=2). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of MRI were assessed for each localization.MRI allows diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis of the bladder, rectosigmoid and Douglas pouch and with lower sensitivity for lesions of the uterosacral ligaments, posterior vaginal cul-de-sac and rectovaginal septum.Transvaginal sonography and rectal endoscopic sonography for the assessment of pelvic endometriosis: a preliminary comparison.Endometriosis and possible rectal involvement are difficult to assess by physical examination. Previous studies have shown the diagnostic value of magnetic resonance imaging and rectal endoscopic sonography (RES) in this setting, but not that of transvaginal sonography (TVS). The aims of this study were to compare the accuracy of TVS and RES for the diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis, and to compare the results with histological findings.In a prospective study, 30 consecutive patients referred with clinical signs of endometriosis underwent TVS and RES; the images were interpreted blindly with regard to physical findings.Endometriosis was confirmed histologically in 28 (93%) of the 30 patients. Endometriomas were also present in 67% of cases. For the diagnosis of uterosacral endometriosis, the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of TVS and RES were 75 and 75%, 83 and 67, 95 and 90%, and 45 and 40% respectively. For the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis, the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of TVS and RES were 95 and 82%, 100 and 88%, 100 and 95%, and 89 and 64% respectively.Despite the large proportion of our patients who had intestinal endometriosis, representing a possible source of bias, our results suggest that TVS is as efficient as RES for detecting posterior pelvic endometriosis and should therefore be used as the first-line examination.Endometriomas: diagnostic performance of US.To determine the diagnostic performance of specific ultrasonographic (US) features in discriminating endometriomas from other adnexal masses.Two sonologists independently reviewed the sonograms of 252 adnexal masses in 226 women and recorded US features by using a standardized checklist. The diagnostic performance of specific US features and overall reviewer impression in discriminating endometriomas from other adnexal masses were evaluated.There were 40 endometriomas. Diffuse low-level internal echoes were present in 38 (95%) endometriomas and 40 (19%) nonendometriomas (positive likelihood ratio, 5). The positive likelihood ratio for the diagnosis of endometrioma increased to 8 if masses with neoplastic features at gray-scale US were excluded, allowing identification of 30 endometriomas (75%). The presence of multilocularity or hyperechoic wall foci further increased the positive likelihood ratio to 48, allowing the identification of 18 endometriomas (45%).An adnexal mass with diffuse low-level internal echoes and absence of particular neoplastic features is highly likely to be an endometrioma if multilocularity or hyperechoic wall foci are present. A patient with a mass with diffuse low-level internal echoes and other US features may benefit from additional imaging.Can rectal endoscopic sonography be used to predict infiltration depth in patients with deep infiltrating endometriosis of the rectum?To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of rectal endoscopic sonography (RES) in the prediction of the infiltration depth of rectal endometriosis and to ascertain whether RES could be used to choose between segmental bowel resection and a more conservative approach, such as shaving or discoid resection.In this retrospective study, 38 consecutive patients with symptomatic deep infiltrating endometriosis of the rectum who underwent laparoscopic colorectal resection were included. RES results for infiltration depth of rectal endometriosis were compared with results of pathological examination. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV, respectively), positive and negative likelihood ratios (LRs) and test accuracy were calculated for the presence of infiltration of the muscularis layers and submucosal/mucosal layers, as demonstrated by RES and confirmed by histopathological analysis.For the detection of muscularis layer infiltration by endometriosis, the PPV of RES was 100%, whereas for the detection of submucosal/mucosal layer involvement, the sensitivity was 89%, specificity was 26%, PPV was 55%, NPV was 71%, test accuracy was 58% and positive and negative LRs were 1.21 and 0.40, respectively.RES is a valuable tool for detecting rectal endometriosis as endometriotic infiltration of the muscularis layer can be predicted accurately. However, RES is less accurate in detecting submucosal/mucosal layer involvement and cannot, therefore, be used to choose between bowel resection and a more conservative approach.Magnetic resonance imaging in the evaluation of (deep infiltrating) endometriosis: the value of diffusion-weighted imaging.To assess the value of magnetic resonance (MR)diffusion-weighted imaging (DWI) in the evaluation of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).In a prospective single-center study, DWI was added to the standard MRI protocol in 56 consecutive patients with known or suspected endometriosis. Endometriotic lesions as well as (functional) ovarian cysts were analyzed for location, size, and signal intensity on T1, T2, and DWI. Apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) values were calculated using b-values of 50, 400, 800,and 1200 s/mm(2). Statistical analysis included the Spearman correlation coefficient, Mann-Whitney U, and Kruskal-Wallis tests.A total of 110 lesions (62 endometrial cysts and 48 DIE) were detected, 60 of which were large enough to analyze. Mean ADC values of endometrial cysts and functional ovarian cysts were 1.10 x 10(-3)/mm(2)/s and 2.14 x 10(-3)/mm(2)/s, respectively. Mean ADC values of DIE retrocervical, infiltrating the colon, and bladder were 0.70 x 10(-3)/mm(2)/s, 0.77 x 10(-3)/mm(2)/s, and 0.79 x 10(-3)/mm(2)/s, respectively. ADC values of DIE did not show a significant difference between varying pelvic locations (P = 0.63).Results of our study suggest that ADC values of DIE are consistently low, without significant difference between pelvic locations.Transvaginal ultrasonography of rectosigmoid endometriosis: interobserver variation of lesion size.This study evaluates the interobserver variation of transvaginal ultrasonographic measurements of the size of deep infiltrating endometriosis lesions in the rectosigmoid wall performed by an experienced and a less experienced sonographer. Fifteen outpatient women were seen for a gynecologic examination and 24 women were seen with rectosigmoid endometriosis. Transvaginal ultrasonography was performed independently by two observers with a focus on the presence and size of rectosigmoid endometriosis. The senior observer had several years of experience, whereas the junior observer was a medical student with no prior experience in transvaginal ultrasonography. The findings of the two observers were identical concerning the identification of rectosigmoid endometriosis. The probability of differences in size within 30% of the mean was 0.81, 0.63 and 0.61 for length, width and depth, respectively. Our data suggest that fair skills in this technique can be acquired by inexperienced examiners within a short period of time.Barium enema evaluation of colonic involvement in endometriosis.The purpose of our study was to define the role of double-contrast barium enema (DCBE) compared with laparoscopy in the diagnosis and local staging of intestinal endometriosis.A search of our radiology database revealed the cases of 234 women who underwent surgical resection for pelvic endometriosis with associated intestinal surgery for intestinal endometriosis. We retrospectively evaluated all preoperative DCBE images for the presence of bowel endometriosis and the number, site (rectum, sigmoid, cecum), and size of the lesions. The radiographic findings at DCBE were retrospectively correlated with those at surgical pathologic examination.DCBE revealed 211 intestinal lesions of bowel endometriosis in 168 (71.8%) of 234 patients with pelvic endometriosis clinically enrolled. Forty (23.8%) of the 168 women had more than one endometriotic bowel nodule (two nodules in 37 cases, three in three cases). Laparoscopy revealed 233 intestinal lesions in 174 (74.3%) of the patients. Fifty-four (31.0%) of 174 women had more than one endometriotic bowel nodule (two nodules in 49 cases, three in five cases). There was 100% correlation between the DCBE and histologic findings as far as site and size of the lesions were concerned. DCBE had a sensitivity of 88.4%, specificity of 93.0%, positive predictive value of 97.5%, negative predictive of 71.0%, and accuracy of 89.5% in the identification of bowel endometriosis.DCBE is helpful in discerning bowel wall involvement in endometriosis, enabling proper surgical planning. DCBE also appears to have a role in the management of endometriosis.The usefulness of computed tomographic colonography for evaluation of deep infiltrating endometriosis: comparison with magnetic resonance imaging.We wanted to assess the diagnostic value and morphologic feature of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE), involving rectosigmoid colon, with computed tomography (CT) colonography in comparison with magnetic resonance (MR).Fifty patients with DIE, who had undergone CT colonography and MR imaging (MRI) before surgery, were enrolled. Among these 50 patients who underwent laparoscopic surgery with DIE, 37 patients were diagnosed as rectosigmoid involvement of endometriosis (presence of rectal outer wall involvement, endometrial implantation in the rectouterine space, and complete obliteration of cul-de-sac with histologic confirmation). Image findings at CT colonography and MRI were reviewed by 2 radiologists to determine whether there are radiologic features that can help predict rectosigmoid endometriosis. Computed tomography images were analyzed for the luminal alteration of rectosigmoid colon, mural thickening, and mass formation in the rectosigmoid colon, whereas MR images were analyzed for the mass formation in the rectosigmoid colon, fat plane obliteration, between rectum and uterus or vagina, retroversion of uterus, retraction of uterus toward the colon, and detection of endometrial spot in rectovaginal or rectouterine space. Statistical analysis was performed with Pearson χ and receiver operating characteristic curve.With CT colonography, the luminal alteration of rectosigmoid colon was detected with sensitivity of 96.0% and specificity of 48.0% (P < 0.001) in the overall rectosigmoid endometriosis and with sensitivity of 84.0% and specificity of 80.0% (P = 0.005) in the case of DIE with cul-de-sac obliteration. With MR, the sensitivity and specificity for detection of endometriosis of rectosigmoid or rectouterine space were 94.4% and 37.5% (P = 0.013), respectively. Other variables had no statistical significance. The diagnostic accuracy of CT colonography is higher than that of MRI (area under the curve, 0.786 vs 0.691; P < 0.001), for the overall rectosigmoid endometriosis. In the evaluation of complete cul-de-sac obliteration, morphologic change of rectosigmoid colon is identified more accurately with CT colonography than that of MRI (area under the curve, 0.821 vs 0.686; P < 0.001).Both CT colonography and MRI are highly sensitive to the detection of rectosigmoid endometriosis, but lack specificity. However, the depiction rate of morphologic change in rectosigmoid colon is greater with CT colonography than that of MRI, in the case of cul-de-sac obliteration. The luminal alteration significantly correlates with morphologic change in rectosigmoid endometriosis.Diagnosis of complete cul-de-sac obliteration (CCDSO) by the MRI jelly method.To evaluate the usefulness of MRI jelly method (jelly method).Fifty-five patients (32.7 +/- 5 years old) with endometriosis, treated with laparoscopic surgery between January and June 2005 with preoperative MRI using the jelly method. In imaging by the jelly method, 50 mL of jelly used for ultrasound was injected into the vagina, and 150 mL of jelly diluted twice with tap water was injected into the rectum. MRI were inspected for the following seven findings: (Finding 1) Uterine position (anteflexion or retroflexion); (Finding 2) Thickness of the posterior uterine wall (adenomyosis uteri); (Finding 3) Ascites in the Douglas' pouch; (Finding 4) Elevated posterior uterine fornix; (Finding 5) Thickening of the "Haustra"; (Finding 6) Elevated anterior rectal wall; and (Finding 7) Douglas' pouch lesion visualized as a high-intensity area on a T1-weighted image. The latter four findings were enhanced with the jelly method. These seven findings were examined for their correlations with video findings of adhesion during surgery.CCDSO was present in 30 of 55 patients. These seven findings had accuracies of 69.1%, 70.9%, 72.7%, 74.5%, 56.4%, 83.6%, and 81.8% respectively. Findings 6 and 7 showed high accuracy.These two findings could only be obtained using the jelly method, indicating the usefulness of this method for diagnosing CCDSO.[Prospective study of the correlation of ultrasonography and CA125 in the management of ovarian cysts: a study of 77 cases].To study the correlation between ultrasound, Doppler,measurement of CA 125 and histology in the preoperative diagnosis of ovarian cysts.Prospective and analytical study about 77 patients in whom we analyzed the contribution of ultrasound, the assay of CA125, the couple CA125 ultrasonography and laparoscopy in the diagnosis and management of cysts the ovary. The value of CA125 was considered pathological like the one adopted by our biochemistry laboratory of the CHU Habib Bourguiba, Sfax (> 35 UI / ml).The mean age was 35.6 years. On the whole, ultrasound has a sensitivity of 71.41% and a specificity of 80%. The positive predictive value was 35.71% and negative predictive value was 96.55%. The sensitivity of CA125 to detect malignant lesions among ovarian cysts was 85.71% and a specificity of 85.93%. The PPV was low (42.85%). The combination Ultrasound-CA125 had a sensitivity of 85.7%, a specificity of 82.8%, a PPV and NPV respectively 35.3% and 98.1%. The concordance between the macroscopic perlaparoscopic and histological diagnosis of different tumors was 83.3% for functional cysts, 77.7% for serous cysts, and 100% for dermoid cysts, endometriosis and bleeding.The contribution of Doppler ultrasound and tumor markers is essential in the diagnosis of ovarian cysts.Efficiency of MR imaging to orientate surgical treatment of posterior deep pelvic endometriosis.The purpose of this retrospective study was to evaluate the accuracy of MRI using pelvic-phased-array and endocavitary coils in detecting intestinal wall invasion by an endometriotic nodule.Forty-seven patients (32.1 +/- 4.2 years) who were planned for a surgical cure of deep endometriosis underwent MRI with conventional sequences using both coils. A thin bright layer on T(2)-w with enhancement on post-Gd T(1)-w defined our MR pattern for muscular layer involvement. MR results were correlated with surgical and pathological findings of the removed nodule.MR results for Group 1 (both coils) achieved a sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of 100-63%, 96-92%, 90-70%, 100-85%, and 97-83% for endovaginal coil and phased-array coil, respectively. Group 2 (phased-array coil) had a sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of 73%, 93%, 84%, 88%, and 87% for this coil, respectively.Combined pelvic-phased-array and endovaginal coils are better than phased array alone in the detection of intestinal wall invasion. Easy to perform, it has to be considered as a preoperative staging for deep posterior endometriosis to orientate the surgical management.A comparative study between pelvic ultrasonography and laparoscopy in the detection of pelvic pathology in the initial workup of subfertile women.This study was conducted prospectively from June 1992 to September 1993, we evaluated 115 patients attending our infertility clinic for the first time to determine the correlation between abdominal ultrasound and laparoscopy in the detection of pelvic pathology in the initial workup of subfertile women, depicting laparoscopy as the gold standard. Normal ultrasound scans were reported in 80 women (69.56% of total) 58 of whom had also normal pelvic findings at laparoscopy. The remaining 22 patients with normal ultrasound scans had abnormal laparoscopic findings in the pelvis giving a false negative rate of 27.50 per cent. These were primarily related to; endometriosis with adhesions (10), filmy adnexal adhesions (5), omental and bowl adhesions (5), and hydrosalpinx (2). Thirty five women (30.44% of the total) had abnormal scans. Pelvic pathologies were confirmed in 30 at laparoscopy. The remaining five had a normal pelvis (three retroverted uteri, and two functional ovarian cyst had disappeared at time of laparoscopy) giving a false positive rate of 14.29 per cent for ultrasound scans. Statistical analysis revealed that abdominal ultrasound scan in the detection of pelvic pathology in the initial workup of subfertile women has a sensitivity of 57.69 per cent, specificity of 92.06 per cent, positive predictive value of 85.71 per cent with negative predictive value of 72.50 per cent and accuracy rate of 76.52 per cent. We conclude that the use of abdominal ultrasound in the detection of pelvic pathology in the initial workup of subfertile women is not an appropriate routine screening test as it has low efficiency in detecting the pelvic pathologies many of which are the causes of infertility.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Endoluminal ultrasound diagnosis and operative management of rectal endometriosis.Endorectal ultrasound was performed in patients with endometriosis to evaluate the role of this technique for rectal wall involvement and to evaluate the position of preoperative diagnosis in the operative management of rectal endometriosis.Sixteen patients with suspected fixation of endometriomas to the rectal wall during bimanual examination were included in the study. Endorectal ultrasound was performed using a real time unit with a 7.5 MHz endorectal transducer. The probe was introduced via a rectoscope into the rectum up to the rectosigmoid.Endometriosis was confirmed histopathologically in all patients. In six patients rectal wall involvement was diagnosed, in two patients endometriomas were adjacent to the rectal wall, and in eight patients rectal wall involvement could be excluded. Preoperative diagnosis was confirmed in all patients during operation. Laparotomy was performed in those patients with preoperatively diagnosed rectal wall involvement, whereas the remaining patients were treated laparoscopically. Endometriomas with rectal wall involvement were treated in five of six patients with resection of the affected bowel predominantly by low anterior resection.Preoperative endorectal ultrasound is a reliable technique to visualize perirectal endometriomas and to assess rectal wall involvement. Based on preoperative endosonographic diagnosis, an operative management was established with laparotomy and resection of the affected bowel in cases of rectal wall involvement.Deep pelvic endometriosis: accuracy of pelvic MRI completed by MR colonography.This study assessed the diagnostic accuracy of pelvic magnetic resonance (MR) imaging completed by MR colonography for the preoperative evaluation of deep pelvic endometriosis in patients undergoing laparoscopic surgery.A total of 143 patients (mean age 34.3 ± 5.1 years) with a clinical suspicion of deep pelvic endometriosis were assessed by pelvic MR and MR colonography. All patients underwent laparoscopic surgery 3-10 weeks after the MR examination. The presence, location, number and extent of endometriotic lesions were evaluated. Data obtained with MR were compared with surgical findings. MR sensitivity, specificity, positive (PPV) and negative (NPV) predictive values and diagnostic accuracy values were calculated for each site by considering the laparoscopic and histological findings as the reference standard.Laparoscopy confirmed the presence of endometriosis in 119/143 patients (83%); in 76/119 (64%) deep pelvic endometriosis was diagnosed, whereas in the remaining 43/119 (36%), superficial peritoneal implants and endometriomas were found. In 32/119 (27%) patients, intestinal lesions were detected. MR had sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and diagnostic accuracy values of 67-100%, 85-100%, 83-100%, 84-100% and 84-100%, respectively, in recognising lesions located in different pelvic sites.MR imaging combined with colonography is a highly accurate tool for characterising deep endometriotic lesions in patients scheduled for laparoscopic surgery. In particular, MR colonography has very high accuracy in detecting colorectal involvement.Standard high-resolution pelvic MRI vs. low-resolution pelvic MRI in the evaluation of deep infiltrating endometriosis.To compare the capabilities of standard pelvic MRI with low-resolution pelvic MRI using fast breath-hold sequences to evaluate deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).Sixty-eight consecutive women with suspected DIE were studied with pelvic MRI. A double-acquisition protocol was carried out in each case. High-resolution (HR)-MRI consisted of axial, sagittal, and coronal TSE T2W images, axial TSE T1W, and axial THRIVE. Low-resolution (LR)-MRI was acquired using fast single shot (SSH) T2 and T1 images. Two radiologists with 10 and 2 years of experience reviewed HR and LR images in two separate sessions. The presence of endometriotic lesions of the uterosacral ligament (USL), rectovaginal septum (RVS), pouch of Douglas (POD), and rectal wall was noted. The accuracies of LR-MRI and HR-MRI were compared with the laparoscopic and histopathological findings.Average acquisition times were 24 minutes for HR-MRI and 7 minutes for LR-MRI. The more experienced radiologist achieved higher accuracy with both HR-MRI and LR-MRI. The values of sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV, and accuracy did not significantly change between HR and LR images or interobserver agreement for all of the considered anatomic sites.LR-MRI performs as well as HR-MRI and is a valuable tool for the detection of deep endometriosis extension.• High- and low-resolution MRI perform similarly in deep endometriosis evaluation • Low-resolution MRI significantly reduces the duration of the examination • Radiologist experience is fundamental for evaluating deep pelvic endometriosis.Transvaginal ultrasonography combined with pelvic examination in the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma.The aim of this retrospective study was to evaluate the efficacy of TVS and TVS combined with pelvic examination for the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma. Three hundred and five ovarian masses of 244 patients with either pre-operative or post-operative diagnosis of ovarian tumor and received TVS between January 1, 1996 and December 31, 1998 were included in the study. Of 305 masses, 221 endometriomas of 164 patients were diagnosed histologically. The efficacy of TVS was 84.9 per cent with a sensitivity of 92.3 per cent and specificity of 70.2 per cent. LR+ and LR- were 3.1 and 0.1 respectively. The combination of TVS and pelvic examination with either positive test had a higher sensitivity (98.8%) but lower specificity (26.6%). This combination dramatically improved NPV (97.5%) and LR- (0.05), whereas, the combination with both positive tests had a sensitivity of 78.1 per cent, and specificity of 81.5 per cent. LR+ and LR- were not different from those using TVS alone. In conclusion, the study has shown the role of TVS in the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma. The combination of TVS and pelvic examination may be useful in ruling out the disease. However, a further prospective study should be performed to confirm the efficacy of the combination.Evaluation of MR diffusion-weighted imaging in differentiating endometriosis infiltrating the bowel from colorectal carcinoma.Endometriosis infiltrating the bowel may be difficult to differentiate from colorectal carcinoma in cases that present with non-specific clinical and imaging features. The aim of this study is to assess the value of MR diffusion-weighted imaging (DWI) in differentiating endometriosis infiltrating the bowel from colorectal carcinoma.In 66 patients, MR DWI was added to the standard imaging protocol in patients visiting our outdoor MR clinic for the analysis of suspected or known deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE). In patients diagnosed with DIE infiltrating the bowel on MR imaging, high b-value diffusion-weighted images were qualitatively assessed by two readers in consensus and compared to high b-value diffusion weighted images in 15 patients evaluated for colorectal carcinoma. In addition, ADC values of lesions were calculated, using b-values of 50, 400 and 800 s/mm(2).A total of 15 patients were diagnosed with DIE infiltrating the bowel on MR imaging. Endometriosis infiltrating the bowel showed low signal intensity on high b-value diffusion-weighted images in all patients, whereas colorectal carcinoma showed high signal intensity on high b-value diffusion-weighted images in all patients. Mean ADC value in endometriosis infiltrating the bowel (0.80 ± 0.06 × 10(-3)mm(2)/s) was significantly lower compared to mean ADC value in colorectal carcinoma (0.86 ± 0.06 × 10(-3 )mm(2)/s), but with considerable overlap between ADC values.Only qualitative assessment of MR DWI may be valuable to facilitate differentiation between endometriosis infiltrating the bowel and colorectal carcinoma.Combination of transvaginal sonography and clinical examination for preoperative diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis.The aim of the present study was to evaluate the accuracy of routine clinical examination (per vaginam, PV) combined with transvaginal sonography (TVS) for presurgical, non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis.Two-hundred women with symptoms suggestive of endometriosis were prospectively assessed by PV and TVS prior to laparoscopy and radical resection of disease and histological confirmation.Prevalence of endometriosis on the right/left (r/l) ovary, r/l uterosacral ligament (USL), pouch of Douglas (POD), vagina, bladder, rectovaginal space (RVS) and rectum was 12%, 13%, 12%, 22%, 15%, 11%, 2%, 4% and 24%. Sensitivities, specificities, positive and negative predictive values and positive and negative likelihood ratios for combined use of TVS and PV resulted in 96/100%, 100/99%, 100/93%, 93/100% and -;0.04/87.0;- for the r/l ovarian endometriosis; 67/84%, 97/86%, 73/62%, 96/95% and 19.56;0.35/5.97;0.19 for the r/l USL disease; 87%, 98%, 90%, 98% and 49.11;0.14 for involvement of the POD; 82%, 99%, 95%, 98% and 145.64;0.18 for vaginal endometriosis; 88%, 99%, 78%, 99% and 84.0;0.13 for endometriosis of the RVS; 75%, 98%, 50%, 99% and 49.0;0.25 for bladder involvement and 96%, 98%, 94%, 99% and 48.56;0.04 for rectal endometriosis.The combination of PV and TVS accurately predicts the presence of endometriosis affecting the ovaries, vagina, rectum, USL, RVS and POD in patients with suspected endometriosis. We suggest the routine combination of PV and TVS as an essential part of the standard primary assessment of pelvic pain patients with suspected endometriosis.[Comparison of endoscopic ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging in severe pelvic endometriosis].Deep pelvic endometriosis may lead to severe pain, the treatment of which may require complete surgical resection of lesions. Digestive infiltration is a difficult therapeutic problem. Preoperative diagnosis is difficult and digestive infiltration may remain unknown with incomplete resection and sometimes repeated surgery. Both magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and endoscopic ultrasonography are able to detect rectosigmoid infiltration but their usefulness in the preoperative staging is still to be evaluated. The aim of this work was to evaluate and compare both techniques in the preoperative detection of deep pelvic endometriosis, particularly digestive infiltration.From 1996 to 1998, 48 women with painful deep pelvic endometriosis had preoperative imaging exploration with endoscopic ultrasonography and MRI, and were operated on in order to attempt complete endometriosis resection. Patients were proposed for laparoscopic resection if endoscopic ultrasonography and/or MRI did not reveal digestive infiltration or for open resection if endoscopic ultrasonography and/or MRI were positive for digestive infiltration.Endoscopic ultrasonography and/or MRI led to suspicion of digestive endometriosis in 16 patients. Surgical resection was performed in 12 and digestive wall invasion was histologically demonstrated. At final follow-up, all patients had a dramatic decrease of their symptoms. The remaining 4 patients refused digestive resection and had only laparoscopic gynecologic resection. Infiltration although not histologically proven was very likely both on operative findings and clinical evolution. Digestive infiltration was preoperatively excluded in the 32 other patients. All had a laparoscopic treatment without digestive resection and pain diminished in all patients. In the 12 patients group who had digestive resection, digestive infiltration was correctly diagnosed by endoscopic ultrasonography in all cases (no false negative) whereas MRI, even with the use of endocoil antenna, led to correct diagnosis in 8 out of 12 cases. When endoscopic ultrasonography was negative for digestive infiltration, laparoscopic resection of lesions at surgery appeared complete in all cases. For the 16 patients with presumed digestive infiltration, sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography and MRI was 100 and 75% respectively, with a 100% specificity in both cases. MRI appeared very accurate for the detection of ovarian endometriotic locations. MRI was more sensitive but less specific than endoscopic ultrasonography for the diagnosis of isolated endometriotic recto-vaginal septum and utero-sacral ligaments lesions.Endoscopic ultrasonography was the best technique for the diagnosis of digestive endometriotic infiltration, which complicates the therapeutic strategy. MRI, however, allows more complete staging of other pelvic endometriotic lesions.The role of transvaginal ultrasonography combined with color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler in the diagnosis of endometrioma.To assess the diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal ultrasonography alone and combined with color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler in differentiating ovarian endometriomas from other nonendometriotic masses.Prospective study with pathological confirmation of sonographic diagnosis.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology at a university hospital.A series of 78 consecutive patients diagnosed as having an adnexal mass and scheduled for surgery, between January 1995 and March 1996.Transvaginal ultrasonography and color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler was performed before surgery in all patients. A total of 82 masses were diagnosed (four patients had bilateral masses). CA-125 plasma levels were measured in all patients. Ultrasound diagnosis was compared with definitive histopathological diagnosis.The presence of a round-shaped homogeneous cyst with low-level echoes was considered as sonographic diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma. The typical vascular pattern from endometrioma was considered as "pericystic flow at the level of the ovarian hilius." The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were calculated for transvaginal ultrasonography alone and combined with color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler.Twenty-seven (32.9%) of the 82 masses were proven to be ovarian endometriomas. Morphological assessment diagnosed correctly 24 (88.9%) of 27 endometriomas (false-positive rate: 9%). Typical flow pattern was present in 90.5% of endometriomas (false-positive rate: 80%). CA-125 levels in patients with endometrioma (45.6 +/- 6.3 U/mL; mean +/- SEM) were significantly higher than in patients with nonendometriotic masses (26.5 +/- 5.5 U/mL). The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of transvaginal ultrasonography alone and combined with color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler were 88.9%, 91%, 84.2%, and 94.5%, and 76.2%, 88.9%, 82.4%, and 82.4%, respectively. For CA-125 levels, using a cutoff > or = 35 U/mL, these figures were 79.3%, 84.6%, 79.3%, and 84.6%, respectively.The use of color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler does not improve the diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal ultrasonography alone in the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma.Deep infiltrating endometriosis of the bowel wall: the comet sign.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the appearance of deep infiltrating endometriosis of the bowel wall in the cul-de-sac and determine the characteristic appearance of these lesions. We searched our database between January 1, 2011, and December 31, 2013, for all patients who had sonographic findings of suspected deep infiltrating endometriosis of the bowel with obliteration of the cul-de-sac. The medical record of each patient was examined retrospectively for evidence of surgical confirmation of disease. The sonographic appearance, shape, and size of the bowel wall lesions were evaluated to develop criteria for deep infiltrating endometriosis of the rectosigmoid and cul-de-sac. The search of our database revealed 35 patients with sonographic findings of pelvic bowel wall endometriosis associated with obliteration of the cul-de-sac. Ten of these patients had surgical confirmation of bowel wall endometriosis after the scan, and another 4 patients had surgical evidence of endometriosis from prior surgery. All of the patients who underwent surgery subsequent to sonography had confirmation of their bowel wall infiltrative endometriosis. Sonographically, the bowel lesions were solid, focal, and tubular with slightly irregular margins and in most cases a thinner section or a "tail" at one end, resembling a comet. This study confirms that bowel wall implants have a very characteristic appearance, and extending the transvaginal examination to include an evaluation of the rectosigmoid seeking these bowel lesions is valuable, especially in any patient presenting with a history of pelvic pain. [Magnetic resonance imaging as a non-invasive detection tool for extraovarian endometriosis--own experience].Endometriosis--due to its high incidence, associated pain and infertility--constitutes an important problem in gynecological practice. The Polish Gynecological Society Expert Panel recommends to perform magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) prior to laparoscopy The purpose of this study is to present the usefulness of MRI in the diagnosis of extraovarian endometriosis on the basis of own experience.The material consisted of 35 patients, aged 15-52 (mean 36.5 years), who were diagnosed with extraovarian endometriosis on MRI. MR examinations were performed with 1.5 T scanners according to a routine protocol, which incorporates the LAVA sequence of dynamic contrast studies protocol because of thin sections.Extraovarian endometriosis was isolated in 24 patients (68.6%), while in 11 (31.4%) it coexisted with ovarian endometriomas. In 23 cases (65.7%) extraovarian endometriosis was found in one place, in 12 (34.3%)--in two or more locations. Endometriosis was found in the following locations: abdominal wall--11 cases (37.4%), uterine body--9 (25.7%), posterior vaginal fornix--7 (20%), wall of the rectum and sigmoid colon--5 (14.3%), pararectal space--5, uterine cervix--4 (11.4%), Douglas pouch--3 (8.6%), Fallopian tube--2 (5.7%), wall of the small intestine--1 (2.8%), and urinary bladder--1. Adhesions were observed in 28.6% of the patients.MRI is an important addition to the non-invasive diagnosis of extraovarian endometriosis and should be performed before treatment, especially surgical one. The inclusion of fat saturated T1 sequence from the dynamic contrast examination in the study protocol increases the likelihood of detecting small endometrial implants.Can anyone screen for deep infiltrating endometriosis with transvaginal ultrasound?Surgical treatment of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) is complex, and preoperative diagnosis benefits both surgeon and patient. Studies in expert centres have reported high accuracy for transvaginal ultrasound (TVUS) diagnosis of DIE. External validation of these findings has been limited, and no information is available on how quickly these skills can be acquired. The aim of this study was to measure the learning curve of DIE-TVUS and to identify the causes for inaccuracies in the diagnosis of bowel lesions and Pouch of Douglas (POD) obliteration.Following one week of training at the University of São Paulo (Brazil), 205 consecutive women with a history of endometriosis symptoms were prospectively assessed by TVUS after minimal bowel preparation. TVUS findings were correlated with laparoscopic findings in eighty-five cases to assess the accuracy. The LC-CUSUM and CUSUM were used to assess the learning curve and maintenance of competency, respectively.The sensitivity and specificity for DIE of the bladder, vagina and bowel were 33% and 100%, 80% and 100%, and 88% and 93%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity for the presence of POD obliteration were 88% and 90%, respectively. LC-CUSUM analysis confirmed that competency for DIE-TVUS was achieved within 38 scans for the detection of POD obliteration and within 36 scans for the detection of bowel nodules. Competency was maintained for the remainder of the scans as assessed by the CUSUM.After one week of DIE-TVUS training, competency can be achieved within forty procedures, allowing diagnosis of DIE with similar diagnostic accuracy as reported by centres of excellence.Standard high-resolution pelvic MRI vs. low-resolution pelvic MRI in the evaluation of deep infiltrating endometriosis.To compare the capabilities of standard pelvic MRI with low-resolution pelvic MRI using fast breath-hold sequences to evaluate deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).Sixty-eight consecutive women with suspected DIE were studied with pelvic MRI. A double-acquisition protocol was carried out in each case. High-resolution (HR)-MRI consisted of axial, sagittal, and coronal TSE T2W images, axial TSE T1W, and axial THRIVE. Low-resolution (LR)-MRI was acquired using fast single shot (SSH) T2 and T1 images. Two radiologists with 10 and 2 years of experience reviewed HR and LR images in two separate sessions. The presence of endometriotic lesions of the uterosacral ligament (USL), rectovaginal septum (RVS), pouch of Douglas (POD), and rectal wall was noted. The accuracies of LR-MRI and HR-MRI were compared with the laparoscopic and histopathological findings.Average acquisition times were 24 minutes for HR-MRI and 7 minutes for LR-MRI. The more experienced radiologist achieved higher accuracy with both HR-MRI and LR-MRI. The values of sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV, and accuracy did not significantly change between HR and LR images or interobserver agreement for all of the considered anatomic sites.LR-MRI performs as well as HR-MRI and is a valuable tool for the detection of deep endometriosis extension.• High- and low-resolution MRI perform similarly in deep endometriosis evaluation • Low-resolution MRI significantly reduces the duration of the examination • Radiologist experience is fundamental for evaluating deep pelvic endometriosis.Office gel sonovaginography for the prediction of posterior deep infiltrating endometriosis: a multicenter prospective observational study.To use office gel sonovaginography (SVG) to predict posterior deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) in women undergoing laparoscopy.This was a multicenter prospective observational study carried out between January 2009 and February 2013. All women were of reproductive age, had a history of chronic pelvic pain and underwent office gel SVG assessment for the prediction of posterior compartment DIE prior to laparoscopic endometriosis surgery. Gel SVG findings were compared with laparoscopic findings to determine the diagnostic accuracy of office gel SVG for the prediction of posterior compartment DIE.In total, 189 women underwent preoperative gel SVG and laparoscopy for endometriosis. At laparoscopy, 57 (30%) women had posterior DIE and 43 (23%) had rectosigmoid/anterior rectal DIE. For the prediction of rectosigmoid/anterior rectal (i.e. bowel) DIE, gel SVG had an accuracy of 92%, sensitivity of 88%, specificity of 93%, positive predictive value (PPV) of 79%, negative predictive value (NPV) of 97%, positive likelihood ratio (LR+) of 12.9 and negative likelihood ratio (LR-) of 0.12 (P = 3.98E-25); for posterior vaginal wall and rectovaginal septum (RVS) DIE, respectively, the accuracy was 95% and 95%, sensitivity was 18% and 18%, specificity was 99% and 100%, PPV was 67% and 100%, NPV was 95% and 95%, LR+ was 32.4 and infinity and LR- was 0.82 and 0.82 (P = 0.009 and P = 0.003).Office gel SVG appears to be an effective outpatient imaging technique for the prediction of bowel DIE, with a higher accuracy for the prediction of rectosigmoid compared with anterior rectal DIE. Although the sensitivity for vaginal and RVS DIE was limited, gel SVG had a high specificity and NPV for all forms of posterior DIE, indicating that a negative gel SVG examination is highly suggestive of the absence of DIE at laparoscopy.Bowel endometriosis: preoperative diagnostic accuracy of 3.0-T MR enterography--initial results.To prospectively determine the accuracy of 3.0-T magnetic resonance (MR) enterography in the preoperative assessment of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) lesions located in the bowel above the rectosigmoid junction.Institutional review board approval for this study was obtained, and each patient gave written informed consent. Over 18 months, patients with known pelvic DIE who were scheduled for surgery were recruited. Consecutive patients suspected of having bowel endometriosis above the rectosigmoid junction underwent 3.0-T MR enterography. Two blinded readers independently performed a systematic analysis of nine bowel segments above the rectosigmoid junction. MR images were compared with surgical and pathologic findings. Efficacy parameters were calculated with 95% confidence intervals (CIs). Interobserver agreement was assessed with κ statistics.Among the 43 patients enrolled in this study, 33 underwent surgery and were included in the final analyses. Sixteen (48%) patients had bowel DIE lesions located above the rectosigmoid junction at surgery and histopathologic examination. Twenty-six lesions were analyzed, including four ileal, two ileocecal, three cecal, three appendicular, and 14 sigmoid colon lesions. For the diagnosis of these lesions, MR imaging showed sensitivities of 92% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 81.7, 100) for reader 1 and 96% (95% CI: 87.1, 100) for reader 2 and specificities of 100% (95% CI: 98.8, 100) for both readers. The κ value was 0.97.These results show 3.0-T MR enterography is accurate in the preoperative diagnosis and mapping of bowel DIE lesions located above the rectosigmoid junction. Online supplemental material is available for this article.Ultrasound mapping system for the surgical management of deep infiltrating endometriosis.To assess the accuracy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) in defining size and location of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) with laparoscopic/histologic confirmation.Prospective observational study.University hospital.One hundred four women with suspected DIE on the basis of TVS.Patients with DIE underwent TVS evaluation before laparoscopic surgery. An accurate mapping of the extent of the disease was recorded during TVS and at laparoscopy. This new mapping system was developed to assess the extent of endometriosis by measuring the size and depth of the lesions at the various pelvic locations.Surgical and histologic confirmation of the ultrasonographic data to evaluate the presence and location of DIE and creation of a new mapping methodology for detecting DIE by TVS.Depending on the different location of the lesions, the accuracy of TVS ranged from 76%-97%. The lowest sensitivity (59%) and accuracy (76%) were obtained for TVS in the diagnosis of vaginal endometriosis, whereas the greatest accuracy (97%) was shown in detecting bladder lesions and Douglas obliteration.This new ultrasound mapping system is accurate for detecting the extent of DIE and may be useful for preoperative planning and intraoperative management of symptomatic patients with DIE.Learning curve for the detection of pouch of Douglas obliteration and deep infiltrating endometriosis of the rectum.How long does it take to be proficient in diagnosing pouch of Douglas (POD) obliteration and deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) of the rectum with transvaginal sonography (TVS)?Sonographers familiar with the general use of TVS are expected to be proficient in the diagnosis of endometriosis nodules of the rectum and the detection of POD obliteration using the 'sliding sign' after ∼40 examinations, performed in a referral clinic for pelvic pain.With rectal DIE, the reasons for the obvious diagnostic problems are complex. Menstrual pain or cramps are still considered to be 'normal' and do not provide a reason for patients and even health-care providers to seek expert help. Furthermore, the performance of TVS for diagnosing pelvic endometriosis has been shown to be accurate only in experienced hands.This prospective study included 121 selected patients with suspected endometriosis.Symptomatic patients, referred to a pelvic pain clinic, were examined by an expert sonographer (E.S.) and consecutively by two trainees (T1/2).The learning curve using the cumulative sum shows that the trainees, listed as T1/T2, reached the predefined level of proficiency in detecting bowel nodules after examining 42 and 37 patients, for T1 and T2, respectively. The prevalence rate of bowel nodules demonstrated by the ES was 21%. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values (PPV, NPV) as well as the accuracy for TVS of T1 and T2 in comparison with the results of ES were 72 and 89, 96 and 95, 87 and 80, 90 and 98, and 89 and 94%, respectively. The prevalence rate of POD obliteration, as demonstrated by a negative sliding sign, was 27%. The trainees reached the predefined level of proficiency after examining 42 and 33 patients, for T1 and T2, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV as well as the accuracy of TVS for T1 and T2 in comparison with the results of the ES were 83 and 89, 95 and 95, 91 and 80, 90 and 98, and 91 and 94%, respectively.We performed this analysis in a tertiary referral centre with a high number of advanced cases of DIE, not reflecting a standard population.Integrated in TVS training courses, typical sonographic video clips for DIE of the rectum, including the use of disease-specific signs, could help to improve diagnostic accuracy in DIE and shorten diagnostic delays.No funding was received for this study. None of the authors has any competing interests.Three-dimensional ultrasonography in the diagnosis of deep endometriosis.In the use of 'tenderness-guided' transvaginal ultrasound, is the diagnostic accuracy of three-dimensional (3D) ultrasonography better than two-dimensional (2D) ultrasonography in the identification of deep endometriosis?Three-dimensional ultrasonography has a significantly higher diagnostic accuracy in the diagnosis of posterior locations of deep endometriosis without intestinal involvement, such as the uterosacral ligaments, vaginal and rectovaginal endometriosis.The only previous study of the diagnosis of posterior compartment endometriosis reported an poor sensitivity of 3D ultrasonography for uterosacral and sigmoid colon involvement.This diagnostic test study included 202 patients scheduled for surgery because of clinical suspicion of deep pelvic endometriosis and was carried out between January 2009 and September 2012.Modified transvaginal ultrasonography was performed on all of the women by a single examiner. Two locations of deep endometriosis were considered: intestinal involvement and other posterior lesions (including vaginal location, rectovaginal septum and uterosacral ligaments). Once the 2D ultrasonography had been performed, the 3D acquisition was performed and the obtained volume was stored. To avoid the risk of recall bias, the same operator evaluated the 3D volumes 6 months after the last examination using virtual navigation to provide a presumptive diagnosis of the presence and localization of deep endometriosis. In addition, to evaluate the reproducibility of 3D, two operators with different levels of expertise performed a retrospective review of 3D volumes from a random sample of 35 patients, twice, 1 week apart to also assess intraobserver agreement. The diagnostic performance of both tests was expressed as area under the receiver-operating characteristics curve (AUC), sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, positive (LR+) and negative (LR-) likelihood ratios, with their respective 95% confidence interval (CI). Reproducibility was evaluated using kappa statistics.Surgery revealed deep endometriosis in 129 patients. The AUCs for endometriosis of intestinal location were similar for both ultrasound techniques. The AUCs for endometriosis of other posterior locations were significantly different (0.891, 95% CI 0.839-0.943 for 3D versus 0.789, 95% CI 0.720-0.858 for 2D; P = 0.0193). For the intestinal involvement, the specificity, sensitivity, positive and negative predictive value, and LR+ and LR- were 93% (89-95%), 95% (88-98%), 89% (83-92%), 97% (93-99%), 13, and 0.06, respectively, for 2D ultrasound and 97% (93-99%), 91% (84-94%), 95% (88-98%), 95% (91-96%), 25, and 0.09, respectively, for 3D ultrasound. For other posterior locations, the specificity, sensitivity, positive and negative predictive value, and LR+ and LR- were 88% (82-93%), 71% (64-77%), 83% (75-90%), 79% (74-83%), 6.10, 0.32, respectively, for 2D ultrasound and 94% (89-97%), 87% (81-91%), 92% (86-96%), 90% (85-93%), 14.0, 0.14, respectively, for 3D ultrasound. Intraobserver agreement was substantial for both examiners (kappa 0.8754, for operator A and 0.7087, for operator B, respectively). Interobserver agreement was also substantial.The disadvantages of 3D ultrasound to be considered are the necessity of newer ultrasonographic equipment and that fewer sonographers completely know the 3D technique. There are also some limitations within this study. First, an expert examiner performed the real-time ultrasound and 3D volume acquisitions. Second, the same operator also performed the 3D evaluations but at least 6 months after the last acquisition to avoid a possible recall bias.The diagnostic performance obtained in the present study is superior to the accuracy reported in other studies of 3D ultrasonography, but not superior to all other published articles of 2D ultrasonography. The reported high diagnostic accuracy of 3D ultrasound could be widely generalizable because good reproducibility was demonstrated even with an operator with less expertise.This study was supported in part by the Regione Autonoma della Sardegna (project code CPR-24750).Extended transvaginal sonography in deep infiltrating endometriosis: use of bowel preparation and an acoustic window with intravaginal gel: preliminary results.The purpose of this study was to assess the diagnostic performance of extended transvaginal sonography for diagnosing deep infiltrating endometriosis.A prospective study was conducted comprising 51 women (mean age, 32.9 years; range, 23-43 years) with suspected deep infiltrating endometriosis based on clinical symptoms. All women underwent extended transvaginal sonography, which included assessment of 2 pelvic compartments (anterior compartment: bladder and distal ureters; and posterior compartment: posterior vaginal fornix, retrocervical area, pouch of Douglas, and rectosigmoid). The sliding sign for detecting pouch of Douglas obliteration was also assessed. All patients received bowel preparation before sonographic examinations. A single examiner performed all examinations. All women underwent laparoscopic surgery, and histologic confirmation of endometriosis was done. The sensitivity, specificity, positive likelihood ratio (LR+) and negative likelihood ratio (LR-) were calculated.Some women had more than 1 lesion, giving a total of 55 histologically confirmed lesions (rectosigmoid, n = 13; vagina, n = 5; retrocervical, n = 32; bladder, n = 5). The sensitivity, specificity, and LR+ for rectosigmoid involvement were 100%, 93%, and 14.0, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, LR+, and LR- for vaginal involvement were 60%, 98%, 30.0, and 0.41. The sensitivity, specificity, LR+, and LR- for retrocervical involvement were 84%, 96%, 19.4, and 0.16. The sensitivity, specificity, and LR- for bladder involvement were 20%, 100%, and 0.80. The sensitivity, specificity, LR+, and LR- of the sliding sign for diagnosing pouch of Douglas obliteration were 89%, 92%, 10.7, and 0.12.Except for bladder involvement, extended transvaginal sonography has good diagnostic performance for deep infiltrating endometriosis.Can magnetic resonance imaging at 3.0-Tesla reliably detect patients with endometriosis? Initial results.The aim of this study was to determine whether an optimized 3.0-Tesla magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) protocol is sensitive and specific enough to detect patients with endometriosis.This was a prospective cohort study with consecutive patients. Forty consecutive patients with clinical suspicion of endometriosis underwent 3.0-Tesla MRI, including a T2-weighted high-resolution fast spin echo sequence (spatial resolution=0.75 ×1.2 ×1.5 mm³) and a 3D T1-weighted high-resolution gradient echo sequence (spatial resolution=0.75 ×1.2 × 2.0 mm³). Two radiologists reviewed the dataset with consensus reading. During laparoscopy, which was used as reference standard, all lesions were characterized according to the revised criteria of the American Fertility Society. Patient-level and region-level sensitivities and specificities and lesion-level sensitivities were calculated.Patient-level sensitivity was 42% for stage I (5/12) and 100% for stages II, III and IV (25/25). Patient-level specificity for all stages was 100% (3/3). The region-level sensitivity and specificity was 63% and 97%, respectively. The sensitivity per lesion was 61% (90% for deep lesions, 48% for superficial lesions and 100% for endometriomata). The detection rate of obliteration of the cul-the-sac was 100% (10/10) with no false positive findings. The interreader agreement was substantial to perfect (kappa=1 per patient, 0.65 per lesion and 0.71 for obliteration of the cul-the-sac).An optimized 3.0-Tesla MRI protocol is accurate in detecting stage II to stage IV endometriosis.Multidetector computerized tomography enema versus magnetic resonance enema in the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis.To compare the accuracy of multidetector computerized tomography enema (MDCT-e) and magnetic resonance enema (MRI-e) in determining the presence of sigmoid and rectal endometriotic nodules.260 women (32.6 ± 4.3 years) with symptoms suggestive of rectosigmoid endometriosis underwent MDCT-e and MRI-e prior to laparoscopy. After retrograde colonic distention and injection of intravenous contrast medium, patients were scanned on a 64-row MDCT scanner. MRI-e was performed on a 1.5T magnet using an 8 channels phased array coil; intestinal distention was achieved by introducing in the rectum 250-300 ml of ultrasonographic gel diluted with saline solution. Radiological findings were compared with surgical and histological results.176 women had rectosigmoid endometriosis at surgery. There was no significant difference in the accuracy of MDCT-e (98.5%) and MRI-e (96.9%) in the diagnosis of sigmoid and rectal endometriosis (p=0.248). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, positive likelihood ratio and negative likelihood ratio of MDCT-e and MRI-e were respectively 98.3%, 98.8%, 99.4%, 96.5%, 81.59, 0.02 and 97.2%, 96.4%, 98.3%, 94.1%, 26.89, 0.03.Both MDCT-e and MRI-e are accurate in the diagnosis of rectal and sigmoid endometriosis.Diagnostic confidence analysis in the magnetic resonance imaging of ovarian and deep endometriosis: comparison with surgical results.To assess the diagnostic confidence of multiple readers in the magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) diagnosis of endometriosis.Sixty-five patients (mean age 33; range 19-45 years) who had undergone MRI were retrospectively evaluated. Five regions were analysed and the presence of endometriosis was scored on a five-point scale in order to assess the diagnostic confidence. Statistical analysis included receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis, the Cohen weighted test and sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV), accuracy, positive likelihood ratio (LR+) and negative likelihood ratio (LR-).The areas under the curve (AUC) in the detection of ovarian endometrioma were 0.942, 0.893 and 0.883 for readers 1, 2 and 3, respectively; in the uterosacral ligament (USL) AUCs were 0.907, 0.804 and 0.842; in the vaginal fornix (VF) 0.819, 0.733 and 0.69; in the anterior compartment 0.916, 0.833 and 0.873; and in the rectum/sigma/pouch of Douglas (RSD) 0.936, 0.856 and 0.834.Diagnostic confidence of the observers is different according to the region of the nodules of endometriosis and it can be challenging in the VF and for the less experience readers also in the AC and RSD. Moreover the degree of uncertain diagnosis for the less expert readers may reach up to one third of the examinations.• Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is increasingly used to assess endometriosis • The diagnostic confidence of observers varies according to the location of endometriosis • The diagnosis is more difficult to establish by MRI in some anatomical locations • Specific training should be given concerning those locations that cause difficulty.Can rectal endoscopic sonography be used to predict infiltration depth in patients with deep infiltrating endometriosis of the rectum?To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of rectal endoscopic sonography (RES) in the prediction of the infiltration depth of rectal endometriosis and to ascertain whether RES could be used to choose between segmental bowel resection and a more conservative approach, such as shaving or discoid resection.In this retrospective study, 38 consecutive patients with symptomatic deep infiltrating endometriosis of the rectum who underwent laparoscopic colorectal resection were included. RES results for infiltration depth of rectal endometriosis were compared with results of pathological examination. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV, respectively), positive and negative likelihood ratios (LRs) and test accuracy were calculated for the presence of infiltration of the muscularis layers and submucosal/mucosal layers, as demonstrated by RES and confirmed by histopathological analysis.For the detection of muscularis layer infiltration by endometriosis, the PPV of RES was 100%, whereas for the detection of submucosal/mucosal layer involvement, the sensitivity was 89%, specificity was 26%, PPV was 55%, NPV was 71%, test accuracy was 58% and positive and negative LRs were 1.21 and 0.40, respectively.RES is a valuable tool for detecting rectal endometriosis as endometriotic infiltration of the muscularis layer can be predicted accurately. However, RES is less accurate in detecting submucosal/mucosal layer involvement and cannot, therefore, be used to choose between bowel resection and a more conservative approach.Ultrasound mapping of pelvic endometriosis: does the location and number of lesions affect the diagnostic accuracy? A multicentre diagnostic accuracy study.Endometriosis is a common condition which causes pain and reduced fertility. Treatment can be difficult, especially for severe disease, and an accurate preoperative assessment would greatly help in the managment of these patients. The objective of this study is to assess the accuracy of pre-operative transvaginal ultrasound scanning (TVS) in identifying the specific features of pelvic endometriosis and pelvic adhesions in comparison with laparoscopy.Consecutive women with clinically suspected or proven pelvic endometriosis, who were booked for laparoscopy, were invited to join the study. They all underwent a systematic transvaginal ultrasound examination in order to identify discrete endometriotic lesions and pelvic adhesions. The accuracy of ultrasound diagnosis was determined by comparing pre-operative ultrasound to laparoscopy findings.198 women who underwent preoperative TVS and laparoscopy were included in the final analysis. At laparoscopy 126/198 (63.6%) women had evidence of pelvic endometriosis. 28/126 (22.8%) of them had endometriosis in a single location whilst the remaining 98/126 (77.2%) had endometriosis in two or more locations. Positive likelihood ratios (LR+) for the ultrasound diagnosis of ovarian endometriomas, moderate or severe ovarian adhesions, pouch of Douglas adhesions, and bladder deeply infiltrating endometriosis (DIE), recto-sigmoid colon DIE, rectovaginal DIE, uterovesical fold DIE and uterosacral ligament DIE were >10, whilst for pelvic side wall DIE and any ovarian adhesions the + LH was 8.421 and 9.81 respectively.The negative likelihood ratio (LR-) was: <0.1 for bladder DIE; 0.1-0.2 for ovarian endometriomas, moderate or severe ovarian adhesions, and pouch of Douglas adhesions; 0.5-1 for rectovaginal, uterovesical fold, pelvic side wall and uterosacral ligament DIE. The accuracy of TVS for the diagnosis of both total number of endometriotic lesions and DIE lesions significantly improved with increasing total number of lesions.Our study has shown that the TVS diagnosis of endometriotic lesion is very specific and false positive results are rare. Negative findings are less reliable and women with significant symptoms may still benefit from further investigation even if TVS findings are normal. The accuracy of ultrasound diagnosis is significantly affected by the location and number of endometriotic lesions.The usefulness of computed tomographic colonography for evaluation of deep infiltrating endometriosis: comparison with magnetic resonance imaging.We wanted to assess the diagnostic value and morphologic feature of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE), involving rectosigmoid colon, with computed tomography (CT) colonography in comparison with magnetic resonance (MR).Fifty patients with DIE, who had undergone CT colonography and MR imaging (MRI) before surgery, were enrolled. Among these 50 patients who underwent laparoscopic surgery with DIE, 37 patients were diagnosed as rectosigmoid involvement of endometriosis (presence of rectal outer wall involvement, endometrial implantation in the rectouterine space, and complete obliteration of cul-de-sac with histologic confirmation). Image findings at CT colonography and MRI were reviewed by 2 radiologists to determine whether there are radiologic features that can help predict rectosigmoid endometriosis. Computed tomography images were analyzed for the luminal alteration of rectosigmoid colon, mural thickening, and mass formation in the rectosigmoid colon, whereas MR images were analyzed for the mass formation in the rectosigmoid colon, fat plane obliteration, between rectum and uterus or vagina, retroversion of uterus, retraction of uterus toward the colon, and detection of endometrial spot in rectovaginal or rectouterine space. Statistical analysis was performed with Pearson χ and receiver operating characteristic curve.With CT colonography, the luminal alteration of rectosigmoid colon was detected with sensitivity of 96.0% and specificity of 48.0% (P < 0.001) in the overall rectosigmoid endometriosis and with sensitivity of 84.0% and specificity of 80.0% (P = 0.005) in the case of DIE with cul-de-sac obliteration. With MR, the sensitivity and specificity for detection of endometriosis of rectosigmoid or rectouterine space were 94.4% and 37.5% (P = 0.013), respectively. Other variables had no statistical significance. The diagnostic accuracy of CT colonography is higher than that of MRI (area under the curve, 0.786 vs 0.691; P < 0.001), for the overall rectosigmoid endometriosis. In the evaluation of complete cul-de-sac obliteration, morphologic change of rectosigmoid colon is identified more accurately with CT colonography than that of MRI (area under the curve, 0.821 vs 0.686; P < 0.001).Both CT colonography and MRI are highly sensitive to the detection of rectosigmoid endometriosis, but lack specificity. However, the depiction rate of morphologic change in rectosigmoid colon is greater with CT colonography than that of MRI, in the case of cul-de-sac obliteration. The luminal alteration significantly correlates with morphologic change in rectosigmoid endometriosis.Multislice computed tomography with colon water distension (MSCT-c) in the study of intestinal and ureteral endometriosis.This study evaluates retrospectively the accuracy and reproducibility of multislice computed tomography with colon water distension (MSCT-c) in diagnosing bowel (BE) and ureteral (UE) endometriosis. Sixty-four patients underwent MSCT-c and videolaparoscopic surgery. Two radiologists reviewed MSCT-c examinations: sensitivity and specificity were calculated, considering histological exam as reference standard. In the BE cases, the degree of bowel wall infiltration was also assessed. Sensitivity and specificity for both readers were 100% and 97.6% for BE and 72.2% and 100% for UE; the interobserver agreement was excellent. The degree of bowel wall involvement was correctly defined in 90.9% of cases. MSCT-c is an accurate and reproducible technique but-considering the age of the patients-delivers a nonnegligible radiation dose.Three-dimensional sonography for diagnosis of rectovaginal septum endometriosis: interobserver agreement.The aim of this study was to evaluate the interobserver agreement for diagnosis of deep endometriosis of the rectovaginal septum using introital 3-dimensional (3D) sonography.Two experienced observers (observers A and B) performed a retrospective review of stored 3D sonographic volumes from a sample of 84 consecutive patients with a clinical suspicion of endometriosis. Each observer, independently and blinded to each other, evaluated the presence or absence of involvement of the rectovaginal septum. When no lesion was seen, the observers were asked to judge whether the acquisition of the volume was suboptimal for interpretation or whether no lesion on the rectovaginal septum was detectable. One inadequate acquisition case was discarded; a total of 83 cases were evaluated. To calculate the performance of introital 3D sonography, 7 discordant cases were reviewed by a third observer. Interobserver agreement was assessed by calculating the κ index, and the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for the 3 observers were also determined.Interobserver agreement was 0.816 (95% confidence interval, 0.69-0.93), representing very good agreement. Sensitivity was 74.1%; specificity, 85.7%; positive predictive value, 71.4%; and negative predictive value, 87.3%.Our results show that introital 3D sonography for diagnosis of deep endometriosis of the rectovaginal septum is reproducible, with very good interobserver agreement.The prediction of pouch of Douglas obliteration using offline analysis of the transvaginal ultrasound 'sliding sign' technique: inter- and intra-observer reproducibility.What is the inter-/intra-observer agreement and diagnostic accuracy among gynaecological and non-gynaecological ultrasound specialists in the prediction of pouch of Douglas (POD) obliteration (secondary to endometriosis) at offline analysis of two-dimensional videos using the dynamic real-time transvaginal ultrasound (TVS) 'sliding sign' technique?The inter-/intra-observer agreement and diagnostic accuracy for the interpretation of the TVS 'sliding sign' in the prediction of POD obliteration was found to be very acceptable, ranging from substantial to almost perfect agreement for the observers who specialized in gynaecological ultrasound.Women with POD obliteration at laparoscopy are at an increased risk of bowel endometriosis; therefore, the pre-operative diagnosis of POD obliteration is important in the surgical planning for these women. Previous studies have used TVS to predict POD obliteration prior to laparoscopy, with a sensitivity of 72-83% and specificity of 97-100%. However, there have not been any reproducibility studies performed to validate the use of TVS in the prediction of POD obliteration pre-operatively.This was a reproducibility study which involved the offline viewing of pre-recorded video sets of 30 women presenting with chronic pelvic pain, in order to determine POD obliteration using the TVS 'sliding sign' technique. The videos were selected on real-time representative quality/quantity; they were not obtained from sequential patients. There were a total of six observers, including four gynaecological ultrasound specialists and two fetal medicine specialists. The study was conducted over a period of 1 month (March 2012-April 2012).The four gynaecological ultrasound observers performed daily gynaecological scanning, while the other two observers were primarily fetal medicine sonologists. Each sonologist viewed the TVS 'sliding sign' video in two anatomical locations (retro-cervix and posterior uterine fundus), i.e. 60 videos in total. The POD was deemed not obliterated, if 'sliding sign' was positive in both anatomical locations (i.e. anterior rectum/rectosigmoid glided smoothly across the retro-cervix/posterior fundus, respectively). If the 'sliding sign' was negative (i.e. anterior rectum/rectosigmoid did not glide smoothly over retro-cervix/posterior fundal region, respectively), the POD was deemed obliterated. Diagnostic accuracy and inter-observer agreement among the six sonologists was evaluated. The same sonologist was also asked to reanalyse the same videos, albeit in a different order, at least 7 days later to assess for intra-observer agreement. A separate analysis of the inter- and intra-observer correlation was also performed to determine the agreement among the four observers who specialized in gynaecological ultrasound. Cohen's κ coefficient <0 meant that there was poor agreement, 0.01-0.20 slight agreement, 0.21-0.40 fair agreement, 0.41-0.60 moderate agreement, 0.61-0.80 substantial agreement and 0.81-0.99 almost perfect agreement.Agreement (Cohen's κ) between all six observers for the interpretation of the 'sliding sign' for both sets of videos in both regions (retro-cervix and fundus) ranged from 0.354 to 0.927 (fair agreement to almost perfect agreement) compared with 0.630-0.927 (substantial agreement to almost perfect agreement) when only the gynaecological sonologists were included. The overall multiple rater agreement for the interpretation of the 'sliding sign' for both video sets and both regions was Fleiss' κ 0.454 (P-value <0.01) for all six observers and 0.646 (P-value <0.01) for the four gynaecological ultrasound specialists. The multiple rater agreement for all six or all four observers was higher for the retro-cervical region versus the fundal region (Fleiss' κ 0.542 versus 0.370 and 0.732 versus 0.560, respectively). The intra-observer agreement among the six observers for the interpretation of the 'sliding sign' and prediction of POD obliteration ranged from Cohen's κ 0.60-0.95 and 0.46-1.0 (P-value <0.01), respectively. After excluding the fetal medicine specialists, the intra-observer agreement for the interpretation of the 'sliding sign' and the prediction of POD obliteration ranged from Cohen's κ 0.71-0.95 and 0.67-1.0, respectively, indicating substantial to almost perfect agreement. When comparing the four gynaecological observers for the prediction of POD obliteration using the TVS 'sliding sign' (after excluding cases with the POD outcome classified as 'unsure' by the observers), the results for accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value were 93.1-100, 92.9-100, 90.9-100, 77.8-100 and 97.7-100%, respectively.The 'gold standard' for the diagnosis of POD obliteration is laparoscopy; however, laparoscopic data were available only for 24 out of 30 (80%) TVS 'sliding sign' cases included in this study. Although this should not affect the inter- and intra-observer agreement findings, the ability to draw conclusions regarding the diagnostic accuracy of the TVS 'sliding sign' in the prediction of POD obliteration is somewhat limited. In addition, the diagnostic accuracy findings should be interpreted with the caveat that the cases classified as 'unsure' for the prediction of POD obliteration were excluded from the analysis.We have validated the dynamic real-time TVS 'sliding sign' technique for the prediction of POD obliteration, and this simple ultrasound-based test appears to have very acceptable inter-/intra-observer agreement for those who are experienced in gynaecological ultrasound. Given that women with POD obliteration at laparoscopy have an increased risk of bowel endometriosis and requirement for bowel surgery, the TVS 'sliding sign' test should be considered in the pre-operative imaging work-up for all women with suspected endometriosis, to allow for appropriate surgical planning. We believe the TVS 'sliding sign' technique may be easily learned by sonologists/sonographers who are familiar with performing gynaecological ultrasound, and that further studies are required to confirm the diagnostic accuracy of this new ultrasound technique amongst sonologists/sonographers with various levels of experience.This study received no specific grant from any funding agency in the public, commercial or not-for-profit sectors and the authors declare no competing interests.Transvaginal sonography for preoperative assessment of deep endometriosis.To determinate transvaginal scan (TVS) accuracy in the preoperative evaluation of deep endometriosis in a large cohort of patients with subsequent laparoscopic assessment.A retrospective study was performed in a tertiary referral center for endometriosis. Transvaginal scan reports were retrieved from an electronic database of all patients who underwent laparoscopy for pelvic pain or infertility in 2009. The accuracy of TVS was assessed for 10 different sites of pelvic endometriosis.Four hundred twenty women were included in the study. Sensitivity and specificity of TVS were 61% and 99%, respectively, for bladder endometriosis, 52% and 96% for endometriosis of rectovaginal septum, 65% and 99% for rectum endometriosis, and 69% and 98% for endometriosis of the sigmoid colon.TVS appears to be useful for the detection of endometriosis located in the bladder and involving the sigmoid colon, the rectovaginal septum, and the rectum.Comparison of 3D and 2D FSE T2-weighted MRI in the diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis: preliminary results.To evaluate image quality and diagnostic accuracy of two- (2D) and three-dimensional (3D) T2-weighted magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) for the evaluation of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).One hundred and ten consecutive patients with suspicion of endometriosis were recruited at two institutions over a 5-month period. Twenty-three women underwent surgery, 18 had DIE at histology. Two readers independently evaluated 3D and 2D MRI for image quality and diagnosis of DIE. Descriptive analysis, chi-square test for categorical or nominal variables, McNemar test for comparison between 3D and 2D T2-weighted MRI, and weighted "statistics" for intra- and interobserver agreement were used for statistical analysis.Both readers found that 3D yielded significantly lower image quality than 2D MRI (p < 0.0001). Acquisition time for 3D was significantly shorter than 2D MRI (p < 0.01). 3D offered similar accuracy to diagnose DIE compared to 2D MRI. For all locations of endometriosis, a high or variable intra-observer agreement was observed for reader 1 and 2, respectively.Despite a lower overall image quality, 3D provides significant time saving and similar accuracy than multiplanar 2D MRI in the diagnosis of specific DIE locations.Deep pelvic endometriosis: accuracy of pelvic MRI completed by MR colonography.This study assessed the diagnostic accuracy of pelvic magnetic resonance (MR) imaging completed by MR colonography for the preoperative evaluation of deep pelvic endometriosis in patients undergoing laparoscopic surgery.A total of 143 patients (mean age 34.3 ± 5.1 years) with a clinical suspicion of deep pelvic endometriosis were assessed by pelvic MR and MR colonography. All patients underwent laparoscopic surgery 3-10 weeks after the MR examination. The presence, location, number and extent of endometriotic lesions were evaluated. Data obtained with MR were compared with surgical findings. MR sensitivity, specificity, positive (PPV) and negative (NPV) predictive values and diagnostic accuracy values were calculated for each site by considering the laparoscopic and histological findings as the reference standard.Laparoscopy confirmed the presence of endometriosis in 119/143 patients (83%); in 76/119 (64%) deep pelvic endometriosis was diagnosed, whereas in the remaining 43/119 (36%), superficial peritoneal implants and endometriomas were found. In 32/119 (27%) patients, intestinal lesions were detected. MR had sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and diagnostic accuracy values of 67-100%, 85-100%, 83-100%, 84-100% and 84-100%, respectively, in recognising lesions located in different pelvic sites.MR imaging combined with colonography is a highly accurate tool for characterising deep endometriotic lesions in patients scheduled for laparoscopic surgery. In particular, MR colonography has very high accuracy in detecting colorectal involvement.Transvaginal sonographic diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma.To assess the efficacy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) in differentiating endometriomas from other adnexal masses.One thousand thirty-five adnexal masses undergoing laparoscopy or laparotomy were evaluated prospectively using TVS. Masses diagnosed as endometrioma according to their sonographic appearance were divided into two groups: those with a round shape, regular margins, thick walls and homogeneous, low-level echoes (group A); or those with irregular margins, internal septations and an anechoic appearance (group B).The sensitivity of TVS in diagnosing endometriomas was 86.50% and the specificity 99.11%. The positive predictive value (PPV) and the negative predictive value of the test were calculated to be 91.45% and 98.14%, respectively. By using the criteria determining group A, the PPV of the test increased to 97%, whereas group B had a lower PPV (70.85%).We propose that the accuracy of TVS in diagnosing endometriomas may be beneficial in various clinical conditions.Accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging for diagnosis and preoperative assessment of deeply infiltrating endometriosis.To evaluate the accuracy of preoperative magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) findings relative to surgical presence of deeply infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).This prospective study included 92 women with clinical suspicion of DIE. The MR images were compared with laparoscopy and pathology findings. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of MRI for diagnosis of DIE were assessed.DIE was confirmed at histopathology in 77 of the 92 patients (83.7%). Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of MRI to diagnose DIE at each of the specific sites evaluated were as follows: retrocervical space (89.4%, 92.3%, 96.7%, 77.4%, 90.2%); rectosigmoid (86.0%, 92.9%, 93.5%, 84.8%, 89.1%); bladder (23.1%, 100%, 100%, 88.8%, 89.1%); ureters (50.0%, 100%, 95.5%, 95.7%); and vagina (72.7%, 100%, 100%, 96.4%, 96.7%).MRI demonstrates high accuracy in diagnosing DIE in the retrocervical region, rectosigmoid, bladder, ureters, and vagina.Transvaginal ultrasound after bowel preparation to assist surgical planning for bowel endometriosis resection.Three-dimensional ultrasound and three-dimensional power Doppler improve the preoperative evaluation of complex benign ovarian lesions.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of three-dimensional ultrasound (3D-US) and three-dimensional power-Doppler (3DPD-US) as adjuncts to conventional B-mode-US in evaluation of complex benign ovarian lesions.Transvaginal B-mode-US, 3D-US and 3DPD-US were performed in 29 patients with unilateral ovarian lesion. Patients were classified as low or high risk for malignancy according to a standardized scoring system composed of ten morphological and vascular parameters. Preoperative scores were matched to the histological results and the diagnostic performance of the scoring system was calculated.Seven out of the 16 cases of endometriomas (44%) were graded as low risk masses according to B-mode-US, while the addition of 3D-US and 3DPD-US increased the accuracy to 56% and 94%, respectively. All dermoid cysts were classified as high risk cases by B-mode-US, but 3D-US and 3DPD-US correctly classified 14% and 57% of cases, respectively. The use of B-mode-US, 3D-US and 3DPD-US correctly classified all four cystadenomas. Only the use of 3DPD-US correctly classified one out of two hemorrhagic corpus luteum cases, whereas the other imaging modalities characterized these lesions as high risk. The overall diagnostic accuracy increased from 38%, 48%, ana 83% with the application of B-mode-US alone, or combined with 3D-US and 3DPD-US, respectively.Conventional ultrasound supplemented with 3D-US and 3DPD-US and the evaluation of findings according to a specific scoring system can facilitate the preoperative classification of complex benign ovarian lesions.The value of pelvic MRI in the diagnosis of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration in cases of deep pelvic endometriosis.The objective of our study was to define relevant MRI signs allowing preoperative diagnosis of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration in patients with deep pelvic endometriosis.This retrospective study included patients who underwent pelvic MRI completed by a laparoscopic examination. Three radiologists performed the MRI review blinded and recorded the following signs: sign 1, retroflexed uterus; sign 2, retrouterine mass; sign 3, displacement of intraperitoneal fluid; sign 4, elevation of the fornix; and sign 5, adherence of bowel loops. Laparoscopic results provided the criterion standard for diagnosis of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration. The performance of MRI was evaluated by calculating the average sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of MRI results of the two more experienced radiologists for each sign and for combinations of signs. Interobserver agreement for each sign and impression for posterior cul-de-sac obliteration were calculated for all radiologists.Sixty-three patients were included in the study. Posterior cul-de-sac obliteration was diagnosed in 43 patients at laparoscopy. The mean sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of each sign and impression of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration were, respectively, as follows: sign 1, 24.4%, 77.5%, 41.3%; sign 2, 97.1%, 83.7%, 92.8%; sign 3, 95.0%, 88.7%, 93.1%; sign 4, 30.2%, 97.5%, 51.6%; sign 5, 83.7%, 91.2%, 86.1%; and impression of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration, 91.9%, 91.2%, 91.7%. Interobserver concordance varied from 0.26 to 0.81 with best results obtained with the combination of signs 2, 3, and 5. Best concordances for junior radiologist evaluations were obtained with assessment of sign 3.MRI allows posterior cul-de-sac obliteration diagnosis. Pelvic fluid displacement may be the sign with greatest utility when considering both diagnostic accuracy and interobserver agreement.[Preoperative imaging of deeply infiltrating endometriosis in: Transvaginal sonography, rectal endoscopic sonography and magnetic resonance imaging].Compare the accuracy of transvaginal ultrasonography (TVUS), rectal endoscopic sonography (RES), and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) before deeply infiltrating endometriosis surgery.A retrospective study with 25 deeply endometriosis patients underwent the three imaging examinations before surgery. Calculation of sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy for the different locations: ovaries, uterosacral ligaments and torus, rectovaginal septum, rectosigmoid junction, bladder.Ovarian and deep pelvic endometriosis was found in surgery and confirmed by histology in all patients. Sensitivity and specificity are respectively: for ovaries: 88.2% and 71% of TVUS; 80% and 81.2% of RES; 87.5% and 71% of MRI. For uterosacral ligaments: 63% and 82,6% of TVUS; 37% and 100% of RES; 69% and 82.6% of MRI. For torus: 57.1% and 100% of TVUS; 76.2% and 100% of RES; 76.2% and 100% of MRI. For rectovaginal septum: 63.2% and 100% for TVUS; 89.5% and 66.7% of EER; 47.4% and 100% of MRI. For rectosigmoid junction: 73.7% and 66.7% of TVUS; 94.7% and 66.7% of RES; 89.5% and 50% of MRI. For bladder: 16.7% and 100% of TVUS; 16.7% and 100% of RES; 33.3% and 89.5% of MRI.We found that TVUS is the more performant for endometriomas, it is MRI for torus, uterosacral ligaments and little bladder lesions, RES for rectovaginal septum and rectosigmoid junction. So in the clinical practice, the three imaging examinations are complementary for the preoperative assessment of deeply endometriosis.Beyond laparoscopy: 3-T magnetic resonance imaging in the evaluation of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration.Endometriosis is the ectopic localization of endometrial glands. Symptoms include a wide variety of chronic pelvic pain. Ovarian endometriosis represents the most frequent site of implantation followed by the Douglas pouch which is undepicted unless peritoneal fluid is present. Pelvic exams may be reported as normal in 40% of evaluations, although multiple nodularities are located in this region. Nowadays, laparoscopy represents the standard technique for endometriosis evaluation. However, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) remains the best noninvasive technique for the evaluation of pelvic lesions. According to the importance of a precise preoperative diagnosis of deep infiltrative endometriosis involving the Douglas pouch, we evaluated feasibility of a 3-T system in the evaluation of this particular region.We enrolled 19 women coming with either ultrasound or anamnestic suspicion of endometriosis. Pelvic MRI examination was performed on the 3-T system. We applied a standard exam protocol including pulse sequences [single-shot fast spin echo (FSE)] and high-resolution T2W and T1W FSE sequences with and without FS.MRI diagnosed posterior cul-de-sac obliteration in 15/19 patients. MRI findings were compared with laparoscopy, thus obtaining the following statistical values: mean sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value, respectively, of 93%, 75%, 93% and 75%. Moreover, we calculated an interobserver agreement k value of 0.72 with a substantial degree of agreement between two radiologists of a sensitivity value of 93% and specificity value of 75%.Precise preoperative mapping of posterior cul-de-sac region is essential for a preoperative planning. In our work, the 3-T MRI was shown to be excellent in the evaluation of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration associated to an optimal evaluation of the uterosacral ligaments due to the higher contrast spatial resolution.The value of MRI in assessing parametrial involvement in endometriosis.What is the accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the diagnosis of parametrial endometriosis in comparison with surgicopathological findings?MRI displayed an accuracy of 96.4% in the preoperative diagnosis of parametrial involvement by deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).MRI is the best technique for preoperative mapping of DIE. This preliminary paper shows that T2-weighted MRI is a valuable tool for the preoperative evaluation of parametrial involvement by endometriosis.A retrospective study of an MRI database was used to identify examinations performed in women, who had a clinical suspicion of pelvic endometriosis (n=666), between 2005 and 2009 in a university medical centre in France.Exclusion criteria were previous surgery for DIE, incomplete surgical evaluation, repeat MRI examinations and incomplete MR protocol. Only symptomatic patients who underwent surgery with a pathological correlation were included (n=83). An experienced radiologist, blind to the surgical and histological findings, evaluated sagittal, axial and thin-section oblique axial MR images obtained from the 83 patients.Descriptive statistics and Fisher exact test were used.The prevalence of DIE and parametrial endometriosis was 76/83 (91.6%) and 12/83 (14.5%), respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, accuracy and positive and negative likelihood ratios for the diagnosis of parametrial endometriosis of low signal intensity on T2-weighted MRI, pelvic wall involvement and ureteral dilatation, were 83.3%, 98.6%, 90.9%, 97.2%, 96.4%, 59.2 and 0.17, 58.3%, 98.6%, 87.5%, 93.3%, 92.8%, 41.4 and 0.42 and 16.7%, 100%, 100%, 87.7%, 88%, infinity and 0.83, respectively, with the patient as the unit of analysis. BIAS AND LIMITATIONS: The study design was retrospective, and thus prone to bias. Only one experienced reader performed the analysis, so no data are available on intra- or interobserver variability. GENERALISABILITY: At present, no consensus exists on the optimal MR protocol to be used for the evaluation of DIE, thus limiting the wider implications of this study.No funding was obtained for this study. The authors have no conflict of interest.Transvaginal ultrasonography of rectosigmoid endometriosis: interobserver variation of lesion size.This study evaluates the interobserver variation of transvaginal ultrasonographic measurements of the size of deep infiltrating endometriosis lesions in the rectosigmoid wall performed by an experienced and a less experienced sonographer. Fifteen outpatient women were seen for a gynecologic examination and 24 women were seen with rectosigmoid endometriosis. Transvaginal ultrasonography was performed independently by two observers with a focus on the presence and size of rectosigmoid endometriosis. The senior observer had several years of experience, whereas the junior observer was a medical student with no prior experience in transvaginal ultrasonography. The findings of the two observers were identical concerning the identification of rectosigmoid endometriosis. The probability of differences in size within 30% of the mean was 0.81, 0.63 and 0.61 for length, width and depth, respectively. Our data suggest that fair skills in this technique can be acquired by inexperienced examiners within a short period of time.Deep infiltrating endometriosis of the bowel: MR imaging as a method to predict muscular invasion.To evaluate magnetic resonance (MR) imaging morphologic- and signal intensity abnormalities of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) of the bowel wall and to assess its value in predicting depth and extent of bowel wall infiltration.This single-center study was performed in a tertiary referral center for endometriosis. All patients (n = 28) who underwent segmental bowel resection (2004-2010) were retrospectively studied. MR images were analyzed by two experienced readers independently (number of lesions, location, size, signal intensity, and depth of bowel wall infiltration) and this was correlated with histopathology.The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy for diagnosis of endometriosis infiltrating the muscular layer of the bowel were 100%, 75%, 96%, 100%, and 96%, respectively. The inter-rater agreement was 0.84. "Fan shaped" configurations with hypointensity on T2- and T1-weighted imaging were characteristic for thickening of indigenous smooth muscle and smooth muscle hyperplasia at histopathology, as a consequence of infiltration by endometriosis. Thickening of the (sub)mucosa corresponded to edema with or without infiltration of endometriosis.MR imaging at 1.5 Tesla is useful to predict muscular infiltration of the bowel in endometriosis, whereas it is of limited value in diagnosis of (sub)mucosal infiltration.Deeply infiltrating endometriosis: evaluation of retro-cervical space on MRI after vaginal opacification.To prospectively investigate diagnostic value and tolerability of MRI after intra-vaginal gel opacification for diagnosis and preoperative assessment of deeply infiltrating endometriosis.Sixty-three women with clinical suspicion of deeply infiltrating endometriosis were previously examined with trans-vaginal ultrasonography and then with MRI pre and post administration of vaginal gel. We evaluated the tolerability of this procedure with a scoring scale from 0 to 3. We also assessed with a score from 1 to 4 the visibility of four regions: Douglas-pouch, utero-sacral-ligaments, posterior-vaginal-fornix and recto-vaginal-septum. All patients underwent laparoscopic surgery after MRI.Five patients considered procedure intolerable. Visibility of utero-sacral-ligaments and posterior-vaginal-fornix showed to be increased with gel (p<0.001). In 57 out of 80 patients the MRI has allowed us to diagnose deeply infiltrating endometriosis. Overall, the percentages of MRI-sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were respectively 67.8%, 95.3%, 89.4 and 83.5% without gel, and 90.8%, 94.6%, 90.8% and 94.6% with gel; trans-vaginal ultrasonography sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 57.5%, 96.6%, 90.9% and 79.5%. In evaluation of utero-sacral-ligaments trans-vaginal ultrasonography, MRI without gel and with gel sensitivity was respectively 61.9%, 47.6% and 81%; for recto-vaginal-septum these values were 12.5%, 68.7% and 93.7%; for pouch of Douglas 82%, 87% and 97.4%; finally for posterior-vaginal-fornix 27.3%, 36.4% and 81.8%.MRI with gel opacification of vagina should be recommended for suspicion of deep infiltrating endometriosis, in particular for the added value in evaluation of recto-vaginal septum, utero-sacral ligaments and posterior vaginal fornix.Feasibility of 3.0T pelvic MR imaging in the evaluation of endometriosis.Endometriosis represents an important clinical problem in women of reproductive age with high impact on quality of life, work productivity and health care management. The aim of this study is to define the role of 3T magnetom system MRI in the evaluation of endometriosis.Forty-six women, with transvaginal (TV) ultrasound examination positive for endometriosis, with pelvic pain, or infertile underwent an MR 3.0T examination with the following protocol: T2 weighted FRFSE HR sequences, T2 weighted FRFSE HR CUBE 3D sequences, T1 w FSE sequences, LAVA-flex sequences. Pelvic anatomy, macroscopic endometriosis implants, deep endometriosis implants, fallopian tube involvement, adhesions presence, fluid effusion in Douglas pouch, uterus and kidney pathologies or anomalies associated and sacral nervous routes were considered by two radiologists in consensus. Laparoscopy was considered the gold standard.MRI imaging diagnosed deep endometriosis in 22/46 patients, endometriomas not associated to deep implants in 9/46 patients, 15/46 patients resulted negative for endometriosis, 11 of 22 patients with deep endometriosis reported ovarian endometriosis cyst. We obtained high percentages of sensibility (96.97%), specificity (100.00%), VPP (100.00%), VPN (92.86%).Pelvic MRI performed with 3T system guarantees high spatial and contrast resolution, providing accurate information about endometriosis implants, with a good pre-surgery mapping of the lesions involving both bowels and bladder surface and recto-uterine ligaments.Evaluation of MR diffusion-weighted imaging in differentiating endometriosis infiltrating the bowel from colorectal carcinoma.Endometriosis infiltrating the bowel may be difficult to differentiate from colorectal carcinoma in cases that present with non-specific clinical and imaging features. The aim of this study is to assess the value of MR diffusion-weighted imaging (DWI) in differentiating endometriosis infiltrating the bowel from colorectal carcinoma.In 66 patients, MR DWI was added to the standard imaging protocol in patients visiting our outdoor MR clinic for the analysis of suspected or known deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE). In patients diagnosed with DIE infiltrating the bowel on MR imaging, high b-value diffusion-weighted images were qualitatively assessed by two readers in consensus and compared to high b-value diffusion weighted images in 15 patients evaluated for colorectal carcinoma. In addition, ADC values of lesions were calculated, using b-values of 50, 400 and 800 s/mm(2).A total of 15 patients were diagnosed with DIE infiltrating the bowel on MR imaging. Endometriosis infiltrating the bowel showed low signal intensity on high b-value diffusion-weighted images in all patients, whereas colorectal carcinoma showed high signal intensity on high b-value diffusion-weighted images in all patients. Mean ADC value in endometriosis infiltrating the bowel (0.80 ± 0.06 × 10(-3)mm(2)/s) was significantly lower compared to mean ADC value in colorectal carcinoma (0.86 ± 0.06 × 10(-3 )mm(2)/s), but with considerable overlap between ADC values.Only qualitative assessment of MR DWI may be valuable to facilitate differentiation between endometriosis infiltrating the bowel and colorectal carcinoma.Adding cancer antigen 125 screening to gray scale sonography for predicting specific diagnosis of benign adnexal masses in premenopausal women: is it worthwhile?The purpose of this study was to assess whether a single determination of the serum cancer antigen 125 (CA-125) level provides additional information to sonography for specific diagnosis of benign adnexal masses in premenopausal women.We conducted a retrospective study comprising 1058 premenopausal women (mean age, 34.8 years) with histologically proven benign adnexal masses. All women had undergone transvaginal sonography and serum CA-125 determination within 1 week before surgery and tumor removal. According to "pattern recognition" analysis, a presumptive diagnosis was provided on gray scale transvaginal sonography for all masses. Positive and negative likelihood ratios were calculated for gray scale sonography and gray scale sonography plus CA-125.Eighty-five women had bilateral masses (1143 masses analyzed). In 7 women with bilateral masses, the histologic diagnoses of the masses were discordant and were excluded. Histologic diagnoses were as follows: endometrioma, n = 452; dermoid cyst, n = 180; serous cyst, n = 158; hemorrhagic cyst, n = 119; mucinous cyst, n = 54; hydrosalpinx, n = 37; and other, n = 109. The median CA-125 level was significantly higher in endometrioma (71.9 IU/mL; range: 5-2620 IU/mL) and hydrosalpinx (59.2 IU/mL; range, 5-601 IU/mL) compared to all other tumor types (P < .001). The CA-125 level was 35 IU/mL or higher in 74% of endometriomas, 58% of hydrosalpinges, 34% of hemorrhagic cysts, 18% of mucinous cysts, 14% of dermoid cysts, and 8% of serous cysts. The positive and negative likelihood ratios for sonography and sonography plus CA-125 (335 IU/mL) for each kind of tumor were not statistically different except for endometrioma, for which the positive likelihood ratio for sonography plus CA-125 (55.0; 95% confidence interval, 27.5-109.9) was significantly higher than for sonography alone (19.2; 95% confidence interval, 13.6-27.1).Cancer antigen 125 screening does not add useful information for specific diagnosis of benign adnexal tumors, except for endometrioma. An elevated CA-125 level significantly increases the probability of such a lesion.[Prospective study of the correlation of ultrasonography and CA125 in the management of ovarian cysts: a study of 77 cases].To study the correlation between ultrasound, Doppler,measurement of CA 125 and histology in the preoperative diagnosis of ovarian cysts.Prospective and analytical study about 77 patients in whom we analyzed the contribution of ultrasound, the assay of CA125, the couple CA125 ultrasonography and laparoscopy in the diagnosis and management of cysts the ovary. The value of CA125 was considered pathological like the one adopted by our biochemistry laboratory of the CHU Habib Bourguiba, Sfax (> 35 UI / ml).The mean age was 35.6 years. On the whole, ultrasound has a sensitivity of 71.41% and a specificity of 80%. The positive predictive value was 35.71% and negative predictive value was 96.55%. The sensitivity of CA125 to detect malignant lesions among ovarian cysts was 85.71% and a specificity of 85.93%. The PPV was low (42.85%). The combination Ultrasound-CA125 had a sensitivity of 85.7%, a specificity of 82.8%, a PPV and NPV respectively 35.3% and 98.1%. The concordance between the macroscopic perlaparoscopic and histological diagnosis of different tumors was 83.3% for functional cysts, 77.7% for serous cysts, and 100% for dermoid cysts, endometriosis and bleeding.The contribution of Doppler ultrasound and tumor markers is essential in the diagnosis of ovarian cysts.Comparison of transvaginal sonography and double-contrast barium enema for diagnosing deep infiltrating endometriosis of the posterior compartment.To compare the diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) and double-contrast barium enema (DCBE) in the preoperative detection of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) of the posterior compartment.This was a prospective study of 69 consecutive patients with results of pelvic examination or symptoms suggestive of DIE of the posterior compartment. TVS and DCBE were performed before surgery by two groups of physicians specialized in endometriosis, each blinded to the results of the other technique. Imaging data were compared with histopathologic analysis of the resected specimen (gold standard). Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values and test accuracies were calculated for both imaging modalities.Sixty seven of the 69 women had a nodule of DIE confirmed at laparoscopy and histopathologic examination. TVS diagnosed DIE in 57 (85%) of these patients, while DCBE revealed the presence of the lesion in 24 (36%) women. For the diagnosis of posterior DIE, TVS and DCBE had, respectively, a sensitivity of 85% and 36%, specificity of 100% and 100%, positive predictive value of 100% and 100%, negative predictive value of 17% and 4% and accuracy of 85.5% and 38%. In patients with pure bowel DIE the sensitivity was 91% and 43%, specificity was 100% and 100%, positive predictive value was 100% and 100%, negative predictive value was 29% and 6% and accuracy was 91% and 45%, respectively.TVS has a much higher sensitivity than does DCBE in detecting the presence of posterior DIE and should thus be regarded as the imaging modality of choice when there is clinical suspicion of the disease.Transvaginal sonography vs. clinical examination in the preoperative diagnosis of deep infiltrating endometriosis.The aim of this study was to compare the diagnostic performance of clinical vaginal examination with that of transvaginal sonography (TVS) in the presurgical diagnosis of deep infiltrating endometriosis.One-hundred and fifty-five women with symptoms suggestive of endometriosis were included. One-hundred and twenty-nine patients met the inclusion criteria and were prospectively and independently assessed by vaginal examination and TVS prior to a diagnostic laparoscopy and, where appropriate, radical resection and histological confirmation of endometriosis was performed. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive values (PPV), negative predictive values (NPV) and positive and negative likelihood ratios (LR+ and LR-) were calculated for each test method.In total, 83 (64%) women had histological confirmation of endometriosis, 52 (40%) of whom had deep infiltrating endometriosis. The prevalence of endometriosis on the uterosacral ligaments, pouch of Douglas, vagina, bladder, rectovaginal space and rectosigmoid was 23.3%, 16.3%, 8.5%, 3.1%, 6.9% and 24%. PPV, NPV, LR+ and LR- for vaginal examination were 92%, 87%, 41.56 and 0.60 for ovarian endometriosis; 43%, 84%, 2.48 and 0.63 for uterosacral ligament disease; 64%, 95%, 9.14 and 0.26 for involvement of the pouch of Douglas; 80%, 97%, 42.91 and 0.28 for vaginal endometriosis; 78%, 98%, 46.67 and 0.23 for endometriosis of the rectovaginal space; 100%, 98%, 75.60 and 0.75 for bladder involvement; 86%, 84%, 18.97 and 0.63 for rectosigmoidal endometriosis. Values for TVS were similar with regard to vaginal and rectovaginal space endometriosis, but were clearly superior to vaginal examination in cases of ovarian (87%, 99%, 24.56 and 0.04), uterosacral ligament (91%, 90%, 31.35 and 0.37) and rectosigmoidal (97%, 97%, 88.51 and 0.1) endometriosis.TVS is a more useful test than is vaginal examination in detecting endometriosis in the ovaries and rectosigmoid.Multidetector computerized tomography enteroclysis vs. rectal water contrast transvaginal ultrasonography in determining the presence and extent of bowel endometriosis.To compare the accuracy of multidetector computerized tomography enteroclysis (MDCT-e) and rectal water contrast transvaginal ultrasonography (RWC-TVS) in determining the presence and extent of bowel endometriosis.This prospective study included 96 patients of reproductive age with suspicion of bowel endometriosis. Patients underwent MDCT-e and RWC-TVS before operative laparoscopy. Findings of MDCT-e and RWC-TVS were compared with histological results. The severity of pain experienced during MDCT-e and RWC-TVS was measured by a 10-cm visual analog scale.Fifty-one patients had bowel endometriotic nodules at surgery. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy for the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis were 95.8% (46/48), 100.0% (48/48), 100.0% (46/46), 96.0% (48/50) and 97.9% (94/96) for MDCT-e and 93.8% (45/48), 97.9% (47/48), 97.8% (45/46), 94.0% (47/50) and 95.8% (92/96) for RWC-TVS. MDCT-e was associated with more intense pain than was RWC-TVS.MDCT-e and RWC-TVS have similar accuracy in the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis, but patients tolerate RWC-TVS better than they do MDCT-e.Diagnosis of colorectal endometriosis: contribution of contrast enhanced MR-colonography.To investigate the contribution of contrast-enhanced MR-colonography (CE-MR-C) for the diagnosis of intestinal endometriosis.One hundred and four women with suspected endometriosis were prospectively enrolled. All patients were subjected to MRI consisting of two phases: pelvic high-resolution MRI (HR-MRI) followed by CE-MR-C after colonic distension using a 1.5-liter water enema and injection of 0.15 ml/kg of 0.5 M gadolinium-DTPA with T1w high-resolution isotropic volume (THRIVE) and balanced turbo field echo (BTFE) images. HR-MRI and CE-MR-C were considered as two datasets, which were independently reviewed by two radiologists with 12 and 2 years' experience respectively. The presence of deep pelvic endometriotic lesions with particular attention to colorectal involvement was recorded.MRI findings correlated with laparoscopy in all cases. Thanks to CE-MR-C images, sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and accuracy for diagnosis of colorectal endometriosis increased from 76%, 96%, 84%, 93% and 91%, to 95%, 97%, 91%, 99% and 97% for the most experienced radiologist and from 62%, 93%, 72%, 89% and 85%, to 86%, 94%, 82%, 96% and 92% for the less experienced radiologist; moreover, the interobserver agreement increased from 0.63 to 0.80 (Cohen's K test).CE-MR-C allows easier recognition of colorectal endometriosis and higher interobserver agreement.Evaluation of 18FDG PET-CT in the diagnosis of endometriosis: a prospective study.Noninvasive techniques have poor sensitivity and specificity in diagnosing endometriosis, which is often associated with an inflammatory process. In several benign diseases, measurement of hypermetabolism using fluorodeoxyglucose (18F 18FDG) reflects the degree of inflammation and aggressiveness of the disease. This prospective study evaluated the value of (18)FDG positron emission tomography (PET)-computed tomography (CT) in assessing the presence of endometriosis.Ten consecutive patients suspected with endometriosis were prospectively included in this study. A preoperative 18FDG PET-CT was performed in all the patients during the follicular phase of their cycle, which preceded laparoscopic surgery. Surgical endometriosis staging and histopathological analysis of removed tissue were confronted with the results from 18FDG PET-CT.Of the 10 patients, 9 had endometriosis confirmed by laparoscopy; 6 had advanced stage of the disease and 5 had histologically proven lesions. Nevertheless, none of the patients had 18FDG-demonstrated hypermetabolism at PET-CT.In this preliminary series, we did not observe hypermetabolic activity in relation to endometriosis using 18FDG PET-CT. This study's most important limitation is the use of 18FDG as an isotopic tracer, which is not specific to endometrial tissue.Deep pelvic endometriosis: limited additional diagnostic value of postcontrast in comparison with conventional MR images.To determine the value of postcontrast MR imaging (MRI) in cases of suspected pelvic endometriosis by assessing interobserver variability of MR imaging according to the endometriotic locations.This retrospective study included 158 patients with clinical suspicion of endometriosis who had undergone surgery after MRI between January 2004 and April 2009. Three radiologists with different degrees of experience were independently asked to determine the presence of rectosigmoid colon, vaginal, and bladder endometriosis using both conventional and a combination of conventional and postcontrast MRI. Descriptive analysis, ROC analysis and interobserver agreements (kappa values) were calculated.Rectosigmoid colon, vaginal, and bladder endometriosis was present in 65, 39 and eight patients, respectively. The accuracy of conventional assessment for readers 1, 2, and 3 for rectosigmoid colon, vaginal and bladder endometriosis was 77.2%, 74.1% and 96.8%, and 73.4%, 76.6% and 98.7%, and 86.1%, 88.6% and 99.4%, respectively. The accuracy of conventional and postcontrast MR images for readers 1, 2, and 3 for rectosigmoid colon, vaginal and bladder endometriosis was 77.8%, 78.5% and 98.1%, and 83.5%, 83.5% and 99.4%, and 87.3%, 89.2% and 99.4%, respectively.Interobserver variability of MRI using conventional MRI alone is excellent for the diagnosis of DPE. No significant benefit of intravenous gadolinium, rectal or vaginal administration has been demonstrated.Endoscopic rectal ultrasound and elastosonography are useful in flow chart for the diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis with rectal involvement.Endometriosis is defined by the presence of endometrial glands and stroma outside the uterus. The disease causes pelvic pain, dysmenorrhea, dyspareunia, dyschezia and urinary symptoms. The aim of this study was to assess the usefulness of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and elastosonography for detecting rectosigmoid endometriosis and to compare the findings, in selected and symptomatic patients, with surgical specimens in order to select the best surgical strategy.Sixty-three consecutive patients (mean age 34.2; range 25-50 years) with diagnosis of endometriosis were referred for rectal endosonography to evaluate the rectal involvement. Patients complained of abdominal pain, rectal bleeding, constipation and dysmenorrhea. Sub-stenosis of the rectosigmoid lumen was found endoscopically in one patient (1.5%), bulging in 21 (33.3%), mucosal hyperemia or edema in one (1.5%), and no lesions in 39 patients (61.9%); no abdominal masses or obstruction were reported. Each woman completed a self-administered 100-point questionnaire to evaluate endometriosis-related pain (intensity of symptoms: 0 = absent, 100 = unbearable). After clinical imaging evaluation, 10 symptomatic patients (mean age 32.2; range 26-45 years) were evaluated for surgery.EUS detected endometriotic lesions in all patients as a hypoechoic mass, poorly vascularized with irregular, undefined margins. In cases where the rectosigmoid wall was involved, there was invasion of the fourth layer. All patients who were operated had histologic findings of endometriotic lesions involving the rectal wall, as indicated by EUS.EUS and elastosonography offers a non-invasive and sensitive technique to better define the endometriotic infiltration in the rectosigmoid wall.Value of thin-section oblique axial T2-weighted magnetic resonance images to assess uterosacral ligament endometriosis.Thin-section oblique axial magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is useful in staging endometrial and cervical carcinomas but there are no data on its contribution to assessing deep endometriosis. We evaluated the contribution of this MRI technique to diagnosis of uterosacral ligament (USL) endometriosis.In this retrospective study, two radiologists, who were blinded to the surgical and histological results, compared the results from conventional sagittal and axial MRI with those from conventional plus thin-section (3 mm) oblique axial MRI in 100 symptomatic patients. Descriptive statistical analyses including sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, accuracy and positive and negative likelihood ratios were performed. Kappa for inter-observer agreement was calculated.Conventional MR images for the diagnosis of left/right USL endometriosis revealed accuracies of 69/76 and 59/75%, sensitivities of 66/71 and 52/71% and specificities of 76/86 and 76/82% for senior and junior readers, respectively. The combination of conventional and thin-section oblique axial MR images revealed accuracies of 82/87 and 74/81%, sensitivities of 89/93 and 73/81% and specificities of 61/72 and 76/79%, for senior and junior readers, respectively. When conventional MRI combined with oblique axial T2-weighted MRI was compared with conventional MRI use only, significant differences in diagnostic accuracies were observed for right (P = 0.04) and left (P = 0.01) USL endometriosis.Thin-section oblique axial T2-weighted imaging can improve the success of conventional MRI for assessment of USL endometriosis. Further prospective studies are required before this new MR protocol is performed routinely for suspected pelvic endometriosis.Learning curve in the detection of ovarian and deep endometriosis by using Magnetic Resonance: comparison with surgical results.Determining if Magnetic Resonance Imaging (MRI) accuracy in diagnosing endometriosis is related to radiologist's expertise.Written informed consent was obtained from all patients. This study is compliant to STARD method. Thirty patients (mean age 34; range 21-45 years) who had undergone MRI study for suspected endometriosis underwent surgery were retrospectively evaluated. MRI at 1.5T was performed with SE and TSE sequences, T1 and T2-weighted with and without fat suppression. Four localizations were analyzed: ovary, uterosacral ligaments (USL), vaginal fornix and Rectum\Sigma\Douglas (R.S.D.). One radiologist evaluated each dataset; sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV, accuracy, LR+ and LR- were calculated according to the surgical results (first analysis). Dataset were then re-analyzed 12 months (second analysis) and 24 months (third analysis) later. McNemar test was applied to determine differences between the three analysis.Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy for the ovary at the first analysis were 88.9%, 87% and 88%, at the second 92.6%, 87% and 90% whereas at the third 92.6%, 91.3% and 92%. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy for the USLs at the first analysis were 62.5%, 76.9% and 70%, at the second 72%, 80.8% and 76% whereas at the third 80%, 84.6% and 82%. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy for the vaginal fornix at the first analysis were 63.2%, 64.5% and 64%, at the second 73.7%, 77.4% and 76% whereas at the third 73.7%, 83.9% and 80%. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy for the R.S.D. at the first analysis were 39.1%, 81.5% and 62%, at the second 62.5%, 85.2% and 76% whereas at the third 73.9%, 88.9% and 82%. McNemar test indicated a significant statistical difference in sensitivity in detecting nodules of endometriosis in R.S.D. between first and third analysis (p=0.0215). The mean review time decreased (p=0.0001).Accuracy of MRI in diagnosing endometriosis increased with radiologist's expertise and the improvement was statistically significant in determining RSD involvement.Magnetic resonance imaging in the evaluation of (deep infiltrating) endometriosis: the value of diffusion-weighted imaging.To assess the value of magnetic resonance (MR)diffusion-weighted imaging (DWI) in the evaluation of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).In a prospective single-center study, DWI was added to the standard MRI protocol in 56 consecutive patients with known or suspected endometriosis. Endometriotic lesions as well as (functional) ovarian cysts were analyzed for location, size, and signal intensity on T1, T2, and DWI. Apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) values were calculated using b-values of 50, 400, 800,and 1200 s/mm(2). Statistical analysis included the Spearman correlation coefficient, Mann-Whitney U, and Kruskal-Wallis tests.A total of 110 lesions (62 endometrial cysts and 48 DIE) were detected, 60 of which were large enough to analyze. Mean ADC values of endometrial cysts and functional ovarian cysts were 1.10 x 10(-3)/mm(2)/s and 2.14 x 10(-3)/mm(2)/s, respectively. Mean ADC values of DIE retrocervical, infiltrating the colon, and bladder were 0.70 x 10(-3)/mm(2)/s, 0.77 x 10(-3)/mm(2)/s, and 0.79 x 10(-3)/mm(2)/s, respectively. ADC values of DIE did not show a significant difference between varying pelvic locations (P = 0.63).Results of our study suggest that ADC values of DIE are consistently low, without significant difference between pelvic locations.Value of transvaginal ultrasound in assessing severity of pelvic endometriosis.The objective of this study was to examine the ability of preoperative transvaginal ultrasound (TVS) scanning to assess the severity of pelvic endometriosis.Consecutive women with clinically suspected or proven pelvic endometriosis, who were booked for laparoscopy, were invited to join the study. The severity of endometriosis was assessed preoperatively using TVS and the findings were compared with the results obtained by laparoscopy using the American Society for Reproductive Medicine (ASRM) classification.In total, 201 women had preoperative TVS and laparoscopies. Of these, no endometriosis was found at laparoscopy for 62/201 (30.8%; 95% CI, 24.8-37.5), whereas 33/201 (16.4%; 95% CI, 11.9-22.2) had minimal endometriosis, 31/201 (15.4%; 95% CI, 11.1-21.1) had mild endometriosis, 27/201 (13.4%; 95% CI, 9.4-18.8) had moderate endometriosis and 48/201 (23.9%; 95% CI, 18.5-30.2) had severe endometriosis. The sensitivity and specificity of the TVS diagnosis of severe pelvic endometriosis were 0.85 (95% CI, 0.716-0.934) and 0.98 (95% CI, 0.939-0.994), respectively, and the positive and negative likelihood ratios were 43.5 (95% CI, 14.1-134) and 0.15 (95% CI, 0.075-0.295), respectively. Overall, there was a good level of agreement between ultrasound and laparoscopy in identifying absent, minimal, mild, moderate and severe disease (quadratic weighted kappa = 0.786). The mean ASRM score difference between TVS and laparoscopy in assessing severity of endometriosis was -2.398 (95% CI, -4.685 to -0.1112) and the limits of agreement were -34.62 (95% CI, -38.54 to -30.709) to 29.83 (95% CI, 25.91-33.74).TVS is a good test for assessing the severity of pelvic endometriosis. TVS is particularly accurate in detecting severe disease, which could facilitate more effective triaging of women for appropriate surgical care.Deep infiltrating endometriosis: CT imaging evaluation.To retrospectively evaluate the feasibility of computed tomography (CT) in depicting deep-infiltrating endometriosis.The study population included 54 patients (age: mean, 35.5 years; range, 23-48 years) with histologically confirmed ovarian endometriomas between January 2007 and July 2009. All the patients underwent preoperative CT imaging before laparotomy or laparoscopy. The CT images were evaluated for the presence of a tethered appearance of the rectum in the direction of the uterus, stranding of periuterine pelvic fat, thickening of the uterosacral ligament, and retroflexed uterus. Two radiologists performed a blinded and independent review for each CT finding. The sensitivity, the specificity, the positive predictive value, the negative predictive value, and the accuracy of each CT finding and kappa statistics were determined.Deep-infiltrating endometriosis was confirmed after surgery and pathologic examination in 34 patients (63.0%). The most specific finding for the diagnosis of deep-infiltrating endometriosis was tethered appearance of rectum in the direction of the uterus (90.0%). The mean sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy values of all the CT findings except that of retroflexed uterus were 56.9%, 70.0%, 78.1%, 60.4%, and 61.7%, respectively. The mean kappa value was 0.82 (range, 0.67-0.96).Computed tomographic imaging may constitute another potential option as a complementary imaging modality for the evaluation of deep-infiltrating endometriosis.Agreement and reproducibility in identification of endometriosis using magnetic resonance imaging.Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is a promising technique in the study of endometriosis, allowing a complete mapping of lesions before surgery. However, the value of MRI in the diagnosis of endometriosis in the bladder, in superficial peritoneal lesions, and in ovarian foci and uterosacral ligaments is still under debate.To assess inter- and intra-observer agreement in the evaluation of endometriosis in different anatomical locations using MRI.From June 2006 to February 2008, 83 female patients (mean age 39, range 19-49 years) who had undergone MRI examination for suspected endometriosis were evaluated by two radiologists. MRI at 1.5 Tesla was performed with SE and TSE sequences, T1- and T2-weighted with and without fat suppression. Each examination was completed with gadolinium administration. Each dataset was independently evaluated by the radiologists for the presence or absence of endometriosis. The location (ovaries, uterosacral ligaments (USLs), pouch of Douglas, vagina, rectosigmoid, rectovaginal septum, and bladder) of suspected lesions was recorded. Cohen kappa statistical analysis was performed to calculate agreement between measurements. After 2 months the data were analyzed again by the two observers to assess intra-observer agreement.Of the 83 MRI examinations performed, 12 patients demonstrated no evidence of endometriosis. In the remaining 71 studies, 157 endometriotic lesions ranging in size from 0.4 to 6.2 cm were detected. Of the 157 lesions, 53 (33.75% incidence) were smaller than 1 cm. In the ovaries, the inter-observer agreement was 92.77% and the kappa value was 0.802 (95% CI, 0.695-0.91). In the bladder the inter-observer agreement was 96.39% and the kappa value was 0.553 (95% CI 0.056-1). In the USLs the inter-observer agreement was 90.96% and the kappa value 0.583 (95% CI, 0.381-0.784). In the rectovaginal septum the inter-observer agreement was 94.58% and the kappa value 0.739 (95% CI, 0.572-0.905). In the rectovaginal pouch the inter-observer agreement was 88.55% and the kappa value 0.608 (95% CI, 0.443-0.774). In the vaginal fornix the inter-observer agreement was 94.58% and the kappa value 0.726 (95% CI, 0.552-0.901). In the rectosigmoid the inter-observer agreement was 89.76% and the kappa value 0.589 (95% CI, 0.389-0.768).The results of our study indicate that MRI has a high inter- and intra-observer agreement in the identification of endometriosis located in the ovary, rectosigmoid, and rectovaginal septum, whereas the agreement is suboptimal for the identification of endometriosis located in the USLs.Preoperative assessment of intestinal endometriosis: A comparison of transvaginal sonography with water-contrast in the rectum, transrectal sonography, and barium enema.To evaluate the accuracy of Transrectal Sonography (TRS) and a new technique, Transvaginal Sonography with Water-Contrast in the Rectum (RWC-TVS), in the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis, and the accuracy of Barium Enema (BE) and RWC-TVS in the detection of intestinal stenosis due to endometriosis. In a prospective study, we compared the findings of TRS and RWC-TVS performed before surgery with the operative and pathologic findings in 61 consecutive patients who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy for suspected rectosigmoid endometriosis. The accuracy of BE and RWC-TVS in the detection of intestinal stenosis was evaluated comparing the radiologic and ultrasonographic results with the macroscopic findings at surgery and pathology. RWC-TVS diagnosed rectosigmoid endometriosis with the same accuracy of TRS and was equally efficient as BE in the detection of a significant intestinal lumen stenosis. For the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of TRS and RWC-TVS were 88.2% and 96%, 80%, and 90%, 95.7%, and 98%, and 57.1% and 81.8%, respectively. For the detection of intestinal stenosis the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of BE and RWC-TVS were 93.7% and 87.5%, 94.2% and 91.4%, 88.2% and 82.3%, and 97% and 94.1%, respectively. RWC-TVS is a new, simple technique for a single-step and accurate preoperative assessment of rectosigmoid endometriosis.Diagnosis of endometriosis of the rectovaginal septum using introital three-dimensional ultrasonography.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of introital three-dimensional (3D) transvaginal sonography for preoperative detection of rectovaginal septal endometriosis.Ultrasonographic results were compared with surgical and histologic findings.University Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology.This prospective study included 39 women with suspected rectovaginal endometriosis.All patients underwent 3D transvaginal sonography for the evaluation of the rectovaginal septum, before undergoing laparoscopic radical resection of endometriosis. Rectovaginal endometriosis was defined as hypoechoic areas, nodules, or anatomic distortion of this specific location.Sensitivity, specificity, and likelihood ratios (positive or negative) were calculated with 95% confidence intervals (CIs).Surgery associated with histopathologic evaluation revealed deep endometriosis in the rectovaginal septum in 19 patients. The specificity, sensitivity, positive likelihood ratio, and negative likelihood ratio were 94.7% (95% CI, 78.6%-99.7%), 89.5% (95% CI, 73.3%-94.5%), 17.2 (95% CI, 2.51-115), and 0.11 (95% CI, 0.03-0.41), respectively.Introital 3D ultrasonography seems to be an effective method for the diagnosis of endometriosis of the rectovaginal septum and should be included in the preoperative evaluation of patients with clinical suspicion of deep endometriosis.Acoustic streaming cannot discriminate reliably between endometriomas and other types of adnexal lesion: a multicenter study of 633 adnexal masses.To determine the ability of acoustic streaming to discriminate between endometriomas and other adnexal masses.We used data from 1938 patients with an adnexal mass included in Phase 2 of the International Ovarian Tumor Analysis (IOTA) study. All patients had been examined by transvaginal gray-scale and Doppler ultrasound following a standardized research protocol. Assessment of acoustic streaming was voluntary and was carried out only in lesions containing echogenic cyst fluid. Acoustic streaming was defined as movement of particles inside the cyst fluid during gray-scale and/or color Doppler examination provided that the probe had been held still for two seconds to ensure that the movement of the particles was not caused by movement of the probe or the patient. Only centers where acoustic streaming had been evaluated in > 90% of cases were included. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative likelihood ratios (LR+, LR-), and positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV) of acoustic streaming with regard to endometrioma were calculated.460 (24%) masses were excluded because they were examined in centers where </= 90% of the masses with echogenic cyst fluid had been evaluated for the presence of acoustic streaming. Acoustic streaming was evaluated in 633 of 646 lesions containing echogenic cyst fluid. It was present in 19 (9%) of 209 endometriomas and in 55 (13%) of 424 other lesions. This corresponds to a sensitivity of absent acoustic streaming with regard to endometrioma of 91% (190/209), a specificity of 13% (55/424), LR+ of 1.04, LR- of 0.69, PPV of 34% (190/559) and NPV of 74% (55/74).Acoustic streaming cannot discriminate reliably between endometriomas and other adnexal lesions, and the presence of acoustic streaming does not exclude an endometrioma.Transvaginal ultrasonography with bowel preparation is able to predict the number of lesions and rectosigmoid layers affected in cases of deep endometriosis, defining surgical strategy.Successful surgical treatment of deep bowel endometriosis depends on obtaining detailed information about the lesions, prior to the procedure. The objective of this study was to determine the capability of transvaginal ultrasonography with bowel preparation (TVUS-BP) to predict the presence of one or more rectosigmoid nodules and the deepest bowel layer affected by the disease.A prospective study of 194 patients with clinical and TVUS-BP suspected deep endometriosis submitted to videolaparoscopy. Image data were compared with surgical and histological results.With respect to bowel nodule detection and presence of at least two rectosigmoid lesions, TVUS-BP had a sensitivity of 97 and 81%, specificity 100 and 99%, positive predictive value (PPV) 100 and 93% and negative predictive value (NPV) 98 and 96%, respectively. Regarding diagnosis of infiltration of the submucosal/mucosal layer, TVUS-BP had a sensitivity of 83%, specificity 94%, PPV 77%, NPV 96%.These findings show that TVUS-BP is an adequate exam for evaluating the presence of one or more rectosigmoid nodules and the deepest layer affected in deep infiltrating bowel endometriosis, confirming the importance of this technique for defining the most appropriate surgical strategy to be implemented.Diagnosis of deep infiltrating endometriosis: accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging and transvaginal 3D ultrasonography.To compare two different imaging modalities, magnetic resonance (MR), and three-dimensional sonography (3DUS), in order to evaluate the specific role in preoperative work-up of deep infiltrating endometriosis.33 women with endometriosis underwent 3DUS and MR followed by surgical and histopathological investigations. Investigators described the disease extension in the following sites: torus uterinus and uterosacral ligaments (USL), vagina, rectovaginal-septum, rectosigmoid, bladder, ovaries. Results were compared with surgical and histopathological findings.Ovarian and deep pelvic endometriosis were found by surgery and histology in, respectively, 24 (72.7%) and 22 (66.6%) of the 33 patients. Sensitivity and specificity values of 3DUS for the diagnosis of endometrial cysts were 87.5% and 100%, respectively; those of MRI were 96.8% and 91.1%, respectively. Sensitivity and specificity of 3DUS for the diagnosis of deep infiltrating endometriosis in specific sites were: USL 50% and 94.7%; vagina 84% and 80%; rectovaginal-septum 76.9% and 100%; rectosigmoid 33.3% and 100%; bladder 25% and 100%. Those of MR were: USL 69.2% and 94.3%; vagina 83.3% and 88.8%; rectovaginal-septum 76.4% and 100%; restosigmoid 75% and 100%; bladder 83.3% and 100%.MR accurately diagnoses deep infiltrating endometriosis; 3DUS accurately diagnoses deep infiltrating endometriosis in specific locations.Evaluation of colonic involvement in endometriosis: double-contrast barium enema vs. magnetic resonance imaging.The purpose of the study was to compare the accuracy of double-contrast barium enema (DCBE) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the diagnosis of intestinal endometriosis using the histological examination on resected specimen as comparative standard.Eighty-three consecutive patients with suspected intestinal endometriosis, resected between 2005 and 2007, were prospectively evaluated. All of the women underwent preoperative DCBE and MRI on the same day. We evaluated number, site (rectum, sigmoid, cecum), and size of the lesions. The imaging findings were correlated with those resulting at pathology.Among the 65 women who underwent surgery, 50/65 (76.9%) were found to have bowel endometriosis, with 9/50 (18%) patients presenting two lesions; DCBE allowed to detect 50/59 (84.7%) lesions. MRI allowed to detect 42/59 (71.1%) lesions. DCBE showed sensibility, specificity, PPV, NPV, and accuracy of respectively 84.7, 93.7, 98.0, 62.5, and 86.6%, MRI of 71.1, 83.3, 93.3, 46.8, and 74.6%.DCBE is more accurate than unenhanced MRI in the diagnosis of bowel endometriosis, and should be preferred in the preoperative management of this disease, since it usually enables a proper surgical planning.Diagnosis of pelvic adhesions in patients with endometrioma: the role of transvaginal ultrasonography.To estimate the diagnostic value of transvaginal ultrasonography in the detection of pelvic adhesions in women suspected of having endometriomas at ultrasonography.Prospective observational study.Academic Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology.One hundred thirteen women who underwent surgery for an endometrioma.All patients underwent transvaginal ultrasonography before surgery, and at ultrasonography the presence of fixation of the ovary to the uterus was considered characteristic of the presence of pelvic adhesions.Sensitivity, specificity, and likelihood ratios were calculated with 95% confidence intervals (CIs).The sensitivity and specificity of the fixation to the uterus of at least one ovary were respectively 89% (95% CI 84%-92%) and 90% (95% CI 76%-97%). The likelihood ratio for fixation of at least one ovary to the uterus was 8.92 (95% CI 3.04-26) and for a "normal" ultrasound examination 0.12 (95% CI 0.06-0.23). The pretest probability of pelvic adhesions was 74%, and this probability increased to 96% when fixation of at least one ovary to the uterus was present and fell to 27% when this ultrasonographic finding was absent.Transvaginal ultrasonography seems to be able to detect or exclude the presence of adhesions in women with ultrasonographic suspicion of endometrioma.Diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal ultrasound examination for assigning a specific diagnosis to adnexal masses.To determine the sensitivity and specificity of subjective evaluation of gray-scale and Doppler ultrasound findings (here called pattern recognition) when used by experienced ultrasound examiners with regard to making a specific diagnosis of adnexal masses.Within the framework of a European multicenter study, the International Ovarian Tumor Analysis study, comprising nine ultrasound centers, women with at least one adnexal mass were examined with gray-scale and color Doppler ultrasonography by experienced ultrasound examiners. A standardized examination technique, and standardized terms and definitions were used. Using pattern recognition the examiners classified each mass as benign or malignant and suggested a specific diagnosis (e.g. dermoid cyst or endometrioma). The reference standard was the histology of the surgically removed adnexal tumors.A total of 1066 women were included, of whom 800 had a benign mass and 266 a malignant mass. A specific diagnosis based on ultrasound findings was suggested in 899 (84%) tumors. The specificity was high for all diagnoses (range, 94-100%). The sensitivity was highest for benign teratoma/dermoid cysts (86%, 100/116), hydrosalpinges (86%, 18/21), peritoneal pseudocysts (80%, 4/5) and endometriomas (77%, 153/199), and lowest for functional cysts (17%, 4/24), paraovarian/parasalpingeal cysts (14%, 3/21), benign rare tumors (11%, 1/9), adenofibromas (8%, 3/39), simple cysts (6%, 1/18) and struma ovarii (0%, 0/5). The positive and negative likelihood ratios of pattern recognition with regard to dermoid cysts, hydrosalpinges and endometriomas were 68.2 and 0.14, 38.9 and 0.15, and 33.3 and 0.24, respectively. Dermoid cysts, hydrosalpinges, functional cysts, paraovarian cysts, peritoneal pseudocysts, fibromas/fibrothecomas and simple cysts were never misdiagnosed as malignancies by the ultrasound examiner, whereas more than 10% of inflammatory processes, adenofibromas and rare benign tumors including struma ovarii were misdiagnosed as malignancies.Using subjective evaluation of gray-scale and Doppler ultrasound findings it is possible to make an almost conclusive diagnosis of a dermoid cyst, endometrioma and hydrosalpinx. Many other adnexal pathologies can be recognized but not confidently confirmed or excluded.Endometriosis: contribution of 3.0-T pelvic MR imaging in preoperative assessment--initial results.To determine the accuracy of 3.0-T pelvic magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in the preoperative assessment of endometriosis and to evaluate colon wall involvement after intrarectal gel administration.Institutional review board approval for this study was obtained, and each patient gave written informed consent. Forty-one consecutive patients with clinical suspicion of endometriosis underwent pelvic MR imaging at 3.0 T before surgery. Single-shot and high-spatial-resolution axial T2-weighted, sagittal fat-suppressed T2-weighted, and axial fat-suppressed T1-weighted sequences were performed. T2-weighted sequences were repeated after the rectum was filled with ultrasonographic (US) gel. Two blinded readers interpreted images independently. Image quality was scored by using a four-point scale. Detailed mapping of deep endometriosis was performed. Colon wall infiltration was graded (none, serosa, muscularis, submucosa, mucosa). MR imaging results were compared with surgical and pathologic findings. Interobserver agreement was assessed by using kappa statistics. Nonparametric tests were performed to compare colon wall infiltration scores without and those with US gel and between observers.Twenty-seven of 41 patients had deep endometriosis at surgery and histopathologic examination. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy for the diagnosis of deep endometriosis at MR imaging were 96.3% (26 of 27), 100% (14 of 14), 100% (26 of 26), 93.3% (14 of 15), and 97.6% (40 of 41), respectively. kappa Values ranged from 0.65 to 1.0, depending on the location of deep endometriosis. Colon wall infiltration assessment by both readers correlated well with pathologic findings (Spearman coefficient, >0.93), although median wall involvement scores were lower at pathologic examination than for both readers both before (P = .042 and P = .011) and after (P = .079 and P = .011) intrarectal gel filling.MR imaging of the pelvis at 3.0 T is accurate in the diagnosis and staging of deep endometriosis for the preoperative assessment of patients clinically suspected of having endometriosis.Endometriosis of the posterior cul-de-sac: clinical presentation and findings at transvaginal ultrasound.The purpose of our study was to evaluate the clinical findings and transvaginal ultrasound features of posterior cul-de-sac endometriosis.A retrospective search of cases over a 13-year period was performed and yielded 25 patients with posterior cul-de-sac endometriosis. The diagnosis of posterior cul-de-sac endometriosis was confirmed by histology (n = 13), conventional barium enema (n = 13), colonoscopy (n = 8), CT (n = 8), MRI (n = 17), diagnostic laparoscopy (n = 14), and laparotomy (n = 13). All patients underwent transvaginal and abdominal ultrasound including power Doppler examination. Two radiologists working in consensus analyzed the clinical data and reviewed the imaging studies.All 25 patients presented with lower abdominal pain that was cyclic in six patients. Eleven patients were unintended childless. Rectal discomfort was mentioned by 17 patients, two of whom also reported rectal blood loss. At physical examination, eight patients had a palpable mass in the posterior cul-de-sac. Transvaginal ultrasound detected one or more hypoechoic masses in the posterior cul-de-sac in all 25 patients. All masses were solid, noncompressible, and localized on the serosal surface of the rectosigmoid with sparing of mucosa and submucosa. The lesions had a rounded or ovoid shape and a mean sagittal diameter of 37 mm with vascularity. The masses had a spiculated or tethering contour in 19 patients. Abdominal ultrasound detected thick-walled adnexal cysts in 11 patients, hydronephrosis in eight, and involvement of the ileocecal region in five.Patients with endometriosis of the posterior cul-de-sac frequently present with atypical noncyclic symptoms. The transvaginal ultrasound features characteristic of posterior cul-de-sac endometriosis are a solid, often spiculated, noncompressible mass near the posterior cul-de-sac that is localized at the serosal surface of the rectosigmoid, spares the mucosa and submucosa, and is vascular.Diagnosis of the most frequent benign ovarian cysts: is ultrasonography accurate and reproducible?To evaluate the reproducibility and the accuracy of B-mode ultrasonographic features of three different kinds of benign ovarian cysts: ovarian endometrioma, mature teratoma, and serous cyst.Digitally stored B-mode sonographic images of 98 women submitted to surgery for the presence of an adnexal mass were evaluated by five different examiners with different degrees of experience. The histological type of each mass was predicted on the basis of the B-mode typical benign findings, as in the case of endometrioma (groundglass endocystic pattern), cystic teratoma (echogenic pattern with or without acoustic shadow), and serous cyst (anechoic cyst without endocystic vegetations). To assess the reproducibility of the B-mode findings, intraobserver and interobserver agreements were calculated using the kappa index.The intraobserver agreement was good or very good for all examiners and for all patterns (kappa = 0.71-1) except for the dermoid cyst, which showed moderate agreement (kappa = 0.42) for the highly experienced operator. The interobserver agreement was good for all experts for endometrioma (kappa = 0.66-0.78) and for serous cyst (kappa = 0.82-1), whereas it was moderate or good for cystic teratoma (kappa = 0.51-0.72). Interobserver agreement between experts and highly experienced operators was fair (kappa = 0.33-0.36) for teratoma and good or very good for endometrioma (kappa = 0.70-0.83) and serous cyst (kappa = 0.76-0.82). For different kinds of cysts, the accuracy was comparable among different operators.Typical features of benign masses using grayscale transvaginal ultrasonography are reproducible even in moderately experienced examiners, although more experience was associated with better interobserver agreement. The diagnostic performance of different operators with different degrees of experience is similar.Comparison of diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal ultrasound with laparoscopy in the management of patients with adnexal masses.The aims of this study was (a) to compare the diagnostic accuracy of ultrasound examination with laparoscopic findings and both with the gold standard (histology) in the management of benign ovarian lesions, and (b) to assess the feasibility of laparoscopy in their diagnosis and management.Prospective, comparative study (Canadian Task Force Classification II-2). A total of 117 women 15-59 years old were examined at outpatient department and had transvaginal ultrasound assessment. Ninety-eight women (three postmenopausal) with 105 cystic ovarian lesions met inclusion criteria and underwent operative laparoscopy. Histology was performed in all cases.Although laparoscopy showed an overall higher performance compared to transvaginal ultrasound, statistically significant difference was found only in the detection of endometriomas compared to ultrasound (P = 0.004 for sensitivity and P = 0.046 for specificity).Laparoscopy exhibits higher diagnostic accuracy, especially in endometriomas, compared to transvaginal scan. Laparoscopic diagnosis appears to be safe and accurate. Conservative laparoscopic management of benign adnexal masses is safe and with low morbidity.Can transvaginal sonography predict infiltration depth in patients with deep infiltrating endometriosis of the rectum?Patients with deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) of the rectum often benefit from surgical treatment, including disc or segmental bowel resection, in terms of pain relief and treatment of infertility. The aim of the present study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) for preoperative detection of rectal DIE. Furthermore, we aimed to investigate whether TVS can predict infiltration depth based on the distortion of characteristic sonomorphologic features of the rectal wall.Two-hundred patients with symptoms of endometriosis were prospectively assessed by TVS for the presence of rectal DIE before undergoing laparoscopic radical resection of endometriosis including segmental resection of the bowel in affected cases. Sensitivities, specificities, positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV), positive and negative likelihood ratios (LHR) and test accuracies were then calculated for the presence of infiltration of the serosal/smooth muscle (S/M) layer and submucosal/mucosal (MUC) layer as demonstrated by TVS and confirmed by histopathological analysis.Rectal endometriosis was confirmed in 43 out of 195 (22%) cases. The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV, test accuracy and positive and negative LHR of TVS on S/M infiltration were 98%, 99%, 98%, 99%, 99%,150.24 and 0.02, respectively, whereas respective data on MUC involvement were 62%, 96%, 53%, 97%, 93.8%, 16 and 0.4.TVS is a highly valuable tool in detecting rectal endometriosis preoperatively. Within this, S/M endometriotic infiltration can be accurately predicted, whereas TVS is less valuable for detection of MUC involvement.Combination of transvaginal sonography and clinical examination for preoperative diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis.The aim of the present study was to evaluate the accuracy of routine clinical examination (per vaginam, PV) combined with transvaginal sonography (TVS) for presurgical, non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis.Two-hundred women with symptoms suggestive of endometriosis were prospectively assessed by PV and TVS prior to laparoscopy and radical resection of disease and histological confirmation.Prevalence of endometriosis on the right/left (r/l) ovary, r/l uterosacral ligament (USL), pouch of Douglas (POD), vagina, bladder, rectovaginal space (RVS) and rectum was 12%, 13%, 12%, 22%, 15%, 11%, 2%, 4% and 24%. Sensitivities, specificities, positive and negative predictive values and positive and negative likelihood ratios for combined use of TVS and PV resulted in 96/100%, 100/99%, 100/93%, 93/100% and -;0.04/87.0;- for the r/l ovarian endometriosis; 67/84%, 97/86%, 73/62%, 96/95% and 19.56;0.35/5.97;0.19 for the r/l USL disease; 87%, 98%, 90%, 98% and 49.11;0.14 for involvement of the POD; 82%, 99%, 95%, 98% and 145.64;0.18 for vaginal endometriosis; 88%, 99%, 78%, 99% and 84.0;0.13 for endometriosis of the RVS; 75%, 98%, 50%, 99% and 49.0;0.25 for bladder involvement and 96%, 98%, 94%, 99% and 48.56;0.04 for rectal endometriosis.The combination of PV and TVS accurately predicts the presence of endometriosis affecting the ovaries, vagina, rectum, USL, RVS and POD in patients with suspected endometriosis. We suggest the routine combination of PV and TVS as an essential part of the standard primary assessment of pelvic pain patients with suspected endometriosis.Anatomic significance of a positive barium enema in deep infiltrating endometriosis of the large bowel.The anatomopathological significance of a positive double-contrast barium enema (DCBE) for suspicion of deep infiltrating endometriosis of the large bowel was studied. This is a retrospective study of a prospective database.A large-bowel resection was proposed for patients who were suspicious for large-bowel endometriosis and had a positive DCBE. In a series of 73 patients, 71 large-bowel resections were performed. Histology and immunohistochemistry with the monoclonal antibody CD-10 were performed on the resection specimen. Outcome measures were the length of the resected specimen, the largest diameter of the lesion, the positivity of the resection margins, and the degree of infiltration of the large bowel. We also compared the mean largest diameters of the lesions with the degree of infiltration of the large bowel.Between December 1997 and October 2005, 80 patients were suspicious for large-bowel endometriosis: 73 (91%) had positive DCBEs, and 7 (9%) had negative DCBEs. Of the 73 with positive DCBEs, 4 (5%) refused digestive resection and 1 (1.4%) was excluded. Three patients underwent two large-bowel resections because of the presence of bifocal lesions (left and right colon). A total of 71 resections were performed. In case of positive DCBE, the perivisceral fat and the whole muscularis were infiltrated in 100% of cases. The infiltration reached the submucosa and the mucosa respectively in 82% and 18% of cases. A total of 9.9% of resection margins were positive at histology but only focally. The mean largest diameter of the lesions infiltrating the whole thickness of the large bowel was not statistically different from the mean largest diameter of more superficial lesions.Findings of mass effect with indentations and ridging of the mucosa on DCBE in a setting suspicious for large-bowel endometriosis correspond well with pathologic findings of deep infiltration of the large-bowel wall. Clinicians dealing with deep infiltrating endometriosis should be aware of these findings, which could influence their choice of surgical treatment.Diagnosis of complete cul-de-sac obliteration (CCDSO) by the MRI jelly method.To evaluate the usefulness of MRI jelly method (jelly method).Fifty-five patients (32.7 +/- 5 years old) with endometriosis, treated with laparoscopic surgery between January and June 2005 with preoperative MRI using the jelly method. In imaging by the jelly method, 50 mL of jelly used for ultrasound was injected into the vagina, and 150 mL of jelly diluted twice with tap water was injected into the rectum. MRI were inspected for the following seven findings: (Finding 1) Uterine position (anteflexion or retroflexion); (Finding 2) Thickness of the posterior uterine wall (adenomyosis uteri); (Finding 3) Ascites in the Douglas' pouch; (Finding 4) Elevated posterior uterine fornix; (Finding 5) Thickening of the "Haustra"; (Finding 6) Elevated anterior rectal wall; and (Finding 7) Douglas' pouch lesion visualized as a high-intensity area on a T1-weighted image. The latter four findings were enhanced with the jelly method. These seven findings were examined for their correlations with video findings of adhesion during surgery.CCDSO was present in 30 of 55 patients. These seven findings had accuracies of 69.1%, 70.9%, 72.7%, 74.5%, 56.4%, 83.6%, and 81.8% respectively. Findings 6 and 7 showed high accuracy.These two findings could only be obtained using the jelly method, indicating the usefulness of this method for diagnosing CCDSO.Preoperative work-up for patients with deeply infiltrating endometriosis: transvaginal ultrasonography must definitely be the first-line imaging examination.Transvaginal ultrasonography (TVUS) has important advantages compared with transrectal ultrasonography (TRUS): it is less invasive, is cost-effective, is a familiar and well-accepted approach, and anesthesia is not required. We compared the accuracy of TVUS and TRUS for diagnosing rectal wall involvement in patients presenting with histologically proved deeply infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).Prospective study of 134 patients with histologically proved DIE underwent preoperative investigations using both TVUS and TRUS. The radiologist (TVUS) and sonographer (TRUS) were unaware of the clinical findings but knew that DIE was suspected.DIE was confirmed histologically for all the patients. A rectal wall involvement was histologically proved for 75 patients (56%). For the diagnosis of infiltration of the intestinal wall, TVUS and TRUS, respectively, had a sensitivity of 90.7% and 96.0%, a specificity of 96.5% and 100.0%, a positive predictive value of 97.1% and 100.0% and a negative predictive value of 88.9% and 95.2%.TVUS and TRUS have similar degrees of accuracy for predicting intestinal involvement. TVUS must be the first-line imaging process to perform for patients presenting with clinically suspected DIE. The question for the coming years is to define if it is necessary for TRUS to be carried out systematically in cases of clinically suspected DIE.Diagnostic accuracy of physical examination, transvaginal sonography, rectal endoscopic sonography, and magnetic resonance imaging to diagnose deep infiltrating endometriosis.To compare the value of physical examination, transvaginal sonography (TVS), rectal endoscopic sonography (RES), and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) for the assessment of different locations of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).Retrospective longitudinal study.Tertiary university gynecology unit.Ninety-two consecutive patients with clinical evidence of pelvic endometriosis.Physical examination, TVS, RES, and MRI, performed preoperatively.Descriptive statistics, calculation of likelihood ratios (LR(+) and LR(-)) of physical examination, TVS, RES, and MRI for DIE in specific locations confirmed by surgery/histology.The sensitivity and LR(+) and LR(-) values of physical examination, TVS, RES, and MRI were, respectively, 73.5%, 3.3, and 0.34, 78.3%, 2.34, and 0.32, 48.2%, 0.86, and 1.16, and 84.4%, 7.59, and 0.18 for uterosacral ligament endometriosis; 50%, 3.88, and 0.57, 46.7%, 9.64, and 0.56, 6.7%, -, and 0.93, and 80%, 5.51, and 0.23 for vaginal endometriosis; and 46%, 1.67, and 0.75, 93.6%, -, and 0.06, 88.9%, 12.89, and 0.12, and 87.3%, 12.66, and 0.14 for intestinal endometriosis.The MRI performs similarly to TVS and RES for the diagnosis of intestinal endometriosis but has higher sensitivity and likelihood ratios for uterosacral ligament and vaginal endometriosis.A logistic model for the prediction of endometriosis.To develop a model that uses individual and lesion characteristics to help surgeons choose lesions that have a high probability of containing histologically confirmed endometriosis.Secondary analysis of prospectively collected information.Government research hospital in the United States.Healthy women 18-45 years of age, with chronic pelvic pain and possible endometriosis, who were enrolled in a clinical trial.All participants underwent laparoscopy, and information was collected on all visible lesions. Lesion data were randomly allocated to a training and test data set.Predictive logistic regression, with the outcome of interest being histologic diagnosis of endometriosis.After validation, the model was applied to the complete data set, with a sensitivity of 88.4% and specificity of 24.6%. The positive predictive value was 69.2%, and the negative predictive value was 53.3%, equating to correct classification of a lesion of 66.5%. Mixed color; larger width; and location in the ovarian fossa, colon, or appendix were most strongly associated with the presence of endometriosis.This model identified characteristics that indicate high and low probabilities of biopsy-proven endometriosis. It is useful as a guide in choosing appropriate lesions for biopsy, but the improvement using the model is not great enough to replace histologic confirmation of endometriosis.Efficiency of MR imaging to orientate surgical treatment of posterior deep pelvic endometriosis.The purpose of this retrospective study was to evaluate the accuracy of MRI using pelvic-phased-array and endocavitary coils in detecting intestinal wall invasion by an endometriotic nodule.Forty-seven patients (32.1 +/- 4.2 years) who were planned for a surgical cure of deep endometriosis underwent MRI with conventional sequences using both coils. A thin bright layer on T(2)-w with enhancement on post-Gd T(1)-w defined our MR pattern for muscular layer involvement. MR results were correlated with surgical and pathological findings of the removed nodule.MR results for Group 1 (both coils) achieved a sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of 100-63%, 96-92%, 90-70%, 100-85%, and 97-83% for endovaginal coil and phased-array coil, respectively. Group 2 (phased-array coil) had a sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of 73%, 93%, 84%, 88%, and 87% for this coil, respectively.Combined pelvic-phased-array and endovaginal coils are better than phased array alone in the detection of intestinal wall invasion. Easy to perform, it has to be considered as a preoperative staging for deep posterior endometriosis to orientate the surgical management.[Double-contrast barium enema in the diagnosis of intestinal deeply infiltrating endometriosis].to evaluate the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value of double contrast barium enema (DCBE) for the diagnoses of rectum and sigmoid endometriosis.prospective transversal study including 37 patients with suspicion of deep endometriosis. Patients were submitted to DCBE, according to the standard technique described in the literature, and then, to laparoscopy. The results of laparoscopy and the DCBE images were interpreted and compared, based on the histological evaluation. Statistical analysis was done by association (chi2 test) and agreement analyses (Kappa's test).patients' average age was 35.8+/-4.4 years old (age group from 28 to 48 years), 85.6% of them being white and 14.4%, black women. Deep endometriosis was confirmed by laparoscopy and histological exam in all the studied patients. Intestinal endometriosis was confirmed by histological exam in 27 women (72.9%) of them. DCBE demonstrated suggestive radiologic signs of intestinal infiltration by endometriosis in 24 women (64.9%) and no signs in 13 women (35.1%). The method sensitivity was 67.5%, specificity 53.8%, positive predictive value, 77.8% and negative predictive value, 70%. Among the 24 abnormal exams, 16 (43.2%) presented radiologic speculum-type image, 16 (43.2%), an image compatible with stenosis, and four (10.8%), double contour.the DCBE presents high sensitivity and high positive predictive value, in the diagnosis of the rectum and sigmoid endometriosis. Radiologic images speculum and stenosis-type present high sensitivity and positive predictive value for the intestinal infiltration by endometriosis.[MR imaging features of deep pelvic endometriosis: correlation with laparoscopy].Deep pelvic endometriosis is an invalidating disorder affecting the retrocervical region, rectosigmoid colon and urinary bladder generally requiring surgical management. MRI is the preoperative imaging modality of choice. The purpose of this paper is to describe the MR imaging features of deep pelvic endometriosis with laparoscopic correlation.Thirty-five patients with clinical suspicion of deep pelvic endometriosis underwent pelvic MRI. Results of MRI, including morphological and signal characteristics features of the lesions were compared to laparoscopic fidings.Laparoscopy detected lesions of deep pelvic endometriosis of the uterosacral ligaments (n=10), torus uterinum (n=9), rectosigmoid (n=11), Douglas pouch (n=9), recto-vaginal septum (n=6), bladder (n=4) and posterior vaginal cul-de-sac (n=2). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of MRI were assessed for each localization.MRI allows diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis of the bladder, rectosigmoid and Douglas pouch and with lower sensitivity for lesions of the uterosacral ligaments, posterior vaginal cul-de-sac and rectovaginal septum.Susceptibility-weighted MRI of endometrioma: preliminary results.Susceptibility-weighted MRI combines magnitude and phase information from fully velocity-compensated gradient-echo sequences and depicts as signal voids the susceptibility effects caused by local inhomogeneity of the magnetic field. Our objective, based on MRI of 60 pathologically proven ovarian cystic lesions, including 42 endometriomas and 18 nonendometrial cysts, was to evaluate hemosiderin deposition within the walls of endometriomas on susceptibility-weighted MR images. Two radiologists blinded to the final diagnosis retrospectively reviewed the images in consensus.On susceptibility-weighted MR images, punctate or curved linear signal voids along the cyst wall were observed in 39 endometriomas (92.9%) and in no nonendometrial cysts. The signal voids were more prominent on 3-T than on 1.5-T images, reflecting the higher sensitivity of 3-T MRI to magnetic susceptibility effects. Thirty-two endometriomas (76.2%) met definitive MRI criteria, that is, hyperintensity on T1-weighted images and hypointensity on T2-weighted images, and 41 endometriomas (97.6%) were correctly diagnosed with susceptibility-weighted MRI.Diagnostic value of transvaginal 'tenderness-guided' ultrasonography for the prediction of location of deep endometriosis.The aim was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal tenderness-guided ultrasonography in the identification of location of deep endometriosis.Consecutive women scheduled for surgery in our Department for clinically suspected endometriosis were included in this prospective study. All women underwent modified transvaginal ultrasonography using a stand-off in the week before surgery, which also evaluated the painful sites evocated by a gentle pressure of the probe. Five locations of deep endometriosis were considered: vaginal walls, rectovaginal septum, rectosigmoid involvement, uterosacral ligaments and anterior compartment (anterior pouch and/or bladder). Sensitivity, specificity and likelihood ratios (LR+/-) were calculated with 95% confidence intervals (CIs).We included 88 women; surgery associated with histopathological evaluation revealed deep endometriosis in different pelvic locations in 72 patients. With respect to the vaginal walls, transvaginal ultrasonography had a sensitivity of 91% (95% CI, 79-97%), specificity of 89% (95% CI, 81-93%), an LR+ of 8.2 and an LR- of 0.09. For endometriosis of rectovaginal septum, transvaginal ultrasonography had a sensitivity of 74% (95% CI, 64-80%), specificity of 88% (95% CI, 4-8%), an LR+ of 6.2 and an LR- of 0.3. For other locations, the sensitivity was lower (ranging from 67% to 33%) with a comparable specificity.This technique shows a high specificity and sensitivity in the detection of vaginal and rectovaginal endometriosis. Good specificity associated with a lower sensitivity was obtained in the diagnosis of deep endometriosis of uterosacral ligaments, rectosigmoid involvement or anterior deep endometriosis.Double-contrast barium enema and transrectal endoscopic ultrasonography in the diagnosis of intestinal deeply infiltrating endometriosis.To evaluate the sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value, positive predictive value, association, and agreement of double-contrast barium enema (DCBE) and transrectal endoscopic ultrasonography (Tr EUS) in the diagnosis of rectosigmoid colon endometriosis.Prospective nonrandomized (Canadian Task Force classification II-2).University hospital.We evaluated 37 patients with clinically suspected deeply infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) from January 2004 through January 2005.Clinical examination, DCBE, Tr EUS, and laparoscopy for histologic confirmation.Deeply infiltrating endometriosis was confirmed by laparoscopic visualization and by histopathologic examination in all patients. Intestinal endometriosis was observed in 27 patients (72.9%). DCBE showed abnormalities suggestive of bowel endometriosis in 24 patients (64.9%) and Tr EUS in 28 patients (75.7%). Considering the DCBE findings we observed among the 24 abnormal examination results, 16 (42.3%) had spiculation, 16 (42.3%) had circumferential narrowing of the bowel, and 4 (10.8%) had the mass effect sign. For DCBE the sensitivity was 88%, the specificity was 54%, the negative predictive value (NPV) was 70%, and the positive predictive value (PPV) was 78%. For Tr EUS the sensitivity, specificity, NPV, and PPV were 96%, 100%, 90%, and 100%. A significant association of the DCBE and the Tr EUS in the diagnosis of intestinal DIE (p = .017) and a moderate agreement of the methods (kappa = 0.44) was also observed.Our data, although limited by sample size, confirmed that DCBE has a good sensitivity and a low specificity in the diagnosis of intestinal DIE. The Tr EUS proved to have a higher sensitivity and specificity with elevated NPV and PPV. A significant association of the DCBE and the Tr EUS in the diagnosis of intestinal DIE and a moderate agreement of the methods was also observed.Transrectal ultrasound and the diagnosis of rectovaginal endometriosis: a prospective observational study.Rectovaginal endometriosis is a severe form of pelvic endometriosis in which pharmacological treatment is relatively ineffective (Vercellini et al., Fertil Steril. 2005;84:1375-87). Laparoscopic surgical treatment is effective, but has the potential risks of bowel perforation and colostomy formation (Darai et al., Am J Obstet Gynecol. 2005;192:394-400). Transrectal ultrasound scanning can be applied as a preoperative tool to predict the presence of rectovaginal endometriosis and bowel wall involvement (Abrao et al., J Am Assoc Gynecol Laparosc. 2004;11:50-4).Thirty-two women underwent transrectal ultrasound followed by therapeutic laparoscopy. Likelihood ratios and post-test prevalences were calculated with Fagan's normogram. This was then extrapolated with the aid of a mathematical model to a low-risk population.A positive likelihood ratio was found to be 10.89 (95% confidence ratio (CI): 1.62-73.15) and a negative likelihood ratio was found to be 0.24 (95% CI: 0.1-0.57). The pre-test prevalence of rectovaginal endometriosis was 56%. The positive post-test prevalence probability was 93%, and the negative post-test prevalence probability was 23%.Preoperative transrectal ultrasound scanning for rectovaginal endometriosis is an extremely accurate predictive test, and strongly predicts the need for extensive laparoscopic dissection and potential bowel resection.Barium enema evaluation of colonic involvement in endometriosis.The purpose of our study was to define the role of double-contrast barium enema (DCBE) compared with laparoscopy in the diagnosis and local staging of intestinal endometriosis.A search of our radiology database revealed the cases of 234 women who underwent surgical resection for pelvic endometriosis with associated intestinal surgery for intestinal endometriosis. We retrospectively evaluated all preoperative DCBE images for the presence of bowel endometriosis and the number, site (rectum, sigmoid, cecum), and size of the lesions. The radiographic findings at DCBE were retrospectively correlated with those at surgical pathologic examination.DCBE revealed 211 intestinal lesions of bowel endometriosis in 168 (71.8%) of 234 patients with pelvic endometriosis clinically enrolled. Forty (23.8%) of the 168 women had more than one endometriotic bowel nodule (two nodules in 37 cases, three in three cases). Laparoscopy revealed 233 intestinal lesions in 174 (74.3%) of the patients. Fifty-four (31.0%) of 174 women had more than one endometriotic bowel nodule (two nodules in 49 cases, three in five cases). There was 100% correlation between the DCBE and histologic findings as far as site and size of the lesions were concerned. DCBE had a sensitivity of 88.4%, specificity of 93.0%, positive predictive value of 97.5%, negative predictive of 71.0%, and accuracy of 89.5% in the identification of bowel endometriosis.DCBE is helpful in discerning bowel wall involvement in endometriosis, enabling proper surgical planning. DCBE also appears to have a role in the management of endometriosis.Does transvaginal ultrasonography combined with water-contrast in the rectum aid in the diagnosis of rectovaginal endometriosis infiltrating the bowel?The aim of this study was to determine whether adding water-contrast in the rectum during transvaginal ultrasonography (RWC-TVS) improves the diagnosis of rectal infiltration in women with rectovaginal endometriosis.This prospective study included 90 women, with suspect rectovaginal endometriosis, who underwent operative laparoscopy. TVS and RWC-TVS were independently performed by different investigators. RWC-TVS was performed by injecting saline solution into the rectal lumen under ultrasonographic control through a 6-mm catheter. Presence of rectovaginal nodules, presence and degree of rectal infiltration, and the largest diameter of the bowel nodules were evaluated. Ultrasonographic results were compared to surgical and histological findings.Although RWC-TVS had higher accuracy than TVS in diagnosing rectovaginal endometriosis, the difference between the two techniques was not statistically significant. RWC-TVS was significantly more accurate than TVS in determining the presence of endometriotic infiltration reaching at least the muscular layer of the rectal wall. The sensitivity of RWC-TVS in identifying rectal lesions was 97%, the specificity 100%, the positive predictive value 100% and the negative predictive value 91.3%. RWC-TVS caused a higher intensity of pain than TVS.RWC-TVS determines the presence of rectovaginal nodules infiltrating the rectal muscularis propria more accurately than TVS; RWC-TVS could be used when TVS cannot exclude the presence of rectal infiltration.Endorectal ultrasound accuracy in the diagnosis of rectal endometriosis infiltration depth.To evaluate the accuracy of endorectal ultrasound examination to ascertain the deepest rectal layer involved in rectal endometriosis.Retrospective study.Department of obstetrics and gynecology at a university hospital in France.Women presenting with rectal endometriosis who had undergone rectal resection during a 22-month period.Endorectal ultrasonography.The predicted rectal infiltration depth by using endorectal examination was compared with histological findings. The level of agreement was evaluated by using the coefficients of concordance kappa and weighted kappa.Sixteen women were included in the study. Rectal resection was segmental in 14 cases and was limited in 2 cases. The agreement between 2 examinations was considered good in 9 cases (56%). Endorectal ultrasound overestimated the depth of infiltration in 5 cases and underestimated it in 2 cases. The coefficients of concordance kappa (95% confidence interval) and weighted kappa (95% confidence interval) were, respectively, 0.17 (0-0.34) and 0.22 (0.04-0.4), corresponding to poor concordance between the endorectal ultrasonography and histological examination.Accuracy in the prediction of rectal-layer involvement in endorectal ultrasonography appears to be limited. This information should not be considered sufficient when selecting the type of rectal-resection procedure.Transvaginal ultrasonography combined with water-contrast in the rectum in the diagnosis of rectovaginal endometriosis infiltrating the bowel.This prospective study evaluated the efficacy of transvaginal ultrasonography combined with water-contrast in the rectum (RWC-TVS) in the diagnosis of rectal infiltration in 35 women with rectovaginal endometriosis; ultrasonographic findings were compared with surgery and histology. The sensitivity of RWC-TVS in identifying rectal infiltration reaching at least the muscular layer was 100%, the specificity was 85.7%, the positive predictive value was 91.3%, and the negative predictive value was 100%. In 4 of 5 (80.0%) nodules reaching the submucosa, the depth of infiltration was underestimated by RWC-TVS. The RWC-TVS reliably determined the largest diameter of the endometriotic nodules and was well tolerated by the patients.Accuracy of transvaginal sonography and rectal endoscopic sonography in the diagnosis of deep infiltrating endometriosis.To compare the accuracy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) and rectal endoscopic sonography (RES) for the diagnosis of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE), with respect to surgical and histological findings.This was a longitudinal study of 81 consecutive patients referred for surgical management of DIE, who underwent both TVS and RES preoperatively. The diagnostic criteria were identical for TVS and RES, and were based on visualization of hypoechoic areas in specific locations (uterosacral ligaments, vagina, rectovaginal septum and intestine). We calculated the sensitivity, specificity, predictive values and accuracy of TVS and RES for the diagnosis of DIE.Endometriosis was confirmed histologically in 80/81 (98.7%) patients. Endometriomas and DIE were present in 43.2% and 97.5% of the women, respectively. For the diagnosis of DIE overall, TVS and RES, respectively, had a sensitivity of 87.3% and 74.7%, a positive predictive value of 98.6% and 98.3%, and an accuracy of 86.4% and 74%. For the diagnosis of uterosacral endometriosis, they had a sensitivity of 80.8% and 46.6%, a specificity of 75% and 50.0%, a positive predictive value of 96.7% and 89.5% and a negative predictive value of 30% and 9.3%. For the diagnosis of intestinal endometriosis, they had a sensitivity of 92.6% and 88.9%, a specificity of 100% and 92.6%, a positive predictive value of 100% and 96% and a negative predictive value of 87% and 80.6%.TVS is apparently more accurate than is RES for predicting DIE in specific locations, and should thus be the first-line imaging technique in this setting.Comparison between clinical examination, transvaginal sonography and magnetic resonance imaging for the diagnosis of deep endometriosis.Deeply infiltrating endometriosis affecting the retrocervical region and the rectosigmoid generally requires surgical treatment. Clinical examination, transvaginal ultrasonography (TVUS) and pelvic magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) are useful in the preoperative diagnosis of the involvement of these sites. The objective of this study was to evaluate the capacity of digital vaginal examination, TVUS and MRI to diagnose rectosigmoid and retrocervical involvement.A total of 104 patients with clinically suspected endometriosis were submitted to clinical examination, pelvic MRI and TVUS until 3 months prior to videolaparoscopy and the findings of these methods were matched with histopathological confirmation of endometriosis.Endometriosis was histologically confirmed in 98 of 104 (94.2%) patients. With respect to the rectosigmoid and retrocervical sites, respectively, digital vaginal examination had a sensitivity of 72 and 68%, specificity of 54 and 46%, positive predictive value (PPV) of 63 and 45%, negative predictive value (NPV) of 64 and 69% and accuracy of 63 and 55%. For TVUS, sensitivity was 98 and 95%, specificity 100 and 98%, PPV 100 and 98%, NPV 98 and 97% and accuracy 99 and 97%. MRI had a sensitivity of 83 and 76%, specificity of 98 and 68%, PPV of 98 and 61%, NPV of 85 and 81% and accuracy of 90 and 71%.TVUS had better sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and accuracy in cases of deep retrocervical and rectosigmoid endometriosis when compared with MRI and digital vaginal examination, confirming that it is an important preoperative examination for the definition of surgical strategies."Tenderness-guided" transvaginal ultrasonography: a new method for the detection of deep endometriosis in patients with chronic pelvic pain.To determine the accuracy of transvaginal ultrasonography (TVUS) using a modified "tenderness-guided" approach in the diagnosis of deep endometriosis of the cul-de-sac, retrocervical region, and rectovaginal septum.Prospective study.Academic department of obstetrics and gynecology.Fifty women scheduled for laparoscopy for chronic pelvic pain.All patients underwent TVUS. The modified tenderness-guided approach consisted of TVUS combined with the introduction of 12 mL of ultrasound transmission gel (instead of the usual 4 mL) in the probe cover to create a stand-off to visualize the near-field area. The posterior fornix was evaluated accurately with an up-and-down sliding movement of the probe. In addition, when the patient indicated that tenderness was evoked by the probe's pressure, the sliding movement was stopped, and particular attention was paid to the painful site for detection of endometriosis lesions.Sensitivity, specificity, and kappa values.Using this approach, we obtained a specificity of 95% with a sensitivity of 90%, associated with a very high kappa value of 0.86 (95% CI, 0.56-0.91).Our new TVUS approach appears to be an accurate, inexpensive, and less invasive method for the diagnosis of deep endometriosis.Nodular endometriosis: dynamic MR imaging.In this study we aimed to investigate the value of contrast enhanced dynamic MR imaging (DMI) in the diagnosis of nodular abdominal endometriosis.Fourteen patients with surgically and pathologically proven endometriosis were examined with DMI. The patients were 22-54 years old (mean age 30.8 years). The dynamic MR studies of these patients were retrospectively reviewed by two radiologists who were aware of the clinical data. Nodular masses showing enhancement were evaluated for size, margins, and signal intensity on T1- and T2-weighted MR sequences. The protocol was tailored to selectively determine the diagnostic utility of signal intensity time course analysis for the behavior of nodular endometriosis and endometrial tissue, in DMI. Contrast-enhanced DMI was performed and the time-intensity curves of the lesions and the uterine endometrial tissue of each patient were compared. Mean enhancement values were calculated. Each DMI was evaluated for signal intensity value.In 8 (57%) of 14 patients, we found endometriosis in the abdominal wall. All patients with abdominal wall endometriosis had pelvic surgical operation history. Diameter of nodular endometriosis determined in the abdominus muscle ranged between 3 and 40 mm. Of eight cases, five had only one lesion and three had multiple lesions. Remaining 6 (43%) cases had deep pelvic endometriosis located in the uterosacral ligaments (n = 3), rectosigmoid (n = 2), and rectovaginal septum (n = 1). Diameter of pelvic endometriosis ranged between 9 and 53 mm. Noncontrast mean signal intensity of endometriosis and endometrial tissue were 280 +/- 73 and 216 +/- 20, respectively. The mean values of both endometriosis and normal endometrial tissue were calculated for each patient examined with five-slice DMI. All of the curves showed significant correlation. The lesion showed significant enhancement in the course of time similar to the endometrial tissue in all patients.Our study was inspired from the fact that endometriosis is the ectopic endometrial tissue and we thought that endometrial tissue and endometriomas should have similar vascularity. In this way imaging with MR, getting the time-intensity curves and experiencing the correlation between the endometriosis and endometrial tissue may support the diagnosis in the cases with suspected endometriosis. This first study shows that the ectopic nodular endometriosis can easily be identified with dynamic MRI. It may be used to differentiate nodular endometriosis from the other pathologic conditions of abdominal wall and pelvis.Accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging and rectal endoscopic sonography for the prediction of location of deep pelvic endometriosis.We compared the accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and rectal endoscopic sonography (RES) for the diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis (DPE), with respect to surgical and histological findings.Longitudinal study of 88 consecutive patients referred for surgical management of DPE, who underwent both MRI and RES pre operatively. The diagnostic criteria were identical for MRI and RES and were based on visualization of hypointense/hypoechoic areas in specific locations. DPE was diagnosed when at least one site was involved. We calculated the sensitivity, specificity, predictive values, accuracy and 95% confidence interval of MRI and RES for DPE.DPE and endometriomas were present in 97.7 and 39.7% of women, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of MRI and RES, respectively, were 84.8 and 45.6%, 88.8 and 40%, 98.5 and 87.8% and 40 and 8.5% for uterosacral endometriosis; 77.7 and 7.4%, 70% and 100, 85.3 and 100% and 89.7 and 70.9% for vaginal endometriosis and 88.3 and 90%, 92.8 and 89.3%, 96.4 and 94.7% and 78.8 and 80.6% for colorectal endometriosis.MRI is more accurate than RES for the diagnosis of uterosacral and vaginal endometriosis, whereas the two methods are similarly accurate for colorectal endometriosis.Multislice CT enteroclysis in the diagnosis of bowel endometriosis.This prospective study aims to evaluate the efficacy of multislice computed tomography combined with colon distension by water enteroclysis (MSCTe) in determining the presence and depth of bowel endometriotic lesions. Ninety-eight women with symptoms suggestive of colorectal endometriosis underwent MSCTe; locations, number of nodule/s, size of the nodule/s and depth of bowel wall infiltration were determined. Independently from the findings of MSCTe, all women underwent laparoscopy. MSCTe findings were compared with surgical and histological results. Abnormal findings suggestive of bowel endometriotic nodules were detected by MSCTe in 75 of the 76 patients with bowel endometriosis. MSCTe identified 110 (94.8%) of the 116 bowel endometriotic nodules removed at surgery; 6 nodules missed at MSCTe were located on the rectum. MSCTe correctly determined the degree of infiltration of the bowel wall in all of the 34 serosal bowel nodules identified at MSCTe. In six nodules reaching the submucosa, the depth of infiltration was underestimated by MSCTe. MSCTe had a sensitivity of 98.7%, a specificity of 100%, a positive predictive value of 100% and a negative predictive value of 95.7% in identifying women with bowel endometriosis. MSCTe is effective in determining the presence and depth of bowel endometriotic lesions.Assessment of pelvic endometriosis: correlation of US and MRI with laparoscopic findings.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the contribution of ultrasound (US) and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in the diagnosis and local staging of endometriosis by comparing results with laparoscopic findings.We evaluated 36 consecutive women with suspected or clinically diagnosed endometriosis. Thirty-two out of 36 patients met the following inclusion criteria: transabdominal and endocavitary (US) examination and MR imaging, followed by laparoscopy performed within 2 weeks. US and MR findings were classified based on location, number and morphology (small nodules, large nodules, laminar lesions, cystic lesions, complex lesions, adhesions, cul-de-sac obliteration).Laparoscopy, considered the gold standard, identified 143 lesions in 32 patients. US detected 101 lesions, and MR detected 92 lesions, which were subsequently divided by morphologic appearance. Sensitivity and specificity of the two imaging techniques in the recognition of the different locations were 58% and 25%, respectively, for US and 56% and 50%, respectively, for MR imaging. Results of the two techniques in the different locations examined were similar, with the exception of lesions in the rectovaginal septum, which were better detected by US, and for adhesions and cul-de-sac obliteration, which were more easily detected by MR.Both US and MR are accurate in the diagnosis of endometriosis. There are no significant differences in staging of pelvic endometriosis between US and MR. US examination is the primary evaluation in cases of suspected disease and for the rectovaginal septum. MR examination is recommended for correct classification in doubtful cases and in cases of suspected extrapelvic lesions and adhesions.Endorectal ultrasonography in predicting rectal wall infiltration in patients with deep pelvic endometriosis: a modern tool for an ancient disease.This study evaluated the validity of endorectal ultrasonography in predicting rectal infiltration in patients with deep pelvic endometriosis.Patients were recruited consecutively in the Department of Surgical Gynecology of Diaconesses Hospital from April 1996 to July 2003. Inclusion criteria were the suspicion of deep pelvic endometriosis on the basis of outpatient history and/or clinical symptoms with a mass palpable on bimanual examination that might infiltrate the rectal wall. There were no exclusion criteria. Endorectal ultrasonography was performed by the same investigator with a 7.5-MHz to 10-MHz rigid probe, producing a 360 degrees view of the rectal wall and adjacent areas. We used surgical and histopathologic findings as the "gold standard" to evaluate the validity of endorectal ultrasonography.This study was based on 37 patients (mean age, 35.8 (range, 26-46) years) who underwent surgery. The time between endorectal ultrasonography and surgery ranged from 4 to 529 (mean, 88.7) days. Eight patients had endometriosis nodules penetrating the rectal wall. Endorectal ultrasonography showed sensitivity, specificity, a positive predictive value, and a negative predictive value of 87.5, 97, 87.5, and 97 percent, respectively, in the diagnosis of infiltration of the rectal wall by endometriosis.Endorectal ultrasonography is a reliable technique for visualizing rectal infiltration in patients with deep pelvic endometriosis. It should be more widely used by gynecologists because knowing about rectal infiltration before surgery is fundamental to defining the best possible surgical approach.The use of ultrasound-based 'soft markers' for the prediction of pelvic pathology in women with chronic pelvic pain--can we reduce the need for laparoscopy?To assess the accuracy of new transvaginal ultrasound-scan-based markers and to compare them to conventional ultrasound methods used in the detection of common pelvic pathology in women with chronic pelvic pain (CPP).A prospective observational study.Teaching hospital.A total of 120 consecutive women with CPP undergoing transvaginal ultrasonography before either diagnostic or operative laparoscopy.Anatomical abnormalities, e.g. endometrioma or hydrosalpinx (hard markers), were documented. The woman was then assessed for the presence or absence of 'soft markers' (reduced ovarian mobility and site-specific pelvic tenderness).Presence or absence of pelvic pathology noted during laparoscopy.Seventy women had pelvic pathology, of whom 51 had endometriosis alone, 7 both endometriosis and pelvic adhesions, 6 pelvic adhesions, 1 hydrosalpinx with endometriosis and 5 hydrosalpinx and pelvic adhesions. The likelihood ratio for the hard markers was infinity (specificity was 100%), for the soft makers 1.9 (95% CI 1.2-3.1) and for a 'normal' ultrasound 0.18 (0.09-0.34). The pre-test probability of pelvic disease in our population of women with CPP was 58%, and this probability of disease was raised to 100% with the presence of hard markers and to 73% with the presence of soft markers. The pre-test probability of 58% fell to 20% when ultrasound finding was found to be normal.This new approach improves the detection and exclusion of significant pathology in women with CPP and may lead to a reduction in the number of unnecessary laparoscopies carried out on women with CPP.Role of EUS and EUS-guided FNA in the diagnosis of symptomatic rectosigmoid endometriosis.Rectosigmoid endometriosis is an underrecognized cause of GI symptoms in women. Pelvic magnetic resonance imaging and CT have a low sensitivity in making this diagnosis. The role of EUS and EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) in the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis in symptomatic patients is not well studied.A review of medical records identified 5 women who were diagnosed with rectosigmoid endometriosis by EUS and EUS-FNA over a period of 1 year.Five women with nonspecific GI complaints underwent EUS examination of a rectosigmoid subepithelial mass found on colonoscopy. EUS revealed a hypoechoic lesion infiltrating the muscularis propria and the serosa of the rectal wall, and extending outside the rectal wall, findings consistent with rectosigmoid endometriosis. This diagnosis was confirmed by EUS-FNA, surgical exploration, and/or the patient's clinical course.EUS and EUS-FNA are noninvasive, sensitive techniques for the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis in symptomatic patients.Value of endorectal ultrasonography for diagnosing rectovaginal septal endometriosis infiltrating the rectum.Rectovaginal septal endometriosis (RVSE) can pose serious therapeutic problems when there is infiltration of the rectal septum (which occurs in approximately half of the cases). The aim of this study was to assess the value of endoscopic ultrasonography in diagnosing rectal wall involvement by pelvic endometriosis.A prospective study was carried out from May 1998 to March 2003 at a single hospital center. The 30 patients included in the study presented with suspected RVSE and underwent systematic anorectal endoscopic ultrasonographic exploration prior to the surgical intervention. The endoscopic ultrasonography was carried out under general anesthesia with a 7.5-MHz miniprobe equipped with a distal balloon.The anorectal endoscopic ultrasonographic examination (EUS) showed the presence of endometriosis in the rectovaginal septum in 26 patients (88 %), in the uterosacral ligaments in 10 patients (33 %), and in the ovaries in two patients (6 %). At EUS, the nodules were infiltrating the rectal wall in 17 patients (56 %). The surgical exploration demonstrated endometriosis in the rectovaginal septum in 26 cases, the uterosacral ligaments in 22 cases, and the ovaries in 16 cases. The rectal wall was completely infiltrated in 12 cases and only partly in four cases, and intestinal tract resection was required in 10 cases. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive value of anorectal endoscopic ultrasonography as a means of diagnosing endometriosis of the rectovaginal septum and infiltration of the rectal wall were found to be 96 %, 100 %, 100 % and 83 %, and 92 %, 66 %, 64 % and 92 %, respectively; and the diagnostic accuracy was at 96 % and 80 %, respectively. The sensitivity for detecting nodules in the uterosacral ligaments or in the ovaries was 42 % and 14 %, respectively, leading to diagnostic accuracy rates of 56 % and 53 %.In terms of its sensitivity and its negative predictive value, anorectal endoscopic ultrasonography is a very effective means of detecting endometriosis of the rectovaginal septum and assessing possible infiltration of the rectal wall. However, this method is not as accurate for nodules located far from the EUS probe, as is the case with the uterosacral ligaments and ovaries.A novel technique using magnetic resonance imaging jelly for evaluation of rectovaginal endometriosis.To evaluate the usefulness of the magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) jelly method as a preoperative diagnostic means for patients with rectovaginal endometriosis.Prospective study.University hospital.Thirty one patients with suspected rectovaginal endometriosis based on clinical symptoms and the results of preoperative pelvic, rectal, and ultrasonographic examinations, who were scheduled to undergo laparoscopic surgery.Before surgery, jelly for ultrasonography was injected into the vagina and rectum for MRI. The MRI findings were compared with findings obtained through laparoscopic surgery and histopathologic examination of the removed tissues.The complete cul-de-sac obliteration and deep lesion confirmed at the time of the laparoscopic surgery were evaluated by the MRI jelly method.For detecting the presence of complete obliteration of the cul-de-sac, the accuracy of the diagnosis of rectovaginal endometriosis attained using the MRI jelly method was sensitivity 90.9% and specificity 77.8%. For the presence of a deep lesion, the sensitivity was 94.1% and specificity 100%.The condition of the cul-de-sac could be imaged clearly via the MRI jelly method. Not only rectovaginal endometriosis presenting with deep lesions, but also complete cul-de-sac obliteration alone could be diagnosed preoperatively at a high rate."Kissing ovaries": a sonographic sign of moderate to severe endometriosis.To evaluate whether the presence of kissing ovaries at ultrasound is a marker for endometriosis and whether it correlates with the severity of the disease.Prospective observational study.Gynecologic departments of two university hospitals.A total of 722 consecutive premenopausal women who had laparoscopic surgery for an adnexal mass or suspected pelvic endometriosis.Preoperative ultrasound evaluation and laparoscopic surgery.Diagnostic and predictive value of ultrasound identification of kissing ovaries in the detection of endometriosis.Kissing ovaries were diagnosed at ultrasound and confirmed laparoscopically in 32 patients. Of these, 27 had moderate to severe endometriosis and five others had benign adnexal masses. Bowel (18.5% vs. 2.5%) and fallopian tube (92.6% vs. 33%) endometriosis were significantly more frequent in patients with kissing ovaries than in patients without kissing ovaries. In infertile patients (n = 145), kissing ovaries were associated with a higher proportion of women with fallopian tube obstruction (80% vs. 8.6%). Considering patients with moderate to severe endometriosis (n = 189), the median (range) revised American Fertility Society score (74 [32-148] vs. 35 [16-146]) and the operative time (115 minutes [65-245 minutes] vs. 50 [15-180 minutes]) were significantly higher in patients with than in those without kissing ovaries.The detection of kissing ovaries at ultrasound is strongly associated with the presence of endometriosis and is a marker of the most severe form of this disease.[Value of pelvic MRI in the preoperative diagnosis of endometriosis].To determine the value of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the pelvis in the preoperative diagnosis of endometriosis.Over a period of 8 months, preoperative MRI of the pelvis were obtained in 13 patients with suspected endometriosis (mean patient age 34.6 years; range 25 - 47 years).In 9 of 13 patients (69 %), the diagnosis of endometriosis was made by MRI and confirmed by laparoscopy in 8 cases. In 2 of 13 patients, endometriotic lesions were detectable by laparoscopy only. In the remaining 2 patients, no endometriosis was visible on MRI or by laparoscopy. MRI was able to visualize a total of 19 endometriotic lesions, with 14 (74 %) confirmed by histopathologic examination following laparoscopy. Five of these 19 lesions (26 %) visible on MRI were not seen by laparoscopy. Using laparoscopy and subsequent histopathologic examination, 27 endometriotic lesions were diagnosed, with 13 (48 %) not seen on the preoperative MRI.MRI and laparoscopy are complementary diagnostic tools that will best document the full extent of endometriosis when combined. MRI can visualize additional lesions inaccessible to laparoscopy. Thus, MRI of the pelvis should used preoperatively for surgical treatment planning.Accuracy of rectal endoscopic ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of rectal involvement for patients presenting with deeply infiltrating endometriosis.To compare the accuracy of rectal endoscopic ultrasonography (REU) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) for predicting rectal wall involvement in patients presenting histologically proven deeply infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).This was a retrospective study of a continuous series of 81 patients presenting histologically proven DIE who underwent preoperative investigations using both REU and MRI. The sonographer and the radiologist, who were unaware of the clinical findings and patient history, but knew that DIE was suspected, were asked whether there was involvement of the digestive wall.Rectal DIE was confirmed histologically in 34 of the 81 (42%) patients. For the diagnosis of rectal involvement, sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive value for REU were 97.1%, 89.4%, 86.8% and 97.7% and for MRI they were 76.5%, 97.9%, 96.3% and 85.2%.The sensitivity and negative predictive value of REU were higher than those of MRI suggesting that REU performs better than MRI in the diagnosis of rectal involvement for patients presenting with DIE. Prospective studies with a large number of patients are needed in order to validate these preliminary results.Diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal sonography for deep pelvic endometriosis.To determine the accuracy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) for the diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis.In a prospective study, 142 women with clinical signs of endometriosis underwent TVS followed by surgical and histopathological investigations. The presence and extent of endometriosis involving the uterosacral ligaments, vagina, rectovaginal septum, intestines, bladder and ovaries shown by TVS were compared with surgical and histological findings. The sensitivity, specificity, predictive values and accuracy of TVS for predicting deep pelvic endometriosis were assessed.Ovarian and deep pelvic endometriosis were found by surgery and histology in respectively 83 (58.5%) and 79 (55.6%) of the 142 patients. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of TVS for the diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis were 78.5%, 95.2%, 95.4% and 77.9%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of TVS for endometriotic involvement of the uterosacral ligaments, vagina, rectovaginal septum and intestines were 70.6% and 95.9%, 29.4% and 100%, 28.6% and 99.3%, and 87.2% and 96.8%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of TVS for bladder involvement were 71.4% and 100%, respectively.TVS accurately diagnoses intestinal and bladder endometriosis, but is less accurate for uterosacral, vaginal and rectovaginal septum involvement.Deep pelvic endometriosis: MR imaging for diagnosis and prediction of extension of disease.To prospectively evaluate the accuracy of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging for the preoperative diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis and extension of the disease.One hundred ninety-five patients (mean age, 34.2 years; range, 20-71 years) who were suspected of having pelvic endometriosis were recruited at two institutions. Two experienced radiologists evaluated the MR images independently. Deep pelvic endometriosis was defined as implants or tissue masses that appeared as hypointense areas and/or hyperintense foci on T1- or T2-weighted MR images in the following locations: torus uterinus, uterosacral ligaments (USLs), vagina, rectovaginal septum, rectosigmoid, and bladder. MR imaging results were compared with surgical and pathologic findings. Sensitivity, specificity, predictive values, and accuracy of MR imaging for prediction of deep pelvic endometriosis were assessed.Pelvic endometriosis was confirmed at pathologic examination in 163 (83.6%) of 195 patients. Endometriomas, peritoneal lesions, and deep pelvic endometriosis were diagnosed on the basis of surgical findings, alone or combined with pathologic findings, in 111 (68.1%), 83 (50.9%), and 103 (63.2%) of 163 patients, respectively. Torus uterinus and USL were the most frequent sites of deep pelvic endometriosis. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of MR imaging for deep pelvic endometriosis were 90.3% (93 of 103), 91% (84 of 92), 92.1% (93 of 101), 89% (84 of 94), and 90.8% (177 of 195), respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy, respectively, of MR imaging for the diagnosis of endometriosis in specific sites were as follows: USL, 76% (57 of 75), 83.3% (100 of 120), and 80.5% (157 of 195); vagina, 76% (16 of 21), 95.4% (166 of 174), and 93.3% (182 of 195); rectovaginal septum, 80% (eight of 10), 97.8% (181 of 185), and 96.9% (189 of 195); rectosigmoid, 88% (53 of 60), 97.8% (132 of 135), and 94.9% (185 of 195); and bladder, 88% (14 of 16), 98.9% (177 of 179), and 97.9% (191 of 195).MR imaging demonstrates high accuracy in prediction of deep pelvic endometriosis in specific locations.Sonographic assessment of non-malignant ovarian cysts: does sonohistology exist?Transvaginal ultrasound (TVU) is feasible and accurate in the differentiation between non-malignant and malignant ovarian abnormalities. However, despite the clinical relevance, the accuracy of TVU in the differentiation between the many different non-malignant cysts is unknown.Between 1992 and 2002, all women who had surgery at our centre because of a non-malignant ovarian cyst were included prospectively in this study. The sonographic characteristics as well as the expected histological diagnosis (the 'sonohistological diagnosis') were evaluated pre-operatively. This diagnosis was compared with the histopathological diagnosis, and diagnostic parameters [with 95% confidence interval (CI)] of the sonohistological diagnosis were calculated. Logistic models, with the sonographic characteristics as variables, were constructed for each histopathological diagnosis.A total of 406 women were included consecutively. The overall diagnostic accuracy of the sonohistological diagnosis was 60% (95% CI 0.56-0.65). Only in cases of simple ovarian cysts did the diagnostic accuracy of the respective logistic model exceed that of the sonohistological diagnosis (0.88 versus 0.81, P < 0.01). The diagnostic accuracy of the sonohistological diagnosis for endometriotic and dermoid ovarian cysts was significantly better compared with the respective logistic model (0.84 versus 0.71, P < 0.01 and 0.87 versus 0.82, P = 0.03, respectively).In approximately half of the non-malignant ovarian cysts, TVU is capable of distinguishing between the different histopathological diagnoses of non-malignant ovarian masses. Only in the diagnosis of simple ovarian cysts might use of the logistic models be helpful.Rectal endoscopic ultrasound with a radial probe in the assessment of rectovaginal endometriosis.To evaluate the accuracy of rectal endoscopic ultrasound and to evaluate endometriosis in the rectovaginal septum, rectum, and sigmoid walls.Validation of diagnostic test (Canadian Task Force classification II-1).Tertiary care hospital.Thirty-two consecutive women clinically suspected of having rectovaginal septum endometriosis without previous surgical treatment.Colonoscopy, transrectal ultrasound, and rectal endoscopic ultrasound, followed by laparoscopy or laparotomy.The disease was classified according to 1996 standards of the American Society of Reproductive Medicine. Images obtained by colonoscopy, endoscopic ultrasound, and surgery and histologic findings were compared. In 6 patients endometriosis infiltrated bowel muscularis wall, in 20 it infiltrated rectovaginal septum, and in the remaining 6 there was no evidence of lesions. In all women in whom infiltration of the intestinal wall was suspected, rectal endoscopic ultrasound and colonoscopy confirmed the lesions (sensitivity 100%, specificity 67%).Endoscopic ultrasound was useful in preoperative assessment of women with endometriosis.Staging of pelvic endometriosis based on MRI findings versus laparoscopic classification according to the American Fertility Society.Preoperative staging of pelvic endometriosis helps the gynecologist plan therapy and offers a prognosis to patients. We compared a staging system of pelvic endometriosis based on magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) findings with the American Fertility Society (AFS) laparoscopic classification.Forty-four consecutive females with clinically suspected endometriosis underwent MRI examination to demonstrate the presence of endometriomas and pelvic implants. Laparoscopy was performed within 2 weeks. An MRI score was developed to classify endometriosis into four classes comparable to those of AFS laparoscopic staging. Concordance between MRI and laparoscopic classification was evaluated with kappa statistics.Laparoscopy confirmed 60 of 61 endometriomas detected by MRI. Implants were discovered in 20 of 44 patients with MRI and in 23 of 44 with laparoscopy. MRI detected 50 endometrial implants of 65 detected by laparoscopy (76.9%). With regard to endometriosis staging, we obtained a concordance between MRI and AFS classification in 42 of 44 patients (kappa = 0.913).Although MRI has limitations such as suboptimal depiction of small implants and adhesions, this technique is very useful to guide laparoscopy. Moreover, the optimal concordance (95%) between our proposed MRI staging and the AFS laparoscopic classification demonstrated a new advantage of MRI in preoperative staging of endometriosis.Transvaginal sonography and rectal endoscopic sonography for the assessment of pelvic endometriosis: a preliminary comparison.Endometriosis and possible rectal involvement are difficult to assess by physical examination. Previous studies have shown the diagnostic value of magnetic resonance imaging and rectal endoscopic sonography (RES) in this setting, but not that of transvaginal sonography (TVS). The aims of this study were to compare the accuracy of TVS and RES for the diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis, and to compare the results with histological findings.In a prospective study, 30 consecutive patients referred with clinical signs of endometriosis underwent TVS and RES; the images were interpreted blindly with regard to physical findings.Endometriosis was confirmed histologically in 28 (93%) of the 30 patients. Endometriomas were also present in 67% of cases. For the diagnosis of uterosacral endometriosis, the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of TVS and RES were 75 and 75%, 83 and 67, 95 and 90%, and 45 and 40% respectively. For the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis, the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of TVS and RES were 95 and 82%, 100 and 88%, 100 and 95%, and 89 and 64% respectively.Despite the large proportion of our patients who had intestinal endometriosis, representing a possible source of bias, our results suggest that TVS is as efficient as RES for detecting posterior pelvic endometriosis and should therefore be used as the first-line examination.Sonovaginography is a new technique for assessing rectovaginal endometriosis.To evaluate the efficacy of a new technique, the sonovaginography, for the assessment of rectovaginal endometriosis.Prospective study.University hospital.Forty-six women were scheduled for laparotomic or laparoscopic surgery because of rectovaginal endometriosis suspected on the basis of patient history and/or clinical examination.Before surgery, all the women underwent transvaginal ultrasonography and then sonovaginography. The latter is based on transvaginal ultrasonography combined with the introduction of saline solution to the vagina that creates an acoustic window between the transvaginal probe and the surrounding structures of the vagina. Ultrasound findings were compared with the results of surgical exploration and histological examination.We assessed the accuracy of transvaginal ultrasonography and of sonovaginography for the detection and the location and extension assessment of rectovaginal endometriotic lesions, as well as compared patient compliance between the procedures.Sonovaginography diagnosed rectovaginal endometriosis more accurately than did transvaginal ultrasonography, with a sensitivity and specificity of 90.6% and 85.7%, respectively, whereas the transvaginal ultrasonography has shown a sensitivity and specificity of 43.7% and 50%, respectively. Patient discomfort did not differ significantly between the procedures.Sonovaginography is a reliable and simple method for the assessment of rectovaginal endometriosis and provides information on location, extension, and infiltration of the lesions, which are important factors in selecting the kind of surgery.Diagnostic accuracy of laparoscopy, magnetic resonance imaging, and histopathologic examination for the detection of endometriosis.To evaluate the utility of fat-suppressed magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the diagnosis of endometriosis.A prospective clinical trial.A government research hospital.Forty-eight women with pelvic pain.Magnetic resonance imaging followed by surgical excision and pathologic diagnosis of endometriosis.Presence and extent of endometriosis suggested by preoperative MRIs compared with surgical inspection and biopsy.A preoperative MRI in 46 women detected fewer endometriosis lesions than histopathology or laparoscopy (78 vs. 101 vs. 150). Few MRI lesions correlated with those identified by laparoscopy (50 of 150) or pathology (38 of 101). Of 42 women with surgically diagnosed endometriosis, 28 had at least one corresponding abnormality on MRI, 5 had abnormalities that didn't correlate with surgical findings, and 9 had normal MRIs. The sensitivity of MRI in detecting biopsy-proven endometriosis for any woman was 69% (25 of 36), and the specificity was 75%.Although MRI identifies fewer areas of endometriosis than seen at surgery, it suggested endometriosis in 75% of those with at least mild disease. Only 67% of lesions identified at surgery contained histologic evidence of endometriosis.Validation study of nonsurgical diagnosis of endometriosis.To determine whether the surgical diagnosis of endometriosis can be predicted using symptoms, signs, and ultrasound findings.Prospective study (study sample); retrospective record review (test sample).Hospital of Desio (study sample) and Mangiagalli Hospital (test sample), Italy.Ninety women scheduled to undergo laparoscopy or laparotomy (study sample); 120 women who underwent laparoscopy (test sample).The study sample group was interviewed before surgery about infertility and dysmenorrhea, dyspareunia, and noncyclic pelvic pain and each member had a pelvic examination and a transvaginal ultrasound. At surgery, endometriosis was noted. For the test sample, the same information was abstracted from medical records after laparoscopy.The ability of symptoms, signs, and ultrasound to predict endometriosis at surgery. A classification tree was developed with the study sample and evaluated with the test sample.Ovarian endometriosis, but not nonovarian endometriosis, could be reliably predicted with noninvasive tools. Ultrasound and examination best predicted ovarian endometriosis, correctly classifying 100% of cases with no false positive diagnoses in the study sample. Similar results were found in the test sample.Noninvasive tools may be used to identify women with ovarian, but not nonovarian endometriosis, with excellent agreement with surgical diagnosis.[Diagnostic value of transvaginal ultrasound in the detection of ovarian endometriosis].The aim of the study was to estimate of efficiency of endovaginal ultrasonography in diagnosis of ovarian endometriosis. The study was performed in 59 women with ovarian tumors. Ultrasound examinations were performed with Aloka 2000 using 5.0 MHz transducers. The endovaginal ultrasonography is very useful in diagnosis of ovarian endometriosis, showing sensitivity--90%, specificity--68%, positive predictive value--75%, negative predictive value--86%. Ultrasound examination is an important tool in noninvasive diagnostic procedure of adnexal pathology.The characterization of common ovarian cysts in premenopausal women.The evaluation of the predictive value of transvaginal ultrasound in the assessment of benign adnexal pathology in premenopausal women, based on the recognition of characteristic morphologic patterns particular to endometriotic and dermoid ovarian cysts.This was a prospective study. All premenopausal women undergoing surgery for a suspected ovarian cyst underwent a transvaginal ultrasound examination in the week prior to surgery. Between June 1997 and January 2000, 132 women underwent surgery for a suspected ovarian endometrioma or dermoid cyst. The endpoints were either the direct visualization of the cyst wall and contents at surgery, or the histologic evaluation of removed tissues.Of 83 suspected endometriomas (11 bilateral), 80 were confirmed at surgery and of 68 suspected benign cystic teratomas (eight bilateral), 66 were confirmed by histology. The positive predictive value of transvaginal ultrasonography for the diagnosis of endometrioma and dermoid cysts was 96.4% and 97.1%, respectively. The false positive rates were 3.8% and 3.0%, respectively. There were no malignancies in either group.Based on the recognition of characteristic ultrasound patterns alone, the positive predictive value of transvaginal ultrasonography for the diagnosis of these common, benign cysts in premenopausal women is very high and can be used reliably to select women for appropriate surgery.[Comparison of endoscopic ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging in severe pelvic endometriosis].Deep pelvic endometriosis may lead to severe pain, the treatment of which may require complete surgical resection of lesions. Digestive infiltration is a difficult therapeutic problem. Preoperative diagnosis is difficult and digestive infiltration may remain unknown with incomplete resection and sometimes repeated surgery. Both magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and endoscopic ultrasonography are able to detect rectosigmoid infiltration but their usefulness in the preoperative staging is still to be evaluated. The aim of this work was to evaluate and compare both techniques in the preoperative detection of deep pelvic endometriosis, particularly digestive infiltration.From 1996 to 1998, 48 women with painful deep pelvic endometriosis had preoperative imaging exploration with endoscopic ultrasonography and MRI, and were operated on in order to attempt complete endometriosis resection. Patients were proposed for laparoscopic resection if endoscopic ultrasonography and/or MRI did not reveal digestive infiltration or for open resection if endoscopic ultrasonography and/or MRI were positive for digestive infiltration.Endoscopic ultrasonography and/or MRI led to suspicion of digestive endometriosis in 16 patients. Surgical resection was performed in 12 and digestive wall invasion was histologically demonstrated. At final follow-up, all patients had a dramatic decrease of their symptoms. The remaining 4 patients refused digestive resection and had only laparoscopic gynecologic resection. Infiltration although not histologically proven was very likely both on operative findings and clinical evolution. Digestive infiltration was preoperatively excluded in the 32 other patients. All had a laparoscopic treatment without digestive resection and pain diminished in all patients. In the 12 patients group who had digestive resection, digestive infiltration was correctly diagnosed by endoscopic ultrasonography in all cases (no false negative) whereas MRI, even with the use of endocoil antenna, led to correct diagnosis in 8 out of 12 cases. When endoscopic ultrasonography was negative for digestive infiltration, laparoscopic resection of lesions at surgery appeared complete in all cases. For the 16 patients with presumed digestive infiltration, sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography and MRI was 100 and 75% respectively, with a 100% specificity in both cases. MRI appeared very accurate for the detection of ovarian endometriotic locations. MRI was more sensitive but less specific than endoscopic ultrasonography for the diagnosis of isolated endometriotic recto-vaginal septum and utero-sacral ligaments lesions.Endoscopic ultrasonography was the best technique for the diagnosis of digestive endometriotic infiltration, which complicates the therapeutic strategy. MRI, however, allows more complete staging of other pelvic endometriotic lesions.Role of color Doppler ultrasonography in the diagnosis of endometriotic cyst.We studied the role of color Doppler ultrasonography in the distinction between endometriomas and other adnexal masses. Three hundred and fifty-two ovarian lesions were studied, comparing sonographic diagnosis with pathologic findings. On color Doppler sonography, an endometriotic cyst usually appeared as a cystic lesion with diffuse internal echoes and low vascularization. The sensitivity and specificity of color Doppler transvaginal sonography in detecting endometriotic cysts were 91.8% and 95.3%, respectively. The positive and negative predictive values were 95.5% and 91.5%, respectively. In our experience, transvaginal sonography with color Doppler interrogation is a useful technique in the diagnosis of pathologic ovarian conditions, including cystic endometriosis.Rectosigmoid endometriosis: endoscopic ultrasound features and clinical implications.The main area of the gastrointestinal tract affected by deep pelvic endometriosis is the rectosigmoid colon in 3-37% of cases. Due to the risk of infiltration and the clinical symptoms of endometriosis, with pain and infertility, the condition may require surgical resection. Preoperative imaging diagnosis of rectosigmoid involvement is therefore important. Rectal endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), which is already used for the staging of anorectal carcinoma and submucosal lesions, may be a promising technique for this indication. The present study was conducted in order to describe the endosonographic appearance of rectosigmoid endometriosis, and to define the potential relevance of the technique to the choice of resection method.Between 1993 and 1997, 46 women (mean age 31) with deep pelvic endometriosis underwent imaging investigations and surgical resection. The clinical and imaging findings, and the surgical and histological features identified--mainly with regard to infiltration of the rectal wall--were compared retrospectively. The impact of the EUS findings on the decision on whether or not to carry out resection, either by laparoscopy or open abdominal surgery, was also examined.When there was deep pelvic endometriosis with suspected rectal wall infiltration, EUS showed normal anatomy in nine patients, endometriotic lesions without rectal wall infiltration in 12, and typical rectal infiltration in 25. The lesions were confirmed by the surgical findings during therapeutic laparoscopy (n = 22) and laparotomy (n = 25), as well as by clinical follow-up. Rectal wall infiltration, demonstrated in all cases using EUS, had initially been suspected on the basis of clinical examinations, rectoscopy, barium enema, computed tomography, and magnetic resonance imaging in 62%, 50%, 33%, 67% and 66% of cases, respectively.EUS is a simple and noninvasive technique capable of correctly diagnosing rectal wall infiltration in deep pelvic endometriosis. It may be helpful in determining the choice between laparoscopy and laparotomy when complete resection is indicated.Transvaginal ultrasonography combined with pelvic examination in the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma.The aim of this retrospective study was to evaluate the efficacy of TVS and TVS combined with pelvic examination for the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma. Three hundred and five ovarian masses of 244 patients with either pre-operative or post-operative diagnosis of ovarian tumor and received TVS between January 1, 1996 and December 31, 1998 were included in the study. Of 305 masses, 221 endometriomas of 164 patients were diagnosed histologically. The efficacy of TVS was 84.9 per cent with a sensitivity of 92.3 per cent and specificity of 70.2 per cent. LR+ and LR- were 3.1 and 0.1 respectively. The combination of TVS and pelvic examination with either positive test had a higher sensitivity (98.8%) but lower specificity (26.6%). This combination dramatically improved NPV (97.5%) and LR- (0.05), whereas, the combination with both positive tests had a sensitivity of 78.1 per cent, and specificity of 81.5 per cent. LR+ and LR- were not different from those using TVS alone. In conclusion, the study has shown the role of TVS in the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma. The combination of TVS and pelvic examination may be useful in ruling out the disease. However, a further prospective study should be performed to confirm the efficacy of the combination.Magnetic resonance imaging characteristics of deep endometriosis.The aim of this study was to describe magnetic resonance (MR) imaging findings in histopathologically proven deep endometriosis infiltrating the uterosacral ligaments, the pouch of Douglas, the rectum or the bladder. Twenty patients presenting with a clinical suspicion of deep endometriosis underwent preoperative MR imaging. Sagittal and axial fast T2- and axial T1-weighted spin echo MR sequences were performed. Four patients had post-contrast images. MR results, including morphology and signal intensity of each lesion, were compared to intraoperative gross appearance and histopathology. Histopathology diagnosed 24 lesions of deep endometriosis in the uterosacral ligaments (n = 12), the pouch of Douglas (n = 2), the rectum (n = 3), the bladder (n = 7). Uterosacral ligaments with deep endometriosis were statistically different from normal uterosacral ligaments for proximal nodularity (P = 0.001). There was no difference in signal intensity between normal and abnormal uterosacral ligaments. Contrast-enhanced SE images in four patients with detrusor invasion showed an interruption of the hypointense detrusor by the enhancing bladder endometriosis. Rectal endometriosis was missed in two of three patients and showed non-specific rectal wall thickening in one patient. It is concluded that MR imaging can diagnose deep endometriosis of uterosacral ligaments, the bladder and the pouch of Douglas, but lacks sensitivity in detecting rectal endometriosis without rectal distension.Endometriomas: diagnostic performance of US.To determine the diagnostic performance of specific ultrasonographic (US) features in discriminating endometriomas from other adnexal masses.Two sonologists independently reviewed the sonograms of 252 adnexal masses in 226 women and recorded US features by using a standardized checklist. The diagnostic performance of specific US features and overall reviewer impression in discriminating endometriomas from other adnexal masses were evaluated.There were 40 endometriomas. Diffuse low-level internal echoes were present in 38 (95%) endometriomas and 40 (19%) nonendometriomas (positive likelihood ratio, 5). The positive likelihood ratio for the diagnosis of endometrioma increased to 8 if masses with neoplastic features at gray-scale US were excluded, allowing identification of 30 endometriomas (75%). The presence of multilocularity or hyperechoic wall foci further increased the positive likelihood ratio to 48, allowing the identification of 18 endometriomas (45%).An adnexal mass with diffuse low-level internal echoes and absence of particular neoplastic features is highly likely to be an endometrioma if multilocularity or hyperechoic wall foci are present. A patient with a mass with diffuse low-level internal echoes and other US features may benefit from additional imaging.Results and role of rectal endoscopic ultrasonography for patients with deep pelvic endometriosis.The objective of this work was to assess the advantages and the role of rectal endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) when establishing evidence of infiltration of the rectal wall in patients with proven deep pelvic endometriosis. To this end we performed a retrospective study between July 1993 and December 1996 of a continuous series of 38 patients who presented with deep pelvic endometriosis which was confirmed histologically. The EUS results were considered normal in nine cases (23.7%). In 12 cases (31.6%) EUS revealed an image compatible with infiltration of the uterosacral ligaments and/or the rectovaginal septum without any associated bowel infiltration. In 17 cases (44.7%) EUS revealed an image compatible with deep infiltration of the intestinal wall. Sixteen of these 17 patients underwent laparotomy with bowel resection. The histological results confirmed in each of these 16 patients (100%) that there was deep infiltration of the intestinal wall by endometriotic lesions. The seventeenth patient refused such major surgery by laparotomy, and underwent partial laparoscopy due to the risk of bowel injury. For the 21 patients with no EUS evidence of rectal infiltration complete laparoscopic surgical exeresis was achieved in every case (100%) without broaching the intestinal wall. These preliminary results enable us to state that EUS, which is a simple and non-invasive technique, provides a reliable indication as to the presence of deep bowel infiltration in patients with retroperitoneal endometriotic lesions. EUS used pre-operatively enables patients to be selected for treatment via laparotomy or by laparoscopic surgery.The diagnosis of endometriomas using colour Doppler energy imaging.We studied the role of colour Doppler energy (CDE) (or power Doppler) imaging in the differentiation between endometriomas and other adnexal masses in premenopausal non-pregnant women. A total of 170 consecutive patients with persistent adnexal masses was submitted to B-mode transvaginal ultrasonography associated with CDE imaging evaluation. Plasma concentrations of CA125 were measured before surgery. Using CDE imaging evaluation of vessel distribution, the occurrence of one of the following findings was considered to indicate the likely presence of endometrioma: (i) a round-shaped homogeneous hypoechoic 'tissue' of low-level echoes without papillary proliferations associated with 'poor' vascularization; (ii) a round-shaped homogeneous hypoechoic 'tissue' of low-level echoes with an echogenic portion in which no flow was detected. The overall agreement between the test result and the actual outcome was calculated using the k index. The CDE imaging evaluation was more accurate in the diagnosis of endometriomas compared with B-mode ultrasonography alone (k = 0.88 and 0.80 respectively). According to the logistic regression equation obtained, the probability of the presence of endometrioma varied between a minimum of 1.4% for patients with no risk factors to a maximum of 95.6% for patients with two risk factors (CDE result and value of CA125 >25 IU/ml).The role of transvaginal ultrasonography in the detection of pelvic pathologies in the infertility workup.To assess the efficiency of transvaginal ultrasonography (TVUS) in the screening of pelvic pathologies in the initial workup of infertile women, we carried out a prospective comparison of sonographic diagnosis with laparoscopic and pathological findings. Between February 1994 and April 1995, 133 premenopausal non-pregnant women underwent TVUS on the day before laparoscopy. The efficiency of TVUS in detecting pelvic pathologies was 90.2% with a sensitivity of 86.2%, a specificity of 97.8% and positive and negative predictive values of 98.6 and 78.8% respectively. If the six false-negative cases with a histological diagnosis of minimal endometriosis were defined as 'normal pelvis', sensitivity and specificity could be corrected to 92.5 and 98.6% respectively. Endometriomas were diagnosed by TVUS with an efficiency of 96.4%, with a sensitivity and a specificity of 90 and 96.7 % and with positive and negative predictive values of 75 and 99.1% respectively. The sensitivity of vaginal sonographic characterization of pelvic adhesions was 61.1% with a specificity and positive predictive value of 98.2 and 84.6%. The negative predictive value of TVUS was 94.1%. These data suggest that it is not possible to characterize pelvic adhesions, especially filmy adhesions, with acceptable accuracy. However, in the initial workup of infertile women, if the patient is young, if both hysterosalpingography and TVUS are negative, laparoscopy could be postponed. In couples with severe male factor infertility and for whom in-vitro fertilization or intracytoplasmic sperm injection is the treatment of choice, laparoscopy might be avoided where the TVUS is negative.Transrectal ultrasonography in the assessment of rectovaginal endometriosis.To evaluate the validity of transrectal ultrasonography in the assessment of rectovaginal endometriosis.We compared the findings of transrectal ultrasonographic examination performed before surgery with the operative and pathologic findings in 140 women who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy for suspected endometriosis. The ultrasonographer was asked to investigate whether any deep endometriotic lesions were present in the rectovaginal septum and to define the lateral extension on the basis of involvement of the uterosacral ligaments. In addition, infiltration of the rectal and vaginal walls was evaluated.Thirty-four women had endometriosis infiltrating the rectovaginal septum confirmed by combined operative and pathologic findings. Ultrasonography showed a sensitivity and specificity of 97% and 96%, respectively, in the diagnosis of the presence of rectovaginal endometriosis. The sonographer identified infiltration of the rectal and vaginal walls correctly in all cases in whom it was present, but also reported rectal infiltration in three cases not confirmed by the surgeon and pathologist. The sensitivity and specificity in the diagnosis of uterosacral ligament infiltration were 80% and 97%, respectively.If our preliminary results are confirmed by a larger series, transrectal ultrasonography will be considered a valid diagnostic tool in the evaluation of rectovaginal endometriosis.Is routine diagnostic laparoscopy for infertility still justified? A pilot study assessing the use of hysterosalpingo-contrast sonography and magnetic resonance imaging.We assessed the value of hysterosalpingo-contrast sonography (HyCoSy) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) as alternatives to laparoscopy and dye insufflation with or without hysteroscopy in the investigation of infertility. A total of 19 women had all three procedures, in addition, one became pregnant after HyCoSy alone. The findings were: uterine fibroids (n = 5), minimal-mild endometriosis (n = 4) and moderate-severe endometriosis (n = 3) including one case of bilateral endometriomas, endometrial polyp (n = 1), polycystic ovaries (n = 2), bilateral dermoid cysts (n = 1), haemorrhagic corpus luteal cyst (n = 1) and minimal adhesions (n = 3). At laparoscopy, 31/37 tubes were patent and there was 84% concordance with the tubal patency findings at HyCoSy. The uterine fibroids and ovarian cysts were detected using transvaginal scanning; the endometrial polyp and a congenital uterine anomaly were identified using HyCoSy. These findings were detected using MRI, but in addition the technique distinguished the dermoid cysts from the endometriomas, identified the two other cases of moderate-severe endometriosis, fibroids <2 cm (n = 2) and adenomyosis (n = 5), and interpreted the haemorrhagic corpus luteum as an endometrioma. Our data suggest that women with normal HyCoSy and MRI findings have a normal pelvis and may not need routine surgical investigation.Transvaginal ultrasound and computed tomography combined with clinical parameters and CA-125 determinations in the differential diagnosis of persistent ovarian cysts in premenopausal women.The purpose of this prospective study was to compare the accuracy of computed tomography (CT) and transvaginal ultrasonography in the differential diagnosis of persistent cystic ovarian lesions. The candidates for this study were 161 premenopausal non-pregnant women with an adnexal mass. After a 3-month follow-up, 83 masses persisted and were examined by both techniques before surgery. We also evaluated the CA-125 plasma levels. The CT and ultrasonographic diagnoses were then compared with the histopathological diagnosis. The overall agreement between the test results and the actual outcome was calculated by means of the kappa statistic. Transvaginal ultrasonography has a closer accuracy in the diagnosis of serous cysts and serous cystadenoma, ovarian carcinoma and endometrioma (value of kappa: 0.78, 0.73 and 0.80, respectively) than CT, even if the latter is associated with clinical and biochemical parameters such as patient's age and CA-125 plasma levels. Only in the diagnosis of cystic teratoma, is transvaginal ultrasonography less accurate than CT. In conclusion, in premenopausal women, transvaginal ultrasonography remains a cost-effective method in the diagnosis of most cystic ovarian lesions.Endoluminal ultrasound diagnosis and operative management of rectal endometriosis.Endorectal ultrasound was performed in patients with endometriosis to evaluate the role of this technique for rectal wall involvement and to evaluate the position of preoperative diagnosis in the operative management of rectal endometriosis.Sixteen patients with suspected fixation of endometriomas to the rectal wall during bimanual examination were included in the study. Endorectal ultrasound was performed using a real time unit with a 7.5 MHz endorectal transducer. The probe was introduced via a rectoscope into the rectum up to the rectosigmoid.Endometriosis was confirmed histopathologically in all patients. In six patients rectal wall involvement was diagnosed, in two patients endometriomas were adjacent to the rectal wall, and in eight patients rectal wall involvement could be excluded. Preoperative diagnosis was confirmed in all patients during operation. Laparotomy was performed in those patients with preoperatively diagnosed rectal wall involvement, whereas the remaining patients were treated laparoscopically. Endometriomas with rectal wall involvement were treated in five of six patients with resection of the affected bowel predominantly by low anterior resection.Preoperative endorectal ultrasound is a reliable technique to visualize perirectal endometriomas and to assess rectal wall involvement. Based on preoperative endosonographic diagnosis, an operative management was established with laparotomy and resection of the affected bowel in cases of rectal wall involvement.The role of transvaginal ultrasonography combined with color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler in the diagnosis of endometrioma.To assess the diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal ultrasonography alone and combined with color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler in differentiating ovarian endometriomas from other nonendometriotic masses.Prospective study with pathological confirmation of sonographic diagnosis.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology at a university hospital.A series of 78 consecutive patients diagnosed as having an adnexal mass and scheduled for surgery, between January 1995 and March 1996.Transvaginal ultrasonography and color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler was performed before surgery in all patients. A total of 82 masses were diagnosed (four patients had bilateral masses). CA-125 plasma levels were measured in all patients. Ultrasound diagnosis was compared with definitive histopathological diagnosis.The presence of a round-shaped homogeneous cyst with low-level echoes was considered as sonographic diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma. The typical vascular pattern from endometrioma was considered as "pericystic flow at the level of the ovarian hilius." The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were calculated for transvaginal ultrasonography alone and combined with color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler.Twenty-seven (32.9%) of the 82 masses were proven to be ovarian endometriomas. Morphological assessment diagnosed correctly 24 (88.9%) of 27 endometriomas (false-positive rate: 9%). Typical flow pattern was present in 90.5% of endometriomas (false-positive rate: 80%). CA-125 levels in patients with endometrioma (45.6 +/- 6.3 U/mL; mean +/- SEM) were significantly higher than in patients with nonendometriotic masses (26.5 +/- 5.5 U/mL). The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of transvaginal ultrasonography alone and combined with color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler were 88.9%, 91%, 84.2%, and 94.5%, and 76.2%, 88.9%, 82.4%, and 82.4%, respectively. For CA-125 levels, using a cutoff > or = 35 U/mL, these figures were 79.3%, 84.6%, 79.3%, and 84.6%, respectively.The use of color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler does not improve the diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal ultrasonography alone in the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma.Evaluation of endometriosis in uterosacral ligaments by transrectal ultrasonography.Uterosacral ligaments are one of the common targets of pelvic endometriosis, which is usually clinically rather than surgically diagnosed. This study was performed to determine if uterosacral ligaments infiltrated by endometriosis could be detected by transrectal ultrasonography. Uterosacral ligaments in non-endometriosis subjects (n = 64) were observed as low echoic homogeneous arcs in both sides of the uterine cervix. Patients who had endometriosis (n = 29) on the ligaments showed thick and irregularly-shaped uterosacral ligaments by the transrectal ultrasound examination. The results also suggested that the thickness of uterosacral ligaments was associated with the clinical symptoms. Transrectal ultrasonography may provide quantitative information to manage patients with infiltrating endometriosis.Tumor markers and transvaginal ultrasonography in the diagnosis of endometrioma.To evaluate the accuracy of CA 19.9 plasma levels (with or without CA 125 levels) combined with transvaginal ultrasonography in the differential diagnosis of endometrioma.One hundred eighteen consecutive premenopausal nonpregnant women had laparoscopy or laparotomy between November 1994 and November 1995 because of the presence of a persistent adnexal mass. They underwent transvaginal ultrasonography and measurement of CA 19.9 and CA 125 plasma levels within 2 days before surgery. The ultrasonographic impression and the tumor marker values were compared with the histopathologic diagnosis. The overall agreement between the test result and the actual outcome was calculated using the kappa statistic.Transvaginal ultrasonography had a strong agreement between test result and surgery (kappa value 0.84), whereas the combined methods were associated with a lower kappa value (range 0.24-0.80).Transvaginal ultrasonography used alone is the most cost-effective method in the preoperative differential diagnosis of endometrioma.Transvaginal ultrasonography combined with CA-125 plasma levels in the diagnosis of endometrioma.To assess the role of transvaginal ultrasonography combined with CA-125 plasma levels in the diagnosis of endometrioma.Prospective study with pathological confirmation of the diagnosis.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology of the University of Cagliari, Italy.One hundred one consecutive premenopausal nonpregnant women submitted to laparoscopy or laparotomy, from November 1993 to October 1994, because of the presence of an adnexal mass.Within 2 days before surgery all patients underwent transvaginal ultrasonography and evaluation of CA-125 plasma levels. The ultrasonographic impression and the CA-125 value were then compared with the histopathological diagnosis.The overall agreement between the test result and the actual outcome was calculated using the kappa index for the transvaginal ultrasonography used alone and for the combination of transvaginal ultrasonography and CA-125 values, for each chosen cutoff and range.Transvaginal ultrasonography has a strong agreement between test and surgery (kappa value 0.76) whereas the combined use of the two methods is associated with a lower kappa index, ranging from 0.40 to 0.69.Transvaginal ultrasonography used alone has a better predictive capacity in differentiating endometrioma from other adnexal masses than combined methods.A comparative study between pelvic ultrasonography and laparoscopy in the detection of pelvic pathology in the initial workup of subfertile women.This study was conducted prospectively from June 1992 to September 1993, we evaluated 115 patients attending our infertility clinic for the first time to determine the correlation between abdominal ultrasound and laparoscopy in the detection of pelvic pathology in the initial workup of subfertile women, depicting laparoscopy as the gold standard. Normal ultrasound scans were reported in 80 women (69.56% of total) 58 of whom had also normal pelvic findings at laparoscopy. The remaining 22 patients with normal ultrasound scans had abnormal laparoscopic findings in the pelvis giving a false negative rate of 27.50 per cent. These were primarily related to; endometriosis with adhesions (10), filmy adnexal adhesions (5), omental and bowl adhesions (5), and hydrosalpinx (2). Thirty five women (30.44% of the total) had abnormal scans. Pelvic pathologies were confirmed in 30 at laparoscopy. The remaining five had a normal pelvis (three retroverted uteri, and two functional ovarian cyst had disappeared at time of laparoscopy) giving a false positive rate of 14.29 per cent for ultrasound scans. Statistical analysis revealed that abdominal ultrasound scan in the detection of pelvic pathology in the initial workup of subfertile women has a sensitivity of 57.69 per cent, specificity of 92.06 per cent, positive predictive value of 85.71 per cent with negative predictive value of 72.50 per cent and accuracy rate of 76.52 per cent. We conclude that the use of abdominal ultrasound in the detection of pelvic pathology in the initial workup of subfertile women is not an appropriate routine screening test as it has low efficiency in detecting the pelvic pathologies many of which are the causes of infertility.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)The potential value of magnetic resonance imaging in infertility.The potential value of magnetic resonance imaging as a diagnostic tool in infertility was investigated. Twenty-six women with primary or secondary infertility and symptoms of dysmenorrhoea or menorrhagia were studied prospectively using conventional T1- and T2-weighted spin-echo techniques. Positive diagnoses were obtained in 20 of 26 (76.9%) patients. Of these, 18 (69.2%) had lesions likely to be significantly contributing to infertility. Adenomyosis was detected in 14 patients (53.8%) with 11 showing the diffuse pattern while three had discrete adenomyomas. Cystic lesions typical of endometriosis were detected in seven patients (26.9%), four of these also had evidence of adenomyosis. The endometriotic lesions were also seen at laparoscopy in each case. Five patients (19.2%) had leiomyomas, one in a patient with adenomyosis and endometriosis and one in a patient with endometriosis alone. Only one patient had submucous leiomyomas causing significant distortion of the endometrial mucosa likely to affect fertility. Magnetic resonance imaging is valuable in the investigation of unexplained infertility where it provides a high diagnostic yield particularly if uterine pathology is suspected.The role of endovaginal ultrasound in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian cysts.Endometriomas have a prevalence of 24% among all ovarian cysts. Various sonographic features have been proposed to identify endometriomas. Although the visualization of ovarian masses with low-level internal echoes is suggestive for the endometriotic origin of the cyst, no data are yet available on the specificity of endovaginal ultrasonography in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian masses. To address this issue, the sensitivity, specificity, negative and positive predictive values of endovaginal ultrasonography in comparison with pathology were calculated for each visualized cyst. The study population (n = 251) consisted of all premenopausal non pregnant women submitted to laparotomy or laparoscopy between May 1991 and March 1993 at the Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology of the University of Cagliari. Within one week before surgery, all patients underwent endovaginal ultrasonography and 93 ovarian cysts were visualized. After the scan, the physician gave prospective impressions as to the presence of endometriomas using the visualization of round-shaped homogeneous hypoechoic "tissue" of low-level echoes within the ovary as characteristic ultrasonographic finding. Ultrasonographic impression was compared with histopathological diagnosis. Out of 93 adnexal masses detected by ultrasound, 31 were suspected to be endometriomas and the diagnosis was confirmed in 24. The sensitivity and the specificity of endovaginal ultrasonography in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian cysts were 83% and 89%, respectively. This specificity (89%) is comparable with that obtainable with magnetic resonance imaging (91%).Role of transvaginal sonography in the detection of endometriomata.Endometriosis is a common cause of pelvic pain and infertility in young women. Transvaginal sonography is major means for diagnosing ovarian In our study, we scanned 60 patients with endometriomata who underwent laparotomy or laparoscopy. We compared preoperative ultrasonographic diagnosis with histological reports. The sonographic criteria for the diagnosis of endometriomata were (1) cystic structure with low, homogeneous echogenicity and (2) thick cystic wall with regular margins. In 50 patients, sonography suggested an endometrioma. In 47 cases, the diagnosis was correct. The false-positive cases were all caused by cystic teratomas with a homogeneous sonographic pattern. Ten false-negative cases were diagnosed by ultra-sonography as functional ovarian cysts (5), teratomas (3), and benign ovarian cystoma (1). Only 1 case of a 5-mm endometrioma was demonstrated by laparoscopy but not by TVS. The sensitivity of TVS for diagnosing endometriomata was 82.4% and specificity 97.7%; the positive and negative predictive values were 94% and 92.8%, respectively. The diagnostic accuracy of TVS was 93%. In our experience, TVS is a very specific means for diagnosing endometriomata when the typical pattern is detected; however, the sensitivity of the technique needs to be improved.[Studies on diagnosis of endometriosis by magnetic resonance imaging by means of fat saturation technique].It is difficult to distinguish a small endometrial implant from adipose tissue by magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). I assessed the usefulness of fat saturated MRI in detecting small endometrial implants by comparing it with conventional MRI. Seventy-four patients with clinically suspected endometriosis were referred for MRI. In every patient, laparoscopy or laparotomy was performed. MRI was performed with a 1.5T superconducting magnet with spin echo T1, T2 and fat saturated T1 weighted images. Surgery revealed a normal pelvis in 6 patients, endometriosis in 65, and cystic lesions in three others. With fat saturated MRI, overall sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 87.7%, 66.7%, 95.0% and 42.9%, respectively. At surgery, 160 pigmented lesions of endometriosis were detected. Conventional MRI permitted identification of almost all ovarian endometriomas > 10mm in diameter, as with fat saturated MRI. With conventional MRI, 18 endometrial implant lesions < 10mm in diameter were detected. Including those detected by fat saturated MRI, altogether 42 lesions were detected. Conventional MRI demonstrated only 3 lesions among the 48 blueberry spots, but the additional fat saturated MRI technique increased the detection rate to 21 out of 48. Fat saturated MRI can therefore be used for detecting small endometrial implants.Endometriosis: appearance and detection with conventional and contrast-enhanced fat-suppressed spin-echo techniques.Suspected pelvic endometriosis was prospectively evaluated in 31 women with T1- and T2-weighted conventional spin-echo (CSE) magnetic resonance imaging alone and in combination with T1-weighted fat-suppressed (T1FS) and gadolinium-enhanced T1FS (Gd-T1FS) spin-echo techniques. Images were grouped for interpretation and comparison as follows: (a) CSE alone, (b) CSE/T1FS, and (c) CSE/T1FS/Gd-T1FS. All patients underwent surgery within 3 months of imaging, and 21 patients were found to have endometriosis: 59 endometriomas (26 large and 33 small) and 51 sites of implants were seen. With CSE images, 23 large and six small endometriomas were detected. With CSE/T1FS images, 25 large and 14 small endometriomas were identified. With CSE/T1FS/Gd-T1FS images, 24 large and 14 small endometriomas were detected and ill-defined areas of enhancement were noted in 22 sites throughout the pelvis. These corresponded to endometriotic implants seen at surgery in 14 sites. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy, respectively, for the detection of endometriosis were 76%, 60%, and 71% for CSE, 86%, 50%, and 74% for CSE/T1FS, and 81%, 50%, and 71% for CSE/T1FS/Gd-T1FS images. No significant differences (P > .1) between image combinations for correctly identifying patients with and without endometriosis were seen. The difference in sensitivity between CSE and CSE/T1FS and between CSE and CSE/T1FS/Gd-T1FS images for detecting small endometriomas was significant (P = .03).Comparison of transvaginal sonography and bimanual pelvic examination in patients with laparoscopically confirmed endometriosis.To determine the usefulness of noninvasive clinical tests to diagnose symptomatic endometriosis, we retrospectively reviewed the medical records of 91 patients with chronic pelvic pain and laparoscopically confirmed endometriosis. Thirty-seven women (41%) had pelvic peritoneal endometrial implants with adhesions; in 44 (48%) the ovaries were also affected, and in 10 (11%) the disease involved both the uterus and ovaries. Seventy-nine (87%) women had dysmenorrhea, dyspareunia, or both. Forty-three (47%) had a normal bimanual pelvic examination and 37 (41%) an unremarkable transvaginal sonographic evaluation (no significant difference). The women were divided into two groups: group 1, in whom the disease extended to the ovaries and uterus, and group 2, those in whom only peritoneal implants and adhesions were present. In group 1, 48 women (89%) had an abnormal ultrasonographic evaluation compared with only 4 (11%) in group 2 (p <0.001). Our findings indicate that bimanual pelvic examination and transvaginal sonography are equally accurate in detecting endometriosis; however, when the uterine surface and ovaries are involved, the latter is more informative. Therefore, patients with chronic pelvic pain, especially pain related to menstruation or coitus, should be evaluated laparoscopically to diagnose mild endometriosis adequately.Efficacy of hysterosalpingography in evaluating endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common disease in young women being evaluated for infertility. Although endometriosis may cause tubal abnormalities on hysterosalpingography, efficacy of radiographic evaluation in this disease is not clear. We reviewed the radiographic and laparoscopic examinations in 50 women being studied for infertility. Laparoscopy was normal in 15 women and showed endometriosis in 35 patients. Endometriosis was staged at laparoscopy using the classification of the American Fertility Society. Radiographic examinations were reviewed blindly and tubal status noted in each patient. Criteria for tubal abnormality included incomplete or absent filling and ampullary dilatation or convolution. Radiographic efficacy was determined by correlating the tubal appearance to the severity and location of endometriosis. A total of 98 tubes were correlated but only 10 (10%) were felt to be involved by endometriosis based on laparoscopic findings. Radiologic sensitivity was 40% (4 of 10) and specificity was 83% (73 of 88). Positive predictive value was 21% (4 of 19) due to 15 false-positive diagnoses in tubes uninvolved by endometriosis. In conclusion, endometriosis, regardless of its severity, rarely causes radiographic abnormalities on hysterosalpingography because of the location of disease in the pelvis.Diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis: fat-suppressed T1-weighted vs conventional MR images.The purpose of this study was to compare fat-suppressed T1-weighted with conventional MR images for the diagnosis of endometriosis, focusing on the detectability of peritoneal implants, and to evaluate the usefulness of MR imaging in predicting the severity of disease.We analyzed the MR images of 31 patients with clinically suspected endometriosis. Laparoscopy confirmed no evidence of disease in two and endometriosis in 29. Conventional T1- and T2-weighted images and supplementary axial fat-suppressed images were obtained in all patients. In both groups, detection of endometriotic lesions with MR imaging was compared with detection at laparoscopy. Only the findings on fat-suppressed images were used to evaluate the usefulness of MR imaging in predicting the severity of disease. Early stages of disease included stages I and II; advanced stages of disease included stages III and IV.Diagnostic accuracy was higher with fat-suppressed imaging (77%) than with conventional imaging (55%) (p = .06). The overall sensitivity in detecting peritoneal implants was significantly higher with fat-suppressed imaging (61%) than with conventional imaging (27%) (p < .01). The disease was likely to be at an early stage when MR images showed peritoneal implants that were 5 mm or less in maximum diameter. The disease was likely to be at an advanced stage when MR images showed an endometrial cyst that was larger than 1.5 cm.Our results show that fat-suppressed MR imaging is more accurate in the diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis and is better for predicting the severity of disease than conventional MR imaging is.Scoring system for prediction of ovarian endometriosis based on transvaginal color and pulsed Doppler sonography.To develop a new noninvasive scoring system using clinical signs and symptoms, CA-125 levels, sonographic findings, and transvaginal color and pulsed Doppler parameters for preoperative recognition of ovarian endometriosis.A 5-year prospective study in patients undergoing laparotomy and laparoscopy.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, University of Zagreb, Sveti Duh Hospital, Zagreb, Croatia.Six hundred fifty-six benign and malignant adnexal masses, among which 103 were surgically proved to be ovarian endometriosis.All patients undergoing laparotomy and laparoscopy were examined by transvaginal ultrasonography with color Doppler imaging. Serum levels of CA-125 were measured the day before surgery.The total score was applied in all patients with adnexal masses.The scoring system proved to be very useful in distinguishing ovarian endometriosis from other benign and malignant ovarian lesions, with a sensitivity of 99.02% and a specificity of 99.64%, compared with morphological scoring system's sensitivity of 83.91% and specificity of 97.12%.The new noninvasive scoring system improves significantly the ability to discriminate between endometriosis and other benign and malignant ovarian entities.Diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis by magnetic resonance imaging using "fat-saturation" technique.To assess the usefulness of fat-saturated magnetic resonance (MR) imaging for detecting small endometrial implants.Prospective evaluation by conventional and fat-saturated MR imaging.Shimane Medical University Hospital, Izumo, Japan.Fifty-one consecutive patients with clinically suspected pelvic endometriosis.Magnetic resonance images < 2 weeks before laparoscopy or laparotomy.The location, number, and size of lesions.Surgery revealed a normal pelvis in 5 patients, endometriosis in 44 (42 with pigmented lesions and 2 with nonpigmented lesions and adhesions), and other cystic lesions in 2. With fat-saturated MR imaging, overall sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 89%, 71%, 95%, and 50%, respectively. At surgery, 122 pigmented lesions of endometriosis were detected. Conventional MR images indicated lesions of endometriosis in 74. When fat-saturated images were used, 103 lesions were detected. With conventional MR images, only one of 34 small endometrial implants (2 to 3 mm in diameter) was detected. However, the addition of fat-saturated images increased the detection rate to 15 of 34, and all lesions > 4 mm in diameter.Conventional MR imaging for detecting small endometrial implants was improved by addition of the fat-saturation technique. Therefore, fat-saturation MR imaging is an acceptable for detecting small endometriomas.Adnexal masses: comparison of specificity of endovaginal US and pelvic MR imaging.In a prospective study, 32 women with suspected pelvic masses at physical examination underwent both endovaginal ultrasound (US) and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging to compare their ability in diagnosis of adnexal masses. Criteria for the diagnosis of various types of adnexal masses with MR imaging and endovaginal US were prospectively defined, and the ability of either modality to allow a specific diagnosis was assessed. For each modality, measures of sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were obtained. Results indicated higher diagnostic capability of endovaginal US for simple cysts (five of five), hemorrhagic cysts (eight of nine), endometriomas (nine of 14), and ovarian carcinomas (three of three). MR imaging demonstrated higher diagnostic capability for dermoids (three of three). MR imaging and endovaginal US showed equal diagnostic capability for pedunculated fibroids (two of two). For all masses, observers, and observations, the overall sensitivity of endovaginal US was 76% versus 49% for MR imaging, and the overall accuracy of endovaginal US was 83% versus 70% for MR imaging. The authors suggest that endovaginal US is a better modality than MR imaging for the assessment of suspected pelvic masses.Characterization of hemorrhagic adnexal lesions with MR imaging: blinded reader study.To assess the performance of published criteria for differentiation of endometriomas from other hemorrhagic adnexal lesions with magnetic resonance (MR) imaging, 74 lesions with pathologic proof in 46 patients were evaluated by means of a 1.5-T system with use of conventional T1-weighted and either T2-weighted spin-echo (SE) or fast SE sequences. The MR images were independently presented to each of three blinded readers, and receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis was performed. The criterion of a cyst with high signal intensity on short repetition time (TR)/echo time (TE) images and shading on long TR/TE images had a mean sensitivity of 68%, mean specificity of 83%, and mean accuracy of 76% for diagnosis of endometrioma. Ancillary findings previously reported to be suggestive of endometrioma (eg, low-signal-intensity rims, adhesions, bowel tethering, and implants) were proved inaccurate and showed low interobserver agreement. ROC analysis showed similar area measurements among the three radiologists for diagnosis of endometrioma. MR imaging had only moderate accuracy in distinction of endometriomas from other hemorrhagic adnexal lesions.Pelvic endometriosis: detection and diagnosis with chemical shift MR imaging.Fat-saturation magnetic resonance (MR) imaging for detection and characterization of pelvic endometriosis was prospectively investigated in 35 women with a clinical diagnosis of the disease. Large endometrioma was diagnosed when the lesion was larger than 1 cm in diameter and hyperintense on T1- and T2-weighted images. Small endometrioma was diagnosed when a well-demarcated hyperintense lesion less than 1 cm in diameter was seen on T1-weighted or fat-saturated T1-weighted images. Surgery performed after MR imaging revealed a normal pelvis in six patients, endometriosis in 26 (33 large and 19 small endometriomas), and other cystic lesions in three. Conventional T1- and T2-weighted imaging accurately demonstrated 27 of 33 large endometriomas and two of 19 small endometriomas. Fat-saturation T1-weighted imaging in combination with conventional technique accurately demonstrated 30 of 33 large and nine of 19 small endometriomas. Diagnostic accuracy was improved with addition of fat-saturated images, so their use together with conventional images is recommended in assessment of endometriosis.The efficiency of transvaginal ultrasonography in the diagnosis of endometrioma.To assess the efficiency of transvaginal ultrasonography in the screening of endometriomas and in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian masses.Prospective study with surgical and pathological confirmation of the sonographic diagnosis.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology at the University of Cagliari, Cagliari, Italy.All premenopausal nonpregnant women (n = 236) submitted to laparotomy or laparoscopy from May 1991 to December 1992.Transvaginal ultrasonographic examinations were done within 1 week before surgery. Ultrasonographic diagnosis was compared with surgical and histopathological findings.The visualization of round-shaped homogeneous hypoechoic "tissue" of low-level echoes within the ovary was chosen as characteristic ultrasonographic finding of endometrioma. Sensitivity, specificity, and predicted values were calculated for each visualized ovary (group A) to assess the efficiency in the screening, and for each visualized cyst (group B) to assess the efficiency in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian masses.Four hundred twenty-three of 466 ovaries were visualized. Of the 82 visualized cysts, 27 were suspected to be endometriomas, and the diagnosis was confirmed by pathology in 21. The sensitivity and the specificity were 75% and 99%, respectively, in group A, and 84% and 90%, respectively, in group B.The study demonstrates that transvaginal ultrasonography has an efficiency of 88% in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian masses with a specificity of 90%.Endometriosis: appearance and detection at MR imaging.Thirty-nine magnetic resonance (MR) studies were performed on 31 women with surgically proved endometriosis. A total of 88 endometriotic lesions ranging in size from 0.2 to 7.5 cm were detected on 24 of 30 MR images of women. The signal intensities ranged from hyperintense on all pulse sequences (41 of 88) to hypointense on all sequences (24 of 88); the remainder demonstrated signal intensities corresponding to the appearances of acute, subacute, and chronic hematomas. Hypointense or signal-void rims on both T1- and T2-weighted images were detected in 35 lesions. Identification of the disease with MR imaging versus concurrent surgery was compared for 76 sites in 19 patients. Findings were true-positive in 24 cases, false-negative in ten, true-negative in 32, and false-positive in seven, resulting in an MR sensitivity of 71% and specificity of 82%. Adhesions obscured the disease at laparoscopy in three patients. MR imaging cannot be used as a substitute for laparoscopy in the definitive diagnosis or staging of endometriosis. However, it can be used to monitor treatment response in place of laparoscopy once a diagnosis is firmly established.Pelvic endometriosis: MR imaging.The value of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging at 0.35 T in detecting, characterizing, and staging pelvic endometriosis was prospectively investigated in 30 consecutive women in whom this disease was clinically suspected. MR findings were correlated with the results of laparoscopy (13 women) and laparotomy (17 women). Surgical examination revealed a normal pelvis in five patients and endometriosis in 25. Three of the five normal cases and 16 of the 25 cases of endometriosis were correctly identified with MR imaging (sensitivity, 64%; specificity, 60%; accuracy, 63%). MR imaging demonstrated seven of eight endometriomas but only 14 of 29 adhesions and only six of 45 endometrial implants. While MR imaging demonstrated endometriomas, ovarian adhesions, and extraperitoneal endometrial implants, it could not accurately depict extraovarian endometrial adhesions and intraperitoneal endometrial implants. In addition, MR imaging findings did not correlate with the surgically determined severity of the disease. These limitations indicate that MR imaging cannot be used as the primary modality in the detection, characterization, and staging of endometriosis; laparoscopy remains the procedure of choice.Ultrasound as a diagnostic aid in endometriosis.Endometriosis detection by US with laparoscopic correlation.Endometriosis is a common cause of female infertility. It may affect as many as 40% of infertile women and may be the sole contributing factor to infertility in 15%. A study was undertaken to determine the usefulness of the routine pelvic ultrasound (US) examination in the detection of endometriosis by correlating pelvic US findings with laparoscopic findings in 85 patients who underwent both examinations. Forty-eight patients (56.5%) had no laparoscopic evidence of endometriosis, and 37 patients (43.6%) had endometriosis. Eight of the patients had abnormal sonograms; of these patients, only four had sonographic abnormalities that corresponded to laparoscopically identified endometriosis. Thus, US was successful in detecting endometriosis in only four (10.8%) of 37 patients. US is neither sensitive nor specific in diagnosing endometriosis. Furthermore, we believe that US does not have a significant role in the diagnosis or management of endometriosis in patients in whom a pelvic mass or other obvious pelvic abnormality is not suspected.Double-contrast enema in pelvic endometriosis.The radiographic findings on barium enema in 42 patients with endometriosis were reviewed and correlated with those at surgical and laparoscopic examination. Radiographic abnormalities were detected in 27 patients. In nine patients, purely extrinsic mass effect was identified; bowel wall involvement in these patients was not present at laparoscopy. In 16 of 18 patients subsequently shown to have bowel wall involvement, mass effect with fine mucosal crenulation was identified. Annular or polypoid involvement was also noted. Mass effect with crenulation, although not entirely specific, appears to be a characteristic finding in patients with bowel wall involvement due to endometriosis.Deep infiltrating endometriosis of the bowel wall: the comet sign.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the appearance of deep infiltrating endometriosis of the bowel wall in the cul-de-sac and determine the characteristic appearance of these lesions. We searched our database between January 1, 2011, and December 31, 2013, for all patients who had sonographic findings of suspected deep infiltrating endometriosis of the bowel with obliteration of the cul-de-sac. The medical record of each patient was examined retrospectively for evidence of surgical confirmation of disease. The sonographic appearance, shape, and size of the bowel wall lesions were evaluated to develop criteria for deep infiltrating endometriosis of the rectosigmoid and cul-de-sac. The search of our database revealed 35 patients with sonographic findings of pelvic bowel wall endometriosis associated with obliteration of the cul-de-sac. Ten of these patients had surgical confirmation of bowel wall endometriosis after the scan, and another 4 patients had surgical evidence of endometriosis from prior surgery. All of the patients who underwent surgery subsequent to sonography had confirmation of their bowel wall infiltrative endometriosis. Sonographically, the bowel lesions were solid, focal, and tubular with slightly irregular margins and in most cases a thinner section or a "tail" at one end, resembling a comet. This study confirms that bowel wall implants have a very characteristic appearance, and extending the transvaginal examination to include an evaluation of the rectosigmoid seeking these bowel lesions is valuable, especially in any patient presenting with a history of pelvic pain. [Magnetic resonance imaging as a non-invasive detection tool for extraovarian endometriosis--own experience].Endometriosis--due to its high incidence, associated pain and infertility--constitutes an important problem in gynecological practice. The Polish Gynecological Society Expert Panel recommends to perform magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) prior to laparoscopy The purpose of this study is to present the usefulness of MRI in the diagnosis of extraovarian endometriosis on the basis of own experience.The material consisted of 35 patients, aged 15-52 (mean 36.5 years), who were diagnosed with extraovarian endometriosis on MRI. MR examinations were performed with 1.5 T scanners according to a routine protocol, which incorporates the LAVA sequence of dynamic contrast studies protocol because of thin sections.Extraovarian endometriosis was isolated in 24 patients (68.6%), while in 11 (31.4%) it coexisted with ovarian endometriomas. In 23 cases (65.7%) extraovarian endometriosis was found in one place, in 12 (34.3%)--in two or more locations. Endometriosis was found in the following locations: abdominal wall--11 cases (37.4%), uterine body--9 (25.7%), posterior vaginal fornix--7 (20%), wall of the rectum and sigmoid colon--5 (14.3%), pararectal space--5, uterine cervix--4 (11.4%), Douglas pouch--3 (8.6%), Fallopian tube--2 (5.7%), wall of the small intestine--1 (2.8%), and urinary bladder--1. Adhesions were observed in 28.6% of the patients.MRI is an important addition to the non-invasive diagnosis of extraovarian endometriosis and should be performed before treatment, especially surgical one. The inclusion of fat saturated T1 sequence from the dynamic contrast examination in the study protocol increases the likelihood of detecting small endometrial implants.Can anyone screen for deep infiltrating endometriosis with transvaginal ultrasound?Surgical treatment of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) is complex, and preoperative diagnosis benefits both surgeon and patient. Studies in expert centres have reported high accuracy for transvaginal ultrasound (TVUS) diagnosis of DIE. External validation of these findings has been limited, and no information is available on how quickly these skills can be acquired. The aim of this study was to measure the learning curve of DIE-TVUS and to identify the causes for inaccuracies in the diagnosis of bowel lesions and Pouch of Douglas (POD) obliteration.Following one week of training at the University of São Paulo (Brazil), 205 consecutive women with a history of endometriosis symptoms were prospectively assessed by TVUS after minimal bowel preparation. TVUS findings were correlated with laparoscopic findings in eighty-five cases to assess the accuracy. The LC-CUSUM and CUSUM were used to assess the learning curve and maintenance of competency, respectively.The sensitivity and specificity for DIE of the bladder, vagina and bowel were 33% and 100%, 80% and 100%, and 88% and 93%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity for the presence of POD obliteration were 88% and 90%, respectively. LC-CUSUM analysis confirmed that competency for DIE-TVUS was achieved within 38 scans for the detection of POD obliteration and within 36 scans for the detection of bowel nodules. Competency was maintained for the remainder of the scans as assessed by the CUSUM.After one week of DIE-TVUS training, competency can be achieved within forty procedures, allowing diagnosis of DIE with similar diagnostic accuracy as reported by centres of excellence.Standard high-resolution pelvic MRI vs. low-resolution pelvic MRI in the evaluation of deep infiltrating endometriosis.To compare the capabilities of standard pelvic MRI with low-resolution pelvic MRI using fast breath-hold sequences to evaluate deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).Sixty-eight consecutive women with suspected DIE were studied with pelvic MRI. A double-acquisition protocol was carried out in each case. High-resolution (HR)-MRI consisted of axial, sagittal, and coronal TSE T2W images, axial TSE T1W, and axial THRIVE. Low-resolution (LR)-MRI was acquired using fast single shot (SSH) T2 and T1 images. Two radiologists with 10 and 2 years of experience reviewed HR and LR images in two separate sessions. The presence of endometriotic lesions of the uterosacral ligament (USL), rectovaginal septum (RVS), pouch of Douglas (POD), and rectal wall was noted. The accuracies of LR-MRI and HR-MRI were compared with the laparoscopic and histopathological findings.Average acquisition times were 24 minutes for HR-MRI and 7 minutes for LR-MRI. The more experienced radiologist achieved higher accuracy with both HR-MRI and LR-MRI. The values of sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV, and accuracy did not significantly change between HR and LR images or interobserver agreement for all of the considered anatomic sites.LR-MRI performs as well as HR-MRI and is a valuable tool for the detection of deep endometriosis extension.• High- and low-resolution MRI perform similarly in deep endometriosis evaluation • Low-resolution MRI significantly reduces the duration of the examination • Radiologist experience is fundamental for evaluating deep pelvic endometriosis.Office gel sonovaginography for the prediction of posterior deep infiltrating endometriosis: a multicenter prospective observational study.To use office gel sonovaginography (SVG) to predict posterior deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) in women undergoing laparoscopy.This was a multicenter prospective observational study carried out between January 2009 and February 2013. All women were of reproductive age, had a history of chronic pelvic pain and underwent office gel SVG assessment for the prediction of posterior compartment DIE prior to laparoscopic endometriosis surgery. Gel SVG findings were compared with laparoscopic findings to determine the diagnostic accuracy of office gel SVG for the prediction of posterior compartment DIE.In total, 189 women underwent preoperative gel SVG and laparoscopy for endometriosis. At laparoscopy, 57 (30%) women had posterior DIE and 43 (23%) had rectosigmoid/anterior rectal DIE. For the prediction of rectosigmoid/anterior rectal (i.e. bowel) DIE, gel SVG had an accuracy of 92%, sensitivity of 88%, specificity of 93%, positive predictive value (PPV) of 79%, negative predictive value (NPV) of 97%, positive likelihood ratio (LR+) of 12.9 and negative likelihood ratio (LR-) of 0.12 (P = 3.98E-25); for posterior vaginal wall and rectovaginal septum (RVS) DIE, respectively, the accuracy was 95% and 95%, sensitivity was 18% and 18%, specificity was 99% and 100%, PPV was 67% and 100%, NPV was 95% and 95%, LR+ was 32.4 and infinity and LR- was 0.82 and 0.82 (P = 0.009 and P = 0.003).Office gel SVG appears to be an effective outpatient imaging technique for the prediction of bowel DIE, with a higher accuracy for the prediction of rectosigmoid compared with anterior rectal DIE. Although the sensitivity for vaginal and RVS DIE was limited, gel SVG had a high specificity and NPV for all forms of posterior DIE, indicating that a negative gel SVG examination is highly suggestive of the absence of DIE at laparoscopy.Bowel endometriosis: preoperative diagnostic accuracy of 3.0-T MR enterography--initial results.To prospectively determine the accuracy of 3.0-T magnetic resonance (MR) enterography in the preoperative assessment of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) lesions located in the bowel above the rectosigmoid junction.Institutional review board approval for this study was obtained, and each patient gave written informed consent. Over 18 months, patients with known pelvic DIE who were scheduled for surgery were recruited. Consecutive patients suspected of having bowel endometriosis above the rectosigmoid junction underwent 3.0-T MR enterography. Two blinded readers independently performed a systematic analysis of nine bowel segments above the rectosigmoid junction. MR images were compared with surgical and pathologic findings. Efficacy parameters were calculated with 95% confidence intervals (CIs). Interobserver agreement was assessed with κ statistics.Among the 43 patients enrolled in this study, 33 underwent surgery and were included in the final analyses. Sixteen (48%) patients had bowel DIE lesions located above the rectosigmoid junction at surgery and histopathologic examination. Twenty-six lesions were analyzed, including four ileal, two ileocecal, three cecal, three appendicular, and 14 sigmoid colon lesions. For the diagnosis of these lesions, MR imaging showed sensitivities of 92% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 81.7, 100) for reader 1 and 96% (95% CI: 87.1, 100) for reader 2 and specificities of 100% (95% CI: 98.8, 100) for both readers. The κ value was 0.97.These results show 3.0-T MR enterography is accurate in the preoperative diagnosis and mapping of bowel DIE lesions located above the rectosigmoid junction. Online supplemental material is available for this article.Ultrasound mapping system for the surgical management of deep infiltrating endometriosis.To assess the accuracy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) in defining size and location of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) with laparoscopic/histologic confirmation.Prospective observational study.University hospital.One hundred four women with suspected DIE on the basis of TVS.Patients with DIE underwent TVS evaluation before laparoscopic surgery. An accurate mapping of the extent of the disease was recorded during TVS and at laparoscopy. This new mapping system was developed to assess the extent of endometriosis by measuring the size and depth of the lesions at the various pelvic locations.Surgical and histologic confirmation of the ultrasonographic data to evaluate the presence and location of DIE and creation of a new mapping methodology for detecting DIE by TVS.Depending on the different location of the lesions, the accuracy of TVS ranged from 76%-97%. The lowest sensitivity (59%) and accuracy (76%) were obtained for TVS in the diagnosis of vaginal endometriosis, whereas the greatest accuracy (97%) was shown in detecting bladder lesions and Douglas obliteration.This new ultrasound mapping system is accurate for detecting the extent of DIE and may be useful for preoperative planning and intraoperative management of symptomatic patients with DIE.Learning curve for the detection of pouch of Douglas obliteration and deep infiltrating endometriosis of the rectum.How long does it take to be proficient in diagnosing pouch of Douglas (POD) obliteration and deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) of the rectum with transvaginal sonography (TVS)?Sonographers familiar with the general use of TVS are expected to be proficient in the diagnosis of endometriosis nodules of the rectum and the detection of POD obliteration using the 'sliding sign' after ∼40 examinations, performed in a referral clinic for pelvic pain.With rectal DIE, the reasons for the obvious diagnostic problems are complex. Menstrual pain or cramps are still considered to be 'normal' and do not provide a reason for patients and even health-care providers to seek expert help. Furthermore, the performance of TVS for diagnosing pelvic endometriosis has been shown to be accurate only in experienced hands.This prospective study included 121 selected patients with suspected endometriosis.Symptomatic patients, referred to a pelvic pain clinic, were examined by an expert sonographer (E.S.) and consecutively by two trainees (T1/2).The learning curve using the cumulative sum shows that the trainees, listed as T1/T2, reached the predefined level of proficiency in detecting bowel nodules after examining 42 and 37 patients, for T1 and T2, respectively. The prevalence rate of bowel nodules demonstrated by the ES was 21%. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values (PPV, NPV) as well as the accuracy for TVS of T1 and T2 in comparison with the results of ES were 72 and 89, 96 and 95, 87 and 80, 90 and 98, and 89 and 94%, respectively. The prevalence rate of POD obliteration, as demonstrated by a negative sliding sign, was 27%. The trainees reached the predefined level of proficiency after examining 42 and 33 patients, for T1 and T2, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV as well as the accuracy of TVS for T1 and T2 in comparison with the results of the ES were 83 and 89, 95 and 95, 91 and 80, 90 and 98, and 91 and 94%, respectively.We performed this analysis in a tertiary referral centre with a high number of advanced cases of DIE, not reflecting a standard population.Integrated in TVS training courses, typical sonographic video clips for DIE of the rectum, including the use of disease-specific signs, could help to improve diagnostic accuracy in DIE and shorten diagnostic delays.No funding was received for this study. None of the authors has any competing interests.Three-dimensional ultrasonography in the diagnosis of deep endometriosis.In the use of 'tenderness-guided' transvaginal ultrasound, is the diagnostic accuracy of three-dimensional (3D) ultrasonography better than two-dimensional (2D) ultrasonography in the identification of deep endometriosis?Three-dimensional ultrasonography has a significantly higher diagnostic accuracy in the diagnosis of posterior locations of deep endometriosis without intestinal involvement, such as the uterosacral ligaments, vaginal and rectovaginal endometriosis.The only previous study of the diagnosis of posterior compartment endometriosis reported an poor sensitivity of 3D ultrasonography for uterosacral and sigmoid colon involvement.This diagnostic test study included 202 patients scheduled for surgery because of clinical suspicion of deep pelvic endometriosis and was carried out between January 2009 and September 2012.Modified transvaginal ultrasonography was performed on all of the women by a single examiner. Two locations of deep endometriosis were considered: intestinal involvement and other posterior lesions (including vaginal location, rectovaginal septum and uterosacral ligaments). Once the 2D ultrasonography had been performed, the 3D acquisition was performed and the obtained volume was stored. To avoid the risk of recall bias, the same operator evaluated the 3D volumes 6 months after the last examination using virtual navigation to provide a presumptive diagnosis of the presence and localization of deep endometriosis. In addition, to evaluate the reproducibility of 3D, two operators with different levels of expertise performed a retrospective review of 3D volumes from a random sample of 35 patients, twice, 1 week apart to also assess intraobserver agreement. The diagnostic performance of both tests was expressed as area under the receiver-operating characteristics curve (AUC), sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, positive (LR+) and negative (LR-) likelihood ratios, with their respective 95% confidence interval (CI). Reproducibility was evaluated using kappa statistics.Surgery revealed deep endometriosis in 129 patients. The AUCs for endometriosis of intestinal location were similar for both ultrasound techniques. The AUCs for endometriosis of other posterior locations were significantly different (0.891, 95% CI 0.839-0.943 for 3D versus 0.789, 95% CI 0.720-0.858 for 2D; P = 0.0193). For the intestinal involvement, the specificity, sensitivity, positive and negative predictive value, and LR+ and LR- were 93% (89-95%), 95% (88-98%), 89% (83-92%), 97% (93-99%), 13, and 0.06, respectively, for 2D ultrasound and 97% (93-99%), 91% (84-94%), 95% (88-98%), 95% (91-96%), 25, and 0.09, respectively, for 3D ultrasound. For other posterior locations, the specificity, sensitivity, positive and negative predictive value, and LR+ and LR- were 88% (82-93%), 71% (64-77%), 83% (75-90%), 79% (74-83%), 6.10, 0.32, respectively, for 2D ultrasound and 94% (89-97%), 87% (81-91%), 92% (86-96%), 90% (85-93%), 14.0, 0.14, respectively, for 3D ultrasound. Intraobserver agreement was substantial for both examiners (kappa 0.8754, for operator A and 0.7087, for operator B, respectively). Interobserver agreement was also substantial.The disadvantages of 3D ultrasound to be considered are the necessity of newer ultrasonographic equipment and that fewer sonographers completely know the 3D technique. There are also some limitations within this study. First, an expert examiner performed the real-time ultrasound and 3D volume acquisitions. Second, the same operator also performed the 3D evaluations but at least 6 months after the last acquisition to avoid a possible recall bias.The diagnostic performance obtained in the present study is superior to the accuracy reported in other studies of 3D ultrasonography, but not superior to all other published articles of 2D ultrasonography. The reported high diagnostic accuracy of 3D ultrasound could be widely generalizable because good reproducibility was demonstrated even with an operator with less expertise.This study was supported in part by the Regione Autonoma della Sardegna (project code CPR-24750).Extended transvaginal sonography in deep infiltrating endometriosis: use of bowel preparation and an acoustic window with intravaginal gel: preliminary results.The purpose of this study was to assess the diagnostic performance of extended transvaginal sonography for diagnosing deep infiltrating endometriosis.A prospective study was conducted comprising 51 women (mean age, 32.9 years; range, 23-43 years) with suspected deep infiltrating endometriosis based on clinical symptoms. All women underwent extended transvaginal sonography, which included assessment of 2 pelvic compartments (anterior compartment: bladder and distal ureters; and posterior compartment: posterior vaginal fornix, retrocervical area, pouch of Douglas, and rectosigmoid). The sliding sign for detecting pouch of Douglas obliteration was also assessed. All patients received bowel preparation before sonographic examinations. A single examiner performed all examinations. All women underwent laparoscopic surgery, and histologic confirmation of endometriosis was done. The sensitivity, specificity, positive likelihood ratio (LR+) and negative likelihood ratio (LR-) were calculated.Some women had more than 1 lesion, giving a total of 55 histologically confirmed lesions (rectosigmoid, n = 13; vagina, n = 5; retrocervical, n = 32; bladder, n = 5). The sensitivity, specificity, and LR+ for rectosigmoid involvement were 100%, 93%, and 14.0, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, LR+, and LR- for vaginal involvement were 60%, 98%, 30.0, and 0.41. The sensitivity, specificity, LR+, and LR- for retrocervical involvement were 84%, 96%, 19.4, and 0.16. The sensitivity, specificity, and LR- for bladder involvement were 20%, 100%, and 0.80. The sensitivity, specificity, LR+, and LR- of the sliding sign for diagnosing pouch of Douglas obliteration were 89%, 92%, 10.7, and 0.12.Except for bladder involvement, extended transvaginal sonography has good diagnostic performance for deep infiltrating endometriosis.Can magnetic resonance imaging at 3.0-Tesla reliably detect patients with endometriosis? Initial results.The aim of this study was to determine whether an optimized 3.0-Tesla magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) protocol is sensitive and specific enough to detect patients with endometriosis.This was a prospective cohort study with consecutive patients. Forty consecutive patients with clinical suspicion of endometriosis underwent 3.0-Tesla MRI, including a T2-weighted high-resolution fast spin echo sequence (spatial resolution=0.75 ×1.2 ×1.5 mm³) and a 3D T1-weighted high-resolution gradient echo sequence (spatial resolution=0.75 ×1.2 × 2.0 mm³). Two radiologists reviewed the dataset with consensus reading. During laparoscopy, which was used as reference standard, all lesions were characterized according to the revised criteria of the American Fertility Society. Patient-level and region-level sensitivities and specificities and lesion-level sensitivities were calculated.Patient-level sensitivity was 42% for stage I (5/12) and 100% for stages II, III and IV (25/25). Patient-level specificity for all stages was 100% (3/3). The region-level sensitivity and specificity was 63% and 97%, respectively. The sensitivity per lesion was 61% (90% for deep lesions, 48% for superficial lesions and 100% for endometriomata). The detection rate of obliteration of the cul-the-sac was 100% (10/10) with no false positive findings. The interreader agreement was substantial to perfect (kappa=1 per patient, 0.65 per lesion and 0.71 for obliteration of the cul-the-sac).An optimized 3.0-Tesla MRI protocol is accurate in detecting stage II to stage IV endometriosis.Multidetector computerized tomography enema versus magnetic resonance enema in the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis.To compare the accuracy of multidetector computerized tomography enema (MDCT-e) and magnetic resonance enema (MRI-e) in determining the presence of sigmoid and rectal endometriotic nodules.260 women (32.6 ± 4.3 years) with symptoms suggestive of rectosigmoid endometriosis underwent MDCT-e and MRI-e prior to laparoscopy. After retrograde colonic distention and injection of intravenous contrast medium, patients were scanned on a 64-row MDCT scanner. MRI-e was performed on a 1.5T magnet using an 8 channels phased array coil; intestinal distention was achieved by introducing in the rectum 250-300 ml of ultrasonographic gel diluted with saline solution. Radiological findings were compared with surgical and histological results.176 women had rectosigmoid endometriosis at surgery. There was no significant difference in the accuracy of MDCT-e (98.5%) and MRI-e (96.9%) in the diagnosis of sigmoid and rectal endometriosis (p=0.248). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, positive likelihood ratio and negative likelihood ratio of MDCT-e and MRI-e were respectively 98.3%, 98.8%, 99.4%, 96.5%, 81.59, 0.02 and 97.2%, 96.4%, 98.3%, 94.1%, 26.89, 0.03.Both MDCT-e and MRI-e are accurate in the diagnosis of rectal and sigmoid endometriosis.Diagnostic confidence analysis in the magnetic resonance imaging of ovarian and deep endometriosis: comparison with surgical results.To assess the diagnostic confidence of multiple readers in the magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) diagnosis of endometriosis.Sixty-five patients (mean age 33; range 19-45 years) who had undergone MRI were retrospectively evaluated. Five regions were analysed and the presence of endometriosis was scored on a five-point scale in order to assess the diagnostic confidence. Statistical analysis included receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis, the Cohen weighted test and sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV), accuracy, positive likelihood ratio (LR+) and negative likelihood ratio (LR-).The areas under the curve (AUC) in the detection of ovarian endometrioma were 0.942, 0.893 and 0.883 for readers 1, 2 and 3, respectively; in the uterosacral ligament (USL) AUCs were 0.907, 0.804 and 0.842; in the vaginal fornix (VF) 0.819, 0.733 and 0.69; in the anterior compartment 0.916, 0.833 and 0.873; and in the rectum/sigma/pouch of Douglas (RSD) 0.936, 0.856 and 0.834.Diagnostic confidence of the observers is different according to the region of the nodules of endometriosis and it can be challenging in the VF and for the less experience readers also in the AC and RSD. Moreover the degree of uncertain diagnosis for the less expert readers may reach up to one third of the examinations.• Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is increasingly used to assess endometriosis • The diagnostic confidence of observers varies according to the location of endometriosis • The diagnosis is more difficult to establish by MRI in some anatomical locations • Specific training should be given concerning those locations that cause difficulty.Can rectal endoscopic sonography be used to predict infiltration depth in patients with deep infiltrating endometriosis of the rectum?To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of rectal endoscopic sonography (RES) in the prediction of the infiltration depth of rectal endometriosis and to ascertain whether RES could be used to choose between segmental bowel resection and a more conservative approach, such as shaving or discoid resection.In this retrospective study, 38 consecutive patients with symptomatic deep infiltrating endometriosis of the rectum who underwent laparoscopic colorectal resection were included. RES results for infiltration depth of rectal endometriosis were compared with results of pathological examination. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV, respectively), positive and negative likelihood ratios (LRs) and test accuracy were calculated for the presence of infiltration of the muscularis layers and submucosal/mucosal layers, as demonstrated by RES and confirmed by histopathological analysis.For the detection of muscularis layer infiltration by endometriosis, the PPV of RES was 100%, whereas for the detection of submucosal/mucosal layer involvement, the sensitivity was 89%, specificity was 26%, PPV was 55%, NPV was 71%, test accuracy was 58% and positive and negative LRs were 1.21 and 0.40, respectively.RES is a valuable tool for detecting rectal endometriosis as endometriotic infiltration of the muscularis layer can be predicted accurately. However, RES is less accurate in detecting submucosal/mucosal layer involvement and cannot, therefore, be used to choose between bowel resection and a more conservative approach.Ultrasound mapping of pelvic endometriosis: does the location and number of lesions affect the diagnostic accuracy? A multicentre diagnostic accuracy study.Endometriosis is a common condition which causes pain and reduced fertility. Treatment can be difficult, especially for severe disease, and an accurate preoperative assessment would greatly help in the managment of these patients. The objective of this study is to assess the accuracy of pre-operative transvaginal ultrasound scanning (TVS) in identifying the specific features of pelvic endometriosis and pelvic adhesions in comparison with laparoscopy.Consecutive women with clinically suspected or proven pelvic endometriosis, who were booked for laparoscopy, were invited to join the study. They all underwent a systematic transvaginal ultrasound examination in order to identify discrete endometriotic lesions and pelvic adhesions. The accuracy of ultrasound diagnosis was determined by comparing pre-operative ultrasound to laparoscopy findings.198 women who underwent preoperative TVS and laparoscopy were included in the final analysis. At laparoscopy 126/198 (63.6%) women had evidence of pelvic endometriosis. 28/126 (22.8%) of them had endometriosis in a single location whilst the remaining 98/126 (77.2%) had endometriosis in two or more locations. Positive likelihood ratios (LR+) for the ultrasound diagnosis of ovarian endometriomas, moderate or severe ovarian adhesions, pouch of Douglas adhesions, and bladder deeply infiltrating endometriosis (DIE), recto-sigmoid colon DIE, rectovaginal DIE, uterovesical fold DIE and uterosacral ligament DIE were >10, whilst for pelvic side wall DIE and any ovarian adhesions the + LH was 8.421 and 9.81 respectively.The negative likelihood ratio (LR-) was: <0.1 for bladder DIE; 0.1-0.2 for ovarian endometriomas, moderate or severe ovarian adhesions, and pouch of Douglas adhesions; 0.5-1 for rectovaginal, uterovesical fold, pelvic side wall and uterosacral ligament DIE. The accuracy of TVS for the diagnosis of both total number of endometriotic lesions and DIE lesions significantly improved with increasing total number of lesions.Our study has shown that the TVS diagnosis of endometriotic lesion is very specific and false positive results are rare. Negative findings are less reliable and women with significant symptoms may still benefit from further investigation even if TVS findings are normal. The accuracy of ultrasound diagnosis is significantly affected by the location and number of endometriotic lesions.The usefulness of computed tomographic colonography for evaluation of deep infiltrating endometriosis: comparison with magnetic resonance imaging.We wanted to assess the diagnostic value and morphologic feature of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE), involving rectosigmoid colon, with computed tomography (CT) colonography in comparison with magnetic resonance (MR).Fifty patients with DIE, who had undergone CT colonography and MR imaging (MRI) before surgery, were enrolled. Among these 50 patients who underwent laparoscopic surgery with DIE, 37 patients were diagnosed as rectosigmoid involvement of endometriosis (presence of rectal outer wall involvement, endometrial implantation in the rectouterine space, and complete obliteration of cul-de-sac with histologic confirmation). Image findings at CT colonography and MRI were reviewed by 2 radiologists to determine whether there are radiologic features that can help predict rectosigmoid endometriosis. Computed tomography images were analyzed for the luminal alteration of rectosigmoid colon, mural thickening, and mass formation in the rectosigmoid colon, whereas MR images were analyzed for the mass formation in the rectosigmoid colon, fat plane obliteration, between rectum and uterus or vagina, retroversion of uterus, retraction of uterus toward the colon, and detection of endometrial spot in rectovaginal or rectouterine space. Statistical analysis was performed with Pearson χ and receiver operating characteristic curve.With CT colonography, the luminal alteration of rectosigmoid colon was detected with sensitivity of 96.0% and specificity of 48.0% (P < 0.001) in the overall rectosigmoid endometriosis and with sensitivity of 84.0% and specificity of 80.0% (P = 0.005) in the case of DIE with cul-de-sac obliteration. With MR, the sensitivity and specificity for detection of endometriosis of rectosigmoid or rectouterine space were 94.4% and 37.5% (P = 0.013), respectively. Other variables had no statistical significance. The diagnostic accuracy of CT colonography is higher than that of MRI (area under the curve, 0.786 vs 0.691; P < 0.001), for the overall rectosigmoid endometriosis. In the evaluation of complete cul-de-sac obliteration, morphologic change of rectosigmoid colon is identified more accurately with CT colonography than that of MRI (area under the curve, 0.821 vs 0.686; P < 0.001).Both CT colonography and MRI are highly sensitive to the detection of rectosigmoid endometriosis, but lack specificity. However, the depiction rate of morphologic change in rectosigmoid colon is greater with CT colonography than that of MRI, in the case of cul-de-sac obliteration. The luminal alteration significantly correlates with morphologic change in rectosigmoid endometriosis.Multislice computed tomography with colon water distension (MSCT-c) in the study of intestinal and ureteral endometriosis.This study evaluates retrospectively the accuracy and reproducibility of multislice computed tomography with colon water distension (MSCT-c) in diagnosing bowel (BE) and ureteral (UE) endometriosis. Sixty-four patients underwent MSCT-c and videolaparoscopic surgery. Two radiologists reviewed MSCT-c examinations: sensitivity and specificity were calculated, considering histological exam as reference standard. In the BE cases, the degree of bowel wall infiltration was also assessed. Sensitivity and specificity for both readers were 100% and 97.6% for BE and 72.2% and 100% for UE; the interobserver agreement was excellent. The degree of bowel wall involvement was correctly defined in 90.9% of cases. MSCT-c is an accurate and reproducible technique but-considering the age of the patients-delivers a nonnegligible radiation dose.Three-dimensional sonography for diagnosis of rectovaginal septum endometriosis: interobserver agreement.The aim of this study was to evaluate the interobserver agreement for diagnosis of deep endometriosis of the rectovaginal septum using introital 3-dimensional (3D) sonography.Two experienced observers (observers A and B) performed a retrospective review of stored 3D sonographic volumes from a sample of 84 consecutive patients with a clinical suspicion of endometriosis. Each observer, independently and blinded to each other, evaluated the presence or absence of involvement of the rectovaginal septum. When no lesion was seen, the observers were asked to judge whether the acquisition of the volume was suboptimal for interpretation or whether no lesion on the rectovaginal septum was detectable. One inadequate acquisition case was discarded; a total of 83 cases were evaluated. To calculate the performance of introital 3D sonography, 7 discordant cases were reviewed by a third observer. Interobserver agreement was assessed by calculating the κ index, and the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for the 3 observers were also determined.Interobserver agreement was 0.816 (95% confidence interval, 0.69-0.93), representing very good agreement. Sensitivity was 74.1%; specificity, 85.7%; positive predictive value, 71.4%; and negative predictive value, 87.3%.Our results show that introital 3D sonography for diagnosis of deep endometriosis of the rectovaginal septum is reproducible, with very good interobserver agreement.The prediction of pouch of Douglas obliteration using offline analysis of the transvaginal ultrasound 'sliding sign' technique: inter- and intra-observer reproducibility.What is the inter-/intra-observer agreement and diagnostic accuracy among gynaecological and non-gynaecological ultrasound specialists in the prediction of pouch of Douglas (POD) obliteration (secondary to endometriosis) at offline analysis of two-dimensional videos using the dynamic real-time transvaginal ultrasound (TVS) 'sliding sign' technique?The inter-/intra-observer agreement and diagnostic accuracy for the interpretation of the TVS 'sliding sign' in the prediction of POD obliteration was found to be very acceptable, ranging from substantial to almost perfect agreement for the observers who specialized in gynaecological ultrasound.Women with POD obliteration at laparoscopy are at an increased risk of bowel endometriosis; therefore, the pre-operative diagnosis of POD obliteration is important in the surgical planning for these women. Previous studies have used TVS to predict POD obliteration prior to laparoscopy, with a sensitivity of 72-83% and specificity of 97-100%. However, there have not been any reproducibility studies performed to validate the use of TVS in the prediction of POD obliteration pre-operatively.This was a reproducibility study which involved the offline viewing of pre-recorded video sets of 30 women presenting with chronic pelvic pain, in order to determine POD obliteration using the TVS 'sliding sign' technique. The videos were selected on real-time representative quality/quantity; they were not obtained from sequential patients. There were a total of six observers, including four gynaecological ultrasound specialists and two fetal medicine specialists. The study was conducted over a period of 1 month (March 2012-April 2012).The four gynaecological ultrasound observers performed daily gynaecological scanning, while the other two observers were primarily fetal medicine sonologists. Each sonologist viewed the TVS 'sliding sign' video in two anatomical locations (retro-cervix and posterior uterine fundus), i.e. 60 videos in total. The POD was deemed not obliterated, if 'sliding sign' was positive in both anatomical locations (i.e. anterior rectum/rectosigmoid glided smoothly across the retro-cervix/posterior fundus, respectively). If the 'sliding sign' was negative (i.e. anterior rectum/rectosigmoid did not glide smoothly over retro-cervix/posterior fundal region, respectively), the POD was deemed obliterated. Diagnostic accuracy and inter-observer agreement among the six sonologists was evaluated. The same sonologist was also asked to reanalyse the same videos, albeit in a different order, at least 7 days later to assess for intra-observer agreement. A separate analysis of the inter- and intra-observer correlation was also performed to determine the agreement among the four observers who specialized in gynaecological ultrasound. Cohen's κ coefficient <0 meant that there was poor agreement, 0.01-0.20 slight agreement, 0.21-0.40 fair agreement, 0.41-0.60 moderate agreement, 0.61-0.80 substantial agreement and 0.81-0.99 almost perfect agreement.Agreement (Cohen's κ) between all six observers for the interpretation of the 'sliding sign' for both sets of videos in both regions (retro-cervix and fundus) ranged from 0.354 to 0.927 (fair agreement to almost perfect agreement) compared with 0.630-0.927 (substantial agreement to almost perfect agreement) when only the gynaecological sonologists were included. The overall multiple rater agreement for the interpretation of the 'sliding sign' for both video sets and both regions was Fleiss' κ 0.454 (P-value <0.01) for all six observers and 0.646 (P-value <0.01) for the four gynaecological ultrasound specialists. The multiple rater agreement for all six or all four observers was higher for the retro-cervical region versus the fundal region (Fleiss' κ 0.542 versus 0.370 and 0.732 versus 0.560, respectively). The intra-observer agreement among the six observers for the interpretation of the 'sliding sign' and prediction of POD obliteration ranged from Cohen's κ 0.60-0.95 and 0.46-1.0 (P-value <0.01), respectively. After excluding the fetal medicine specialists, the intra-observer agreement for the interpretation of the 'sliding sign' and the prediction of POD obliteration ranged from Cohen's κ 0.71-0.95 and 0.67-1.0, respectively, indicating substantial to almost perfect agreement. When comparing the four gynaecological observers for the prediction of POD obliteration using the TVS 'sliding sign' (after excluding cases with the POD outcome classified as 'unsure' by the observers), the results for accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value were 93.1-100, 92.9-100, 90.9-100, 77.8-100 and 97.7-100%, respectively.The 'gold standard' for the diagnosis of POD obliteration is laparoscopy; however, laparoscopic data were available only for 24 out of 30 (80%) TVS 'sliding sign' cases included in this study. Although this should not affect the inter- and intra-observer agreement findings, the ability to draw conclusions regarding the diagnostic accuracy of the TVS 'sliding sign' in the prediction of POD obliteration is somewhat limited. In addition, the diagnostic accuracy findings should be interpreted with the caveat that the cases classified as 'unsure' for the prediction of POD obliteration were excluded from the analysis.We have validated the dynamic real-time TVS 'sliding sign' technique for the prediction of POD obliteration, and this simple ultrasound-based test appears to have very acceptable inter-/intra-observer agreement for those who are experienced in gynaecological ultrasound. Given that women with POD obliteration at laparoscopy have an increased risk of bowel endometriosis and requirement for bowel surgery, the TVS 'sliding sign' test should be considered in the pre-operative imaging work-up for all women with suspected endometriosis, to allow for appropriate surgical planning. We believe the TVS 'sliding sign' technique may be easily learned by sonologists/sonographers who are familiar with performing gynaecological ultrasound, and that further studies are required to confirm the diagnostic accuracy of this new ultrasound technique amongst sonologists/sonographers with various levels of experience.This study received no specific grant from any funding agency in the public, commercial or not-for-profit sectors and the authors declare no competing interests.Transvaginal sonography for preoperative assessment of deep endometriosis.To determinate transvaginal scan (TVS) accuracy in the preoperative evaluation of deep endometriosis in a large cohort of patients with subsequent laparoscopic assessment.A retrospective study was performed in a tertiary referral center for endometriosis. Transvaginal scan reports were retrieved from an electronic database of all patients who underwent laparoscopy for pelvic pain or infertility in 2009. The accuracy of TVS was assessed for 10 different sites of pelvic endometriosis.Four hundred twenty women were included in the study. Sensitivity and specificity of TVS were 61% and 99%, respectively, for bladder endometriosis, 52% and 96% for endometriosis of rectovaginal septum, 65% and 99% for rectum endometriosis, and 69% and 98% for endometriosis of the sigmoid colon.TVS appears to be useful for the detection of endometriosis located in the bladder and involving the sigmoid colon, the rectovaginal septum, and the rectum.Comparison of 3D and 2D FSE T2-weighted MRI in the diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis: preliminary results.To evaluate image quality and diagnostic accuracy of two- (2D) and three-dimensional (3D) T2-weighted magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) for the evaluation of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).One hundred and ten consecutive patients with suspicion of endometriosis were recruited at two institutions over a 5-month period. Twenty-three women underwent surgery, 18 had DIE at histology. Two readers independently evaluated 3D and 2D MRI for image quality and diagnosis of DIE. Descriptive analysis, chi-square test for categorical or nominal variables, McNemar test for comparison between 3D and 2D T2-weighted MRI, and weighted "statistics" for intra- and interobserver agreement were used for statistical analysis.Both readers found that 3D yielded significantly lower image quality than 2D MRI (p < 0.0001). Acquisition time for 3D was significantly shorter than 2D MRI (p < 0.01). 3D offered similar accuracy to diagnose DIE compared to 2D MRI. For all locations of endometriosis, a high or variable intra-observer agreement was observed for reader 1 and 2, respectively.Despite a lower overall image quality, 3D provides significant time saving and similar accuracy than multiplanar 2D MRI in the diagnosis of specific DIE locations.Deep pelvic endometriosis: accuracy of pelvic MRI completed by MR colonography.This study assessed the diagnostic accuracy of pelvic magnetic resonance (MR) imaging completed by MR colonography for the preoperative evaluation of deep pelvic endometriosis in patients undergoing laparoscopic surgery.A total of 143 patients (mean age 34.3 ± 5.1 years) with a clinical suspicion of deep pelvic endometriosis were assessed by pelvic MR and MR colonography. All patients underwent laparoscopic surgery 3-10 weeks after the MR examination. The presence, location, number and extent of endometriotic lesions were evaluated. Data obtained with MR were compared with surgical findings. MR sensitivity, specificity, positive (PPV) and negative (NPV) predictive values and diagnostic accuracy values were calculated for each site by considering the laparoscopic and histological findings as the reference standard.Laparoscopy confirmed the presence of endometriosis in 119/143 patients (83%); in 76/119 (64%) deep pelvic endometriosis was diagnosed, whereas in the remaining 43/119 (36%), superficial peritoneal implants and endometriomas were found. In 32/119 (27%) patients, intestinal lesions were detected. MR had sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and diagnostic accuracy values of 67-100%, 85-100%, 83-100%, 84-100% and 84-100%, respectively, in recognising lesions located in different pelvic sites.MR imaging combined with colonography is a highly accurate tool for characterising deep endometriotic lesions in patients scheduled for laparoscopic surgery. In particular, MR colonography has very high accuracy in detecting colorectal involvement.Transvaginal sonographic diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma.To assess the efficacy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) in differentiating endometriomas from other adnexal masses.One thousand thirty-five adnexal masses undergoing laparoscopy or laparotomy were evaluated prospectively using TVS. Masses diagnosed as endometrioma according to their sonographic appearance were divided into two groups: those with a round shape, regular margins, thick walls and homogeneous, low-level echoes (group A); or those with irregular margins, internal septations and an anechoic appearance (group B).The sensitivity of TVS in diagnosing endometriomas was 86.50% and the specificity 99.11%. The positive predictive value (PPV) and the negative predictive value of the test were calculated to be 91.45% and 98.14%, respectively. By using the criteria determining group A, the PPV of the test increased to 97%, whereas group B had a lower PPV (70.85%).We propose that the accuracy of TVS in diagnosing endometriomas may be beneficial in various clinical conditions.Accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging for diagnosis and preoperative assessment of deeply infiltrating endometriosis.To evaluate the accuracy of preoperative magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) findings relative to surgical presence of deeply infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).This prospective study included 92 women with clinical suspicion of DIE. The MR images were compared with laparoscopy and pathology findings. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of MRI for diagnosis of DIE were assessed.DIE was confirmed at histopathology in 77 of the 92 patients (83.7%). Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of MRI to diagnose DIE at each of the specific sites evaluated were as follows: retrocervical space (89.4%, 92.3%, 96.7%, 77.4%, 90.2%); rectosigmoid (86.0%, 92.9%, 93.5%, 84.8%, 89.1%); bladder (23.1%, 100%, 100%, 88.8%, 89.1%); ureters (50.0%, 100%, 95.5%, 95.7%); and vagina (72.7%, 100%, 100%, 96.4%, 96.7%).MRI demonstrates high accuracy in diagnosing DIE in the retrocervical region, rectosigmoid, bladder, ureters, and vagina.Transvaginal ultrasound after bowel preparation to assist surgical planning for bowel endometriosis resection.Three-dimensional ultrasound and three-dimensional power Doppler improve the preoperative evaluation of complex benign ovarian lesions.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of three-dimensional ultrasound (3D-US) and three-dimensional power-Doppler (3DPD-US) as adjuncts to conventional B-mode-US in evaluation of complex benign ovarian lesions.Transvaginal B-mode-US, 3D-US and 3DPD-US were performed in 29 patients with unilateral ovarian lesion. Patients were classified as low or high risk for malignancy according to a standardized scoring system composed of ten morphological and vascular parameters. Preoperative scores were matched to the histological results and the diagnostic performance of the scoring system was calculated.Seven out of the 16 cases of endometriomas (44%) were graded as low risk masses according to B-mode-US, while the addition of 3D-US and 3DPD-US increased the accuracy to 56% and 94%, respectively. All dermoid cysts were classified as high risk cases by B-mode-US, but 3D-US and 3DPD-US correctly classified 14% and 57% of cases, respectively. The use of B-mode-US, 3D-US and 3DPD-US correctly classified all four cystadenomas. Only the use of 3DPD-US correctly classified one out of two hemorrhagic corpus luteum cases, whereas the other imaging modalities characterized these lesions as high risk. The overall diagnostic accuracy increased from 38%, 48%, ana 83% with the application of B-mode-US alone, or combined with 3D-US and 3DPD-US, respectively.Conventional ultrasound supplemented with 3D-US and 3DPD-US and the evaluation of findings according to a specific scoring system can facilitate the preoperative classification of complex benign ovarian lesions.The value of pelvic MRI in the diagnosis of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration in cases of deep pelvic endometriosis.The objective of our study was to define relevant MRI signs allowing preoperative diagnosis of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration in patients with deep pelvic endometriosis.This retrospective study included patients who underwent pelvic MRI completed by a laparoscopic examination. Three radiologists performed the MRI review blinded and recorded the following signs: sign 1, retroflexed uterus; sign 2, retrouterine mass; sign 3, displacement of intraperitoneal fluid; sign 4, elevation of the fornix; and sign 5, adherence of bowel loops. Laparoscopic results provided the criterion standard for diagnosis of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration. The performance of MRI was evaluated by calculating the average sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of MRI results of the two more experienced radiologists for each sign and for combinations of signs. Interobserver agreement for each sign and impression for posterior cul-de-sac obliteration were calculated for all radiologists.Sixty-three patients were included in the study. Posterior cul-de-sac obliteration was diagnosed in 43 patients at laparoscopy. The mean sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of each sign and impression of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration were, respectively, as follows: sign 1, 24.4%, 77.5%, 41.3%; sign 2, 97.1%, 83.7%, 92.8%; sign 3, 95.0%, 88.7%, 93.1%; sign 4, 30.2%, 97.5%, 51.6%; sign 5, 83.7%, 91.2%, 86.1%; and impression of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration, 91.9%, 91.2%, 91.7%. Interobserver concordance varied from 0.26 to 0.81 with best results obtained with the combination of signs 2, 3, and 5. Best concordances for junior radiologist evaluations were obtained with assessment of sign 3.MRI allows posterior cul-de-sac obliteration diagnosis. Pelvic fluid displacement may be the sign with greatest utility when considering both diagnostic accuracy and interobserver agreement.[Preoperative imaging of deeply infiltrating endometriosis in: Transvaginal sonography, rectal endoscopic sonography and magnetic resonance imaging].Compare the accuracy of transvaginal ultrasonography (TVUS), rectal endoscopic sonography (RES), and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) before deeply infiltrating endometriosis surgery.A retrospective study with 25 deeply endometriosis patients underwent the three imaging examinations before surgery. Calculation of sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy for the different locations: ovaries, uterosacral ligaments and torus, rectovaginal septum, rectosigmoid junction, bladder.Ovarian and deep pelvic endometriosis was found in surgery and confirmed by histology in all patients. Sensitivity and specificity are respectively: for ovaries: 88.2% and 71% of TVUS; 80% and 81.2% of RES; 87.5% and 71% of MRI. For uterosacral ligaments: 63% and 82,6% of TVUS; 37% and 100% of RES; 69% and 82.6% of MRI. For torus: 57.1% and 100% of TVUS; 76.2% and 100% of RES; 76.2% and 100% of MRI. For rectovaginal septum: 63.2% and 100% for TVUS; 89.5% and 66.7% of EER; 47.4% and 100% of MRI. For rectosigmoid junction: 73.7% and 66.7% of TVUS; 94.7% and 66.7% of RES; 89.5% and 50% of MRI. For bladder: 16.7% and 100% of TVUS; 16.7% and 100% of RES; 33.3% and 89.5% of MRI.We found that TVUS is the more performant for endometriomas, it is MRI for torus, uterosacral ligaments and little bladder lesions, RES for rectovaginal septum and rectosigmoid junction. So in the clinical practice, the three imaging examinations are complementary for the preoperative assessment of deeply endometriosis.Beyond laparoscopy: 3-T magnetic resonance imaging in the evaluation of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration.Endometriosis is the ectopic localization of endometrial glands. Symptoms include a wide variety of chronic pelvic pain. Ovarian endometriosis represents the most frequent site of implantation followed by the Douglas pouch which is undepicted unless peritoneal fluid is present. Pelvic exams may be reported as normal in 40% of evaluations, although multiple nodularities are located in this region. Nowadays, laparoscopy represents the standard technique for endometriosis evaluation. However, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) remains the best noninvasive technique for the evaluation of pelvic lesions. According to the importance of a precise preoperative diagnosis of deep infiltrative endometriosis involving the Douglas pouch, we evaluated feasibility of a 3-T system in the evaluation of this particular region.We enrolled 19 women coming with either ultrasound or anamnestic suspicion of endometriosis. Pelvic MRI examination was performed on the 3-T system. We applied a standard exam protocol including pulse sequences [single-shot fast spin echo (FSE)] and high-resolution T2W and T1W FSE sequences with and without FS.MRI diagnosed posterior cul-de-sac obliteration in 15/19 patients. MRI findings were compared with laparoscopy, thus obtaining the following statistical values: mean sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value, respectively, of 93%, 75%, 93% and 75%. Moreover, we calculated an interobserver agreement k value of 0.72 with a substantial degree of agreement between two radiologists of a sensitivity value of 93% and specificity value of 75%.Precise preoperative mapping of posterior cul-de-sac region is essential for a preoperative planning. In our work, the 3-T MRI was shown to be excellent in the evaluation of posterior cul-de-sac obliteration associated to an optimal evaluation of the uterosacral ligaments due to the higher contrast spatial resolution.The value of MRI in assessing parametrial involvement in endometriosis.What is the accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the diagnosis of parametrial endometriosis in comparison with surgicopathological findings?MRI displayed an accuracy of 96.4% in the preoperative diagnosis of parametrial involvement by deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).MRI is the best technique for preoperative mapping of DIE. This preliminary paper shows that T2-weighted MRI is a valuable tool for the preoperative evaluation of parametrial involvement by endometriosis.A retrospective study of an MRI database was used to identify examinations performed in women, who had a clinical suspicion of pelvic endometriosis (n=666), between 2005 and 2009 in a university medical centre in France.Exclusion criteria were previous surgery for DIE, incomplete surgical evaluation, repeat MRI examinations and incomplete MR protocol. Only symptomatic patients who underwent surgery with a pathological correlation were included (n=83). An experienced radiologist, blind to the surgical and histological findings, evaluated sagittal, axial and thin-section oblique axial MR images obtained from the 83 patients.Descriptive statistics and Fisher exact test were used.The prevalence of DIE and parametrial endometriosis was 76/83 (91.6%) and 12/83 (14.5%), respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, accuracy and positive and negative likelihood ratios for the diagnosis of parametrial endometriosis of low signal intensity on T2-weighted MRI, pelvic wall involvement and ureteral dilatation, were 83.3%, 98.6%, 90.9%, 97.2%, 96.4%, 59.2 and 0.17, 58.3%, 98.6%, 87.5%, 93.3%, 92.8%, 41.4 and 0.42 and 16.7%, 100%, 100%, 87.7%, 88%, infinity and 0.83, respectively, with the patient as the unit of analysis. BIAS AND LIMITATIONS: The study design was retrospective, and thus prone to bias. Only one experienced reader performed the analysis, so no data are available on intra- or interobserver variability. GENERALISABILITY: At present, no consensus exists on the optimal MR protocol to be used for the evaluation of DIE, thus limiting the wider implications of this study.No funding was obtained for this study. The authors have no conflict of interest.Transvaginal ultrasonography of rectosigmoid endometriosis: interobserver variation of lesion size.This study evaluates the interobserver variation of transvaginal ultrasonographic measurements of the size of deep infiltrating endometriosis lesions in the rectosigmoid wall performed by an experienced and a less experienced sonographer. Fifteen outpatient women were seen for a gynecologic examination and 24 women were seen with rectosigmoid endometriosis. Transvaginal ultrasonography was performed independently by two observers with a focus on the presence and size of rectosigmoid endometriosis. The senior observer had several years of experience, whereas the junior observer was a medical student with no prior experience in transvaginal ultrasonography. The findings of the two observers were identical concerning the identification of rectosigmoid endometriosis. The probability of differences in size within 30% of the mean was 0.81, 0.63 and 0.61 for length, width and depth, respectively. Our data suggest that fair skills in this technique can be acquired by inexperienced examiners within a short period of time.Deep infiltrating endometriosis of the bowel: MR imaging as a method to predict muscular invasion.To evaluate magnetic resonance (MR) imaging morphologic- and signal intensity abnormalities of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) of the bowel wall and to assess its value in predicting depth and extent of bowel wall infiltration.This single-center study was performed in a tertiary referral center for endometriosis. All patients (n = 28) who underwent segmental bowel resection (2004-2010) were retrospectively studied. MR images were analyzed by two experienced readers independently (number of lesions, location, size, signal intensity, and depth of bowel wall infiltration) and this was correlated with histopathology.The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy for diagnosis of endometriosis infiltrating the muscular layer of the bowel were 100%, 75%, 96%, 100%, and 96%, respectively. The inter-rater agreement was 0.84. "Fan shaped" configurations with hypointensity on T2- and T1-weighted imaging were characteristic for thickening of indigenous smooth muscle and smooth muscle hyperplasia at histopathology, as a consequence of infiltration by endometriosis. Thickening of the (sub)mucosa corresponded to edema with or without infiltration of endometriosis.MR imaging at 1.5 Tesla is useful to predict muscular infiltration of the bowel in endometriosis, whereas it is of limited value in diagnosis of (sub)mucosal infiltration.Deeply infiltrating endometriosis: evaluation of retro-cervical space on MRI after vaginal opacification.To prospectively investigate diagnostic value and tolerability of MRI after intra-vaginal gel opacification for diagnosis and preoperative assessment of deeply infiltrating endometriosis.Sixty-three women with clinical suspicion of deeply infiltrating endometriosis were previously examined with trans-vaginal ultrasonography and then with MRI pre and post administration of vaginal gel. We evaluated the tolerability of this procedure with a scoring scale from 0 to 3. We also assessed with a score from 1 to 4 the visibility of four regions: Douglas-pouch, utero-sacral-ligaments, posterior-vaginal-fornix and recto-vaginal-septum. All patients underwent laparoscopic surgery after MRI.Five patients considered procedure intolerable. Visibility of utero-sacral-ligaments and posterior-vaginal-fornix showed to be increased with gel (p<0.001). In 57 out of 80 patients the MRI has allowed us to diagnose deeply infiltrating endometriosis. Overall, the percentages of MRI-sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were respectively 67.8%, 95.3%, 89.4 and 83.5% without gel, and 90.8%, 94.6%, 90.8% and 94.6% with gel; trans-vaginal ultrasonography sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 57.5%, 96.6%, 90.9% and 79.5%. In evaluation of utero-sacral-ligaments trans-vaginal ultrasonography, MRI without gel and with gel sensitivity was respectively 61.9%, 47.6% and 81%; for recto-vaginal-septum these values were 12.5%, 68.7% and 93.7%; for pouch of Douglas 82%, 87% and 97.4%; finally for posterior-vaginal-fornix 27.3%, 36.4% and 81.8%.MRI with gel opacification of vagina should be recommended for suspicion of deep infiltrating endometriosis, in particular for the added value in evaluation of recto-vaginal septum, utero-sacral ligaments and posterior vaginal fornix.Feasibility of 3.0T pelvic MR imaging in the evaluation of endometriosis.Endometriosis represents an important clinical problem in women of reproductive age with high impact on quality of life, work productivity and health care management. The aim of this study is to define the role of 3T magnetom system MRI in the evaluation of endometriosis.Forty-six women, with transvaginal (TV) ultrasound examination positive for endometriosis, with pelvic pain, or infertile underwent an MR 3.0T examination with the following protocol: T2 weighted FRFSE HR sequences, T2 weighted FRFSE HR CUBE 3D sequences, T1 w FSE sequences, LAVA-flex sequences. Pelvic anatomy, macroscopic endometriosis implants, deep endometriosis implants, fallopian tube involvement, adhesions presence, fluid effusion in Douglas pouch, uterus and kidney pathologies or anomalies associated and sacral nervous routes were considered by two radiologists in consensus. Laparoscopy was considered the gold standard.MRI imaging diagnosed deep endometriosis in 22/46 patients, endometriomas not associated to deep implants in 9/46 patients, 15/46 patients resulted negative for endometriosis, 11 of 22 patients with deep endometriosis reported ovarian endometriosis cyst. We obtained high percentages of sensibility (96.97%), specificity (100.00%), VPP (100.00%), VPN (92.86%).Pelvic MRI performed with 3T system guarantees high spatial and contrast resolution, providing accurate information about endometriosis implants, with a good pre-surgery mapping of the lesions involving both bowels and bladder surface and recto-uterine ligaments.Evaluation of MR diffusion-weighted imaging in differentiating endometriosis infiltrating the bowel from colorectal carcinoma.Endometriosis infiltrating the bowel may be difficult to differentiate from colorectal carcinoma in cases that present with non-specific clinical and imaging features. The aim of this study is to assess the value of MR diffusion-weighted imaging (DWI) in differentiating endometriosis infiltrating the bowel from colorectal carcinoma.In 66 patients, MR DWI was added to the standard imaging protocol in patients visiting our outdoor MR clinic for the analysis of suspected or known deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE). In patients diagnosed with DIE infiltrating the bowel on MR imaging, high b-value diffusion-weighted images were qualitatively assessed by two readers in consensus and compared to high b-value diffusion weighted images in 15 patients evaluated for colorectal carcinoma. In addition, ADC values of lesions were calculated, using b-values of 50, 400 and 800 s/mm(2).A total of 15 patients were diagnosed with DIE infiltrating the bowel on MR imaging. Endometriosis infiltrating the bowel showed low signal intensity on high b-value diffusion-weighted images in all patients, whereas colorectal carcinoma showed high signal intensity on high b-value diffusion-weighted images in all patients. Mean ADC value in endometriosis infiltrating the bowel (0.80 ± 0.06 × 10(-3)mm(2)/s) was significantly lower compared to mean ADC value in colorectal carcinoma (0.86 ± 0.06 × 10(-3 )mm(2)/s), but with considerable overlap between ADC values.Only qualitative assessment of MR DWI may be valuable to facilitate differentiation between endometriosis infiltrating the bowel and colorectal carcinoma.Adding cancer antigen 125 screening to gray scale sonography for predicting specific diagnosis of benign adnexal masses in premenopausal women: is it worthwhile?The purpose of this study was to assess whether a single determination of the serum cancer antigen 125 (CA-125) level provides additional information to sonography for specific diagnosis of benign adnexal masses in premenopausal women.We conducted a retrospective study comprising 1058 premenopausal women (mean age, 34.8 years) with histologically proven benign adnexal masses. All women had undergone transvaginal sonography and serum CA-125 determination within 1 week before surgery and tumor removal. According to "pattern recognition" analysis, a presumptive diagnosis was provided on gray scale transvaginal sonography for all masses. Positive and negative likelihood ratios were calculated for gray scale sonography and gray scale sonography plus CA-125.Eighty-five women had bilateral masses (1143 masses analyzed). In 7 women with bilateral masses, the histologic diagnoses of the masses were discordant and were excluded. Histologic diagnoses were as follows: endometrioma, n = 452; dermoid cyst, n = 180; serous cyst, n = 158; hemorrhagic cyst, n = 119; mucinous cyst, n = 54; hydrosalpinx, n = 37; and other, n = 109. The median CA-125 level was significantly higher in endometrioma (71.9 IU/mL; range: 5-2620 IU/mL) and hydrosalpinx (59.2 IU/mL; range, 5-601 IU/mL) compared to all other tumor types (P < .001). The CA-125 level was 35 IU/mL or higher in 74% of endometriomas, 58% of hydrosalpinges, 34% of hemorrhagic cysts, 18% of mucinous cysts, 14% of dermoid cysts, and 8% of serous cysts. The positive and negative likelihood ratios for sonography and sonography plus CA-125 (335 IU/mL) for each kind of tumor were not statistically different except for endometrioma, for which the positive likelihood ratio for sonography plus CA-125 (55.0; 95% confidence interval, 27.5-109.9) was significantly higher than for sonography alone (19.2; 95% confidence interval, 13.6-27.1).Cancer antigen 125 screening does not add useful information for specific diagnosis of benign adnexal tumors, except for endometrioma. An elevated CA-125 level significantly increases the probability of such a lesion.[Prospective study of the correlation of ultrasonography and CA125 in the management of ovarian cysts: a study of 77 cases].To study the correlation between ultrasound, Doppler,measurement of CA 125 and histology in the preoperative diagnosis of ovarian cysts.Prospective and analytical study about 77 patients in whom we analyzed the contribution of ultrasound, the assay of CA125, the couple CA125 ultrasonography and laparoscopy in the diagnosis and management of cysts the ovary. The value of CA125 was considered pathological like the one adopted by our biochemistry laboratory of the CHU Habib Bourguiba, Sfax (> 35 UI / ml).The mean age was 35.6 years. On the whole, ultrasound has a sensitivity of 71.41% and a specificity of 80%. The positive predictive value was 35.71% and negative predictive value was 96.55%. The sensitivity of CA125 to detect malignant lesions among ovarian cysts was 85.71% and a specificity of 85.93%. The PPV was low (42.85%). The combination Ultrasound-CA125 had a sensitivity of 85.7%, a specificity of 82.8%, a PPV and NPV respectively 35.3% and 98.1%. The concordance between the macroscopic perlaparoscopic and histological diagnosis of different tumors was 83.3% for functional cysts, 77.7% for serous cysts, and 100% for dermoid cysts, endometriosis and bleeding.The contribution of Doppler ultrasound and tumor markers is essential in the diagnosis of ovarian cysts.Comparison of transvaginal sonography and double-contrast barium enema for diagnosing deep infiltrating endometriosis of the posterior compartment.To compare the diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) and double-contrast barium enema (DCBE) in the preoperative detection of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) of the posterior compartment.This was a prospective study of 69 consecutive patients with results of pelvic examination or symptoms suggestive of DIE of the posterior compartment. TVS and DCBE were performed before surgery by two groups of physicians specialized in endometriosis, each blinded to the results of the other technique. Imaging data were compared with histopathologic analysis of the resected specimen (gold standard). Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values and test accuracies were calculated for both imaging modalities.Sixty seven of the 69 women had a nodule of DIE confirmed at laparoscopy and histopathologic examination. TVS diagnosed DIE in 57 (85%) of these patients, while DCBE revealed the presence of the lesion in 24 (36%) women. For the diagnosis of posterior DIE, TVS and DCBE had, respectively, a sensitivity of 85% and 36%, specificity of 100% and 100%, positive predictive value of 100% and 100%, negative predictive value of 17% and 4% and accuracy of 85.5% and 38%. In patients with pure bowel DIE the sensitivity was 91% and 43%, specificity was 100% and 100%, positive predictive value was 100% and 100%, negative predictive value was 29% and 6% and accuracy was 91% and 45%, respectively.TVS has a much higher sensitivity than does DCBE in detecting the presence of posterior DIE and should thus be regarded as the imaging modality of choice when there is clinical suspicion of the disease.Transvaginal sonography vs. clinical examination in the preoperative diagnosis of deep infiltrating endometriosis.The aim of this study was to compare the diagnostic performance of clinical vaginal examination with that of transvaginal sonography (TVS) in the presurgical diagnosis of deep infiltrating endometriosis.One-hundred and fifty-five women with symptoms suggestive of endometriosis were included. One-hundred and twenty-nine patients met the inclusion criteria and were prospectively and independently assessed by vaginal examination and TVS prior to a diagnostic laparoscopy and, where appropriate, radical resection and histological confirmation of endometriosis was performed. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive values (PPV), negative predictive values (NPV) and positive and negative likelihood ratios (LR+ and LR-) were calculated for each test method.In total, 83 (64%) women had histological confirmation of endometriosis, 52 (40%) of whom had deep infiltrating endometriosis. The prevalence of endometriosis on the uterosacral ligaments, pouch of Douglas, vagina, bladder, rectovaginal space and rectosigmoid was 23.3%, 16.3%, 8.5%, 3.1%, 6.9% and 24%. PPV, NPV, LR+ and LR- for vaginal examination were 92%, 87%, 41.56 and 0.60 for ovarian endometriosis; 43%, 84%, 2.48 and 0.63 for uterosacral ligament disease; 64%, 95%, 9.14 and 0.26 for involvement of the pouch of Douglas; 80%, 97%, 42.91 and 0.28 for vaginal endometriosis; 78%, 98%, 46.67 and 0.23 for endometriosis of the rectovaginal space; 100%, 98%, 75.60 and 0.75 for bladder involvement; 86%, 84%, 18.97 and 0.63 for rectosigmoidal endometriosis. Values for TVS were similar with regard to vaginal and rectovaginal space endometriosis, but were clearly superior to vaginal examination in cases of ovarian (87%, 99%, 24.56 and 0.04), uterosacral ligament (91%, 90%, 31.35 and 0.37) and rectosigmoidal (97%, 97%, 88.51 and 0.1) endometriosis.TVS is a more useful test than is vaginal examination in detecting endometriosis in the ovaries and rectosigmoid.Multidetector computerized tomography enteroclysis vs. rectal water contrast transvaginal ultrasonography in determining the presence and extent of bowel endometriosis.To compare the accuracy of multidetector computerized tomography enteroclysis (MDCT-e) and rectal water contrast transvaginal ultrasonography (RWC-TVS) in determining the presence and extent of bowel endometriosis.This prospective study included 96 patients of reproductive age with suspicion of bowel endometriosis. Patients underwent MDCT-e and RWC-TVS before operative laparoscopy. Findings of MDCT-e and RWC-TVS were compared with histological results. The severity of pain experienced during MDCT-e and RWC-TVS was measured by a 10-cm visual analog scale.Fifty-one patients had bowel endometriotic nodules at surgery. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy for the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis were 95.8% (46/48), 100.0% (48/48), 100.0% (46/46), 96.0% (48/50) and 97.9% (94/96) for MDCT-e and 93.8% (45/48), 97.9% (47/48), 97.8% (45/46), 94.0% (47/50) and 95.8% (92/96) for RWC-TVS. MDCT-e was associated with more intense pain than was RWC-TVS.MDCT-e and RWC-TVS have similar accuracy in the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis, but patients tolerate RWC-TVS better than they do MDCT-e.Diagnosis of colorectal endometriosis: contribution of contrast enhanced MR-colonography.To investigate the contribution of contrast-enhanced MR-colonography (CE-MR-C) for the diagnosis of intestinal endometriosis.One hundred and four women with suspected endometriosis were prospectively enrolled. All patients were subjected to MRI consisting of two phases: pelvic high-resolution MRI (HR-MRI) followed by CE-MR-C after colonic distension using a 1.5-liter water enema and injection of 0.15 ml/kg of 0.5 M gadolinium-DTPA with T1w high-resolution isotropic volume (THRIVE) and balanced turbo field echo (BTFE) images. HR-MRI and CE-MR-C were considered as two datasets, which were independently reviewed by two radiologists with 12 and 2 years' experience respectively. The presence of deep pelvic endometriotic lesions with particular attention to colorectal involvement was recorded.MRI findings correlated with laparoscopy in all cases. Thanks to CE-MR-C images, sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and accuracy for diagnosis of colorectal endometriosis increased from 76%, 96%, 84%, 93% and 91%, to 95%, 97%, 91%, 99% and 97% for the most experienced radiologist and from 62%, 93%, 72%, 89% and 85%, to 86%, 94%, 82%, 96% and 92% for the less experienced radiologist; moreover, the interobserver agreement increased from 0.63 to 0.80 (Cohen's K test).CE-MR-C allows easier recognition of colorectal endometriosis and higher interobserver agreement.Evaluation of 18FDG PET-CT in the diagnosis of endometriosis: a prospective study.Noninvasive techniques have poor sensitivity and specificity in diagnosing endometriosis, which is often associated with an inflammatory process. In several benign diseases, measurement of hypermetabolism using fluorodeoxyglucose (18F 18FDG) reflects the degree of inflammation and aggressiveness of the disease. This prospective study evaluated the value of (18)FDG positron emission tomography (PET)-computed tomography (CT) in assessing the presence of endometriosis.Ten consecutive patients suspected with endometriosis were prospectively included in this study. A preoperative 18FDG PET-CT was performed in all the patients during the follicular phase of their cycle, which preceded laparoscopic surgery. Surgical endometriosis staging and histopathological analysis of removed tissue were confronted with the results from 18FDG PET-CT.Of the 10 patients, 9 had endometriosis confirmed by laparoscopy; 6 had advanced stage of the disease and 5 had histologically proven lesions. Nevertheless, none of the patients had 18FDG-demonstrated hypermetabolism at PET-CT.In this preliminary series, we did not observe hypermetabolic activity in relation to endometriosis using 18FDG PET-CT. This study's most important limitation is the use of 18FDG as an isotopic tracer, which is not specific to endometrial tissue.Deep pelvic endometriosis: limited additional diagnostic value of postcontrast in comparison with conventional MR images.To determine the value of postcontrast MR imaging (MRI) in cases of suspected pelvic endometriosis by assessing interobserver variability of MR imaging according to the endometriotic locations.This retrospective study included 158 patients with clinical suspicion of endometriosis who had undergone surgery after MRI between January 2004 and April 2009. Three radiologists with different degrees of experience were independently asked to determine the presence of rectosigmoid colon, vaginal, and bladder endometriosis using both conventional and a combination of conventional and postcontrast MRI. Descriptive analysis, ROC analysis and interobserver agreements (kappa values) were calculated.Rectosigmoid colon, vaginal, and bladder endometriosis was present in 65, 39 and eight patients, respectively. The accuracy of conventional assessment for readers 1, 2, and 3 for rectosigmoid colon, vaginal and bladder endometriosis was 77.2%, 74.1% and 96.8%, and 73.4%, 76.6% and 98.7%, and 86.1%, 88.6% and 99.4%, respectively. The accuracy of conventional and postcontrast MR images for readers 1, 2, and 3 for rectosigmoid colon, vaginal and bladder endometriosis was 77.8%, 78.5% and 98.1%, and 83.5%, 83.5% and 99.4%, and 87.3%, 89.2% and 99.4%, respectively.Interobserver variability of MRI using conventional MRI alone is excellent for the diagnosis of DPE. No significant benefit of intravenous gadolinium, rectal or vaginal administration has been demonstrated.Endoscopic rectal ultrasound and elastosonography are useful in flow chart for the diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis with rectal involvement.Endometriosis is defined by the presence of endometrial glands and stroma outside the uterus. The disease causes pelvic pain, dysmenorrhea, dyspareunia, dyschezia and urinary symptoms. The aim of this study was to assess the usefulness of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and elastosonography for detecting rectosigmoid endometriosis and to compare the findings, in selected and symptomatic patients, with surgical specimens in order to select the best surgical strategy.Sixty-three consecutive patients (mean age 34.2; range 25-50 years) with diagnosis of endometriosis were referred for rectal endosonography to evaluate the rectal involvement. Patients complained of abdominal pain, rectal bleeding, constipation and dysmenorrhea. Sub-stenosis of the rectosigmoid lumen was found endoscopically in one patient (1.5%), bulging in 21 (33.3%), mucosal hyperemia or edema in one (1.5%), and no lesions in 39 patients (61.9%); no abdominal masses or obstruction were reported. Each woman completed a self-administered 100-point questionnaire to evaluate endometriosis-related pain (intensity of symptoms: 0 = absent, 100 = unbearable). After clinical imaging evaluation, 10 symptomatic patients (mean age 32.2; range 26-45 years) were evaluated for surgery.EUS detected endometriotic lesions in all patients as a hypoechoic mass, poorly vascularized with irregular, undefined margins. In cases where the rectosigmoid wall was involved, there was invasion of the fourth layer. All patients who were operated had histologic findings of endometriotic lesions involving the rectal wall, as indicated by EUS.EUS and elastosonography offers a non-invasive and sensitive technique to better define the endometriotic infiltration in the rectosigmoid wall.Value of thin-section oblique axial T2-weighted magnetic resonance images to assess uterosacral ligament endometriosis.Thin-section oblique axial magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is useful in staging endometrial and cervical carcinomas but there are no data on its contribution to assessing deep endometriosis. We evaluated the contribution of this MRI technique to diagnosis of uterosacral ligament (USL) endometriosis.In this retrospective study, two radiologists, who were blinded to the surgical and histological results, compared the results from conventional sagittal and axial MRI with those from conventional plus thin-section (3 mm) oblique axial MRI in 100 symptomatic patients. Descriptive statistical analyses including sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, accuracy and positive and negative likelihood ratios were performed. Kappa for inter-observer agreement was calculated.Conventional MR images for the diagnosis of left/right USL endometriosis revealed accuracies of 69/76 and 59/75%, sensitivities of 66/71 and 52/71% and specificities of 76/86 and 76/82% for senior and junior readers, respectively. The combination of conventional and thin-section oblique axial MR images revealed accuracies of 82/87 and 74/81%, sensitivities of 89/93 and 73/81% and specificities of 61/72 and 76/79%, for senior and junior readers, respectively. When conventional MRI combined with oblique axial T2-weighted MRI was compared with conventional MRI use only, significant differences in diagnostic accuracies were observed for right (P = 0.04) and left (P = 0.01) USL endometriosis.Thin-section oblique axial T2-weighted imaging can improve the success of conventional MRI for assessment of USL endometriosis. Further prospective studies are required before this new MR protocol is performed routinely for suspected pelvic endometriosis.Learning curve in the detection of ovarian and deep endometriosis by using Magnetic Resonance: comparison with surgical results.Determining if Magnetic Resonance Imaging (MRI) accuracy in diagnosing endometriosis is related to radiologist's expertise.Written informed consent was obtained from all patients. This study is compliant to STARD method. Thirty patients (mean age 34; range 21-45 years) who had undergone MRI study for suspected endometriosis underwent surgery were retrospectively evaluated. MRI at 1.5T was performed with SE and TSE sequences, T1 and T2-weighted with and without fat suppression. Four localizations were analyzed: ovary, uterosacral ligaments (USL), vaginal fornix and Rectum\Sigma\Douglas (R.S.D.). One radiologist evaluated each dataset; sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV, accuracy, LR+ and LR- were calculated according to the surgical results (first analysis). Dataset were then re-analyzed 12 months (second analysis) and 24 months (third analysis) later. McNemar test was applied to determine differences between the three analysis.Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy for the ovary at the first analysis were 88.9%, 87% and 88%, at the second 92.6%, 87% and 90% whereas at the third 92.6%, 91.3% and 92%. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy for the USLs at the first analysis were 62.5%, 76.9% and 70%, at the second 72%, 80.8% and 76% whereas at the third 80%, 84.6% and 82%. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy for the vaginal fornix at the first analysis were 63.2%, 64.5% and 64%, at the second 73.7%, 77.4% and 76% whereas at the third 73.7%, 83.9% and 80%. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy for the R.S.D. at the first analysis were 39.1%, 81.5% and 62%, at the second 62.5%, 85.2% and 76% whereas at the third 73.9%, 88.9% and 82%. McNemar test indicated a significant statistical difference in sensitivity in detecting nodules of endometriosis in R.S.D. between first and third analysis (p=0.0215). The mean review time decreased (p=0.0001).Accuracy of MRI in diagnosing endometriosis increased with radiologist's expertise and the improvement was statistically significant in determining RSD involvement.Magnetic resonance imaging in the evaluation of (deep infiltrating) endometriosis: the value of diffusion-weighted imaging.To assess the value of magnetic resonance (MR)diffusion-weighted imaging (DWI) in the evaluation of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).In a prospective single-center study, DWI was added to the standard MRI protocol in 56 consecutive patients with known or suspected endometriosis. Endometriotic lesions as well as (functional) ovarian cysts were analyzed for location, size, and signal intensity on T1, T2, and DWI. Apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) values were calculated using b-values of 50, 400, 800,and 1200 s/mm(2). Statistical analysis included the Spearman correlation coefficient, Mann-Whitney U, and Kruskal-Wallis tests.A total of 110 lesions (62 endometrial cysts and 48 DIE) were detected, 60 of which were large enough to analyze. Mean ADC values of endometrial cysts and functional ovarian cysts were 1.10 x 10(-3)/mm(2)/s and 2.14 x 10(-3)/mm(2)/s, respectively. Mean ADC values of DIE retrocervical, infiltrating the colon, and bladder were 0.70 x 10(-3)/mm(2)/s, 0.77 x 10(-3)/mm(2)/s, and 0.79 x 10(-3)/mm(2)/s, respectively. ADC values of DIE did not show a significant difference between varying pelvic locations (P = 0.63).Results of our study suggest that ADC values of DIE are consistently low, without significant difference between pelvic locations.Value of transvaginal ultrasound in assessing severity of pelvic endometriosis.The objective of this study was to examine the ability of preoperative transvaginal ultrasound (TVS) scanning to assess the severity of pelvic endometriosis.Consecutive women with clinically suspected or proven pelvic endometriosis, who were booked for laparoscopy, were invited to join the study. The severity of endometriosis was assessed preoperatively using TVS and the findings were compared with the results obtained by laparoscopy using the American Society for Reproductive Medicine (ASRM) classification.In total, 201 women had preoperative TVS and laparoscopies. Of these, no endometriosis was found at laparoscopy for 62/201 (30.8%; 95% CI, 24.8-37.5), whereas 33/201 (16.4%; 95% CI, 11.9-22.2) had minimal endometriosis, 31/201 (15.4%; 95% CI, 11.1-21.1) had mild endometriosis, 27/201 (13.4%; 95% CI, 9.4-18.8) had moderate endometriosis and 48/201 (23.9%; 95% CI, 18.5-30.2) had severe endometriosis. The sensitivity and specificity of the TVS diagnosis of severe pelvic endometriosis were 0.85 (95% CI, 0.716-0.934) and 0.98 (95% CI, 0.939-0.994), respectively, and the positive and negative likelihood ratios were 43.5 (95% CI, 14.1-134) and 0.15 (95% CI, 0.075-0.295), respectively. Overall, there was a good level of agreement between ultrasound and laparoscopy in identifying absent, minimal, mild, moderate and severe disease (quadratic weighted kappa = 0.786). The mean ASRM score difference between TVS and laparoscopy in assessing severity of endometriosis was -2.398 (95% CI, -4.685 to -0.1112) and the limits of agreement were -34.62 (95% CI, -38.54 to -30.709) to 29.83 (95% CI, 25.91-33.74).TVS is a good test for assessing the severity of pelvic endometriosis. TVS is particularly accurate in detecting severe disease, which could facilitate more effective triaging of women for appropriate surgical care.Deep infiltrating endometriosis: CT imaging evaluation.To retrospectively evaluate the feasibility of computed tomography (CT) in depicting deep-infiltrating endometriosis.The study population included 54 patients (age: mean, 35.5 years; range, 23-48 years) with histologically confirmed ovarian endometriomas between January 2007 and July 2009. All the patients underwent preoperative CT imaging before laparotomy or laparoscopy. The CT images were evaluated for the presence of a tethered appearance of the rectum in the direction of the uterus, stranding of periuterine pelvic fat, thickening of the uterosacral ligament, and retroflexed uterus. Two radiologists performed a blinded and independent review for each CT finding. The sensitivity, the specificity, the positive predictive value, the negative predictive value, and the accuracy of each CT finding and kappa statistics were determined.Deep-infiltrating endometriosis was confirmed after surgery and pathologic examination in 34 patients (63.0%). The most specific finding for the diagnosis of deep-infiltrating endometriosis was tethered appearance of rectum in the direction of the uterus (90.0%). The mean sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy values of all the CT findings except that of retroflexed uterus were 56.9%, 70.0%, 78.1%, 60.4%, and 61.7%, respectively. The mean kappa value was 0.82 (range, 0.67-0.96).Computed tomographic imaging may constitute another potential option as a complementary imaging modality for the evaluation of deep-infiltrating endometriosis.Agreement and reproducibility in identification of endometriosis using magnetic resonance imaging.Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is a promising technique in the study of endometriosis, allowing a complete mapping of lesions before surgery. However, the value of MRI in the diagnosis of endometriosis in the bladder, in superficial peritoneal lesions, and in ovarian foci and uterosacral ligaments is still under debate.To assess inter- and intra-observer agreement in the evaluation of endometriosis in different anatomical locations using MRI.From June 2006 to February 2008, 83 female patients (mean age 39, range 19-49 years) who had undergone MRI examination for suspected endometriosis were evaluated by two radiologists. MRI at 1.5 Tesla was performed with SE and TSE sequences, T1- and T2-weighted with and without fat suppression. Each examination was completed with gadolinium administration. Each dataset was independently evaluated by the radiologists for the presence or absence of endometriosis. The location (ovaries, uterosacral ligaments (USLs), pouch of Douglas, vagina, rectosigmoid, rectovaginal septum, and bladder) of suspected lesions was recorded. Cohen kappa statistical analysis was performed to calculate agreement between measurements. After 2 months the data were analyzed again by the two observers to assess intra-observer agreement.Of the 83 MRI examinations performed, 12 patients demonstrated no evidence of endometriosis. In the remaining 71 studies, 157 endometriotic lesions ranging in size from 0.4 to 6.2 cm were detected. Of the 157 lesions, 53 (33.75% incidence) were smaller than 1 cm. In the ovaries, the inter-observer agreement was 92.77% and the kappa value was 0.802 (95% CI, 0.695-0.91). In the bladder the inter-observer agreement was 96.39% and the kappa value was 0.553 (95% CI 0.056-1). In the USLs the inter-observer agreement was 90.96% and the kappa value 0.583 (95% CI, 0.381-0.784). In the rectovaginal septum the inter-observer agreement was 94.58% and the kappa value 0.739 (95% CI, 0.572-0.905). In the rectovaginal pouch the inter-observer agreement was 88.55% and the kappa value 0.608 (95% CI, 0.443-0.774). In the vaginal fornix the inter-observer agreement was 94.58% and the kappa value 0.726 (95% CI, 0.552-0.901). In the rectosigmoid the inter-observer agreement was 89.76% and the kappa value 0.589 (95% CI, 0.389-0.768).The results of our study indicate that MRI has a high inter- and intra-observer agreement in the identification of endometriosis located in the ovary, rectosigmoid, and rectovaginal septum, whereas the agreement is suboptimal for the identification of endometriosis located in the USLs.Preoperative assessment of intestinal endometriosis: A comparison of transvaginal sonography with water-contrast in the rectum, transrectal sonography, and barium enema.To evaluate the accuracy of Transrectal Sonography (TRS) and a new technique, Transvaginal Sonography with Water-Contrast in the Rectum (RWC-TVS), in the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis, and the accuracy of Barium Enema (BE) and RWC-TVS in the detection of intestinal stenosis due to endometriosis. In a prospective study, we compared the findings of TRS and RWC-TVS performed before surgery with the operative and pathologic findings in 61 consecutive patients who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy for suspected rectosigmoid endometriosis. The accuracy of BE and RWC-TVS in the detection of intestinal stenosis was evaluated comparing the radiologic and ultrasonographic results with the macroscopic findings at surgery and pathology. RWC-TVS diagnosed rectosigmoid endometriosis with the same accuracy of TRS and was equally efficient as BE in the detection of a significant intestinal lumen stenosis. For the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of TRS and RWC-TVS were 88.2% and 96%, 80%, and 90%, 95.7%, and 98%, and 57.1% and 81.8%, respectively. For the detection of intestinal stenosis the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of BE and RWC-TVS were 93.7% and 87.5%, 94.2% and 91.4%, 88.2% and 82.3%, and 97% and 94.1%, respectively. RWC-TVS is a new, simple technique for a single-step and accurate preoperative assessment of rectosigmoid endometriosis.Diagnosis of endometriosis of the rectovaginal septum using introital three-dimensional ultrasonography.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of introital three-dimensional (3D) transvaginal sonography for preoperative detection of rectovaginal septal endometriosis.Ultrasonographic results were compared with surgical and histologic findings.University Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology.This prospective study included 39 women with suspected rectovaginal endometriosis.All patients underwent 3D transvaginal sonography for the evaluation of the rectovaginal septum, before undergoing laparoscopic radical resection of endometriosis. Rectovaginal endometriosis was defined as hypoechoic areas, nodules, or anatomic distortion of this specific location.Sensitivity, specificity, and likelihood ratios (positive or negative) were calculated with 95% confidence intervals (CIs).Surgery associated with histopathologic evaluation revealed deep endometriosis in the rectovaginal septum in 19 patients. The specificity, sensitivity, positive likelihood ratio, and negative likelihood ratio were 94.7% (95% CI, 78.6%-99.7%), 89.5% (95% CI, 73.3%-94.5%), 17.2 (95% CI, 2.51-115), and 0.11 (95% CI, 0.03-0.41), respectively.Introital 3D ultrasonography seems to be an effective method for the diagnosis of endometriosis of the rectovaginal septum and should be included in the preoperative evaluation of patients with clinical suspicion of deep endometriosis.Acoustic streaming cannot discriminate reliably between endometriomas and other types of adnexal lesion: a multicenter study of 633 adnexal masses.To determine the ability of acoustic streaming to discriminate between endometriomas and other adnexal masses.We used data from 1938 patients with an adnexal mass included in Phase 2 of the International Ovarian Tumor Analysis (IOTA) study. All patients had been examined by transvaginal gray-scale and Doppler ultrasound following a standardized research protocol. Assessment of acoustic streaming was voluntary and was carried out only in lesions containing echogenic cyst fluid. Acoustic streaming was defined as movement of particles inside the cyst fluid during gray-scale and/or color Doppler examination provided that the probe had been held still for two seconds to ensure that the movement of the particles was not caused by movement of the probe or the patient. Only centers where acoustic streaming had been evaluated in > 90% of cases were included. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative likelihood ratios (LR+, LR-), and positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV) of acoustic streaming with regard to endometrioma were calculated.460 (24%) masses were excluded because they were examined in centers where </= 90% of the masses with echogenic cyst fluid had been evaluated for the presence of acoustic streaming. Acoustic streaming was evaluated in 633 of 646 lesions containing echogenic cyst fluid. It was present in 19 (9%) of 209 endometriomas and in 55 (13%) of 424 other lesions. This corresponds to a sensitivity of absent acoustic streaming with regard to endometrioma of 91% (190/209), a specificity of 13% (55/424), LR+ of 1.04, LR- of 0.69, PPV of 34% (190/559) and NPV of 74% (55/74).Acoustic streaming cannot discriminate reliably between endometriomas and other adnexal lesions, and the presence of acoustic streaming does not exclude an endometrioma.Transvaginal ultrasonography with bowel preparation is able to predict the number of lesions and rectosigmoid layers affected in cases of deep endometriosis, defining surgical strategy.Successful surgical treatment of deep bowel endometriosis depends on obtaining detailed information about the lesions, prior to the procedure. The objective of this study was to determine the capability of transvaginal ultrasonography with bowel preparation (TVUS-BP) to predict the presence of one or more rectosigmoid nodules and the deepest bowel layer affected by the disease.A prospective study of 194 patients with clinical and TVUS-BP suspected deep endometriosis submitted to videolaparoscopy. Image data were compared with surgical and histological results.With respect to bowel nodule detection and presence of at least two rectosigmoid lesions, TVUS-BP had a sensitivity of 97 and 81%, specificity 100 and 99%, positive predictive value (PPV) 100 and 93% and negative predictive value (NPV) 98 and 96%, respectively. Regarding diagnosis of infiltration of the submucosal/mucosal layer, TVUS-BP had a sensitivity of 83%, specificity 94%, PPV 77%, NPV 96%.These findings show that TVUS-BP is an adequate exam for evaluating the presence of one or more rectosigmoid nodules and the deepest layer affected in deep infiltrating bowel endometriosis, confirming the importance of this technique for defining the most appropriate surgical strategy to be implemented.Diagnosis of deep infiltrating endometriosis: accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging and transvaginal 3D ultrasonography.To compare two different imaging modalities, magnetic resonance (MR), and three-dimensional sonography (3DUS), in order to evaluate the specific role in preoperative work-up of deep infiltrating endometriosis.33 women with endometriosis underwent 3DUS and MR followed by surgical and histopathological investigations. Investigators described the disease extension in the following sites: torus uterinus and uterosacral ligaments (USL), vagina, rectovaginal-septum, rectosigmoid, bladder, ovaries. Results were compared with surgical and histopathological findings.Ovarian and deep pelvic endometriosis were found by surgery and histology in, respectively, 24 (72.7%) and 22 (66.6%) of the 33 patients. Sensitivity and specificity values of 3DUS for the diagnosis of endometrial cysts were 87.5% and 100%, respectively; those of MRI were 96.8% and 91.1%, respectively. Sensitivity and specificity of 3DUS for the diagnosis of deep infiltrating endometriosis in specific sites were: USL 50% and 94.7%; vagina 84% and 80%; rectovaginal-septum 76.9% and 100%; rectosigmoid 33.3% and 100%; bladder 25% and 100%. Those of MR were: USL 69.2% and 94.3%; vagina 83.3% and 88.8%; rectovaginal-septum 76.4% and 100%; restosigmoid 75% and 100%; bladder 83.3% and 100%.MR accurately diagnoses deep infiltrating endometriosis; 3DUS accurately diagnoses deep infiltrating endometriosis in specific locations.Evaluation of colonic involvement in endometriosis: double-contrast barium enema vs. magnetic resonance imaging.The purpose of the study was to compare the accuracy of double-contrast barium enema (DCBE) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the diagnosis of intestinal endometriosis using the histological examination on resected specimen as comparative standard.Eighty-three consecutive patients with suspected intestinal endometriosis, resected between 2005 and 2007, were prospectively evaluated. All of the women underwent preoperative DCBE and MRI on the same day. We evaluated number, site (rectum, sigmoid, cecum), and size of the lesions. The imaging findings were correlated with those resulting at pathology.Among the 65 women who underwent surgery, 50/65 (76.9%) were found to have bowel endometriosis, with 9/50 (18%) patients presenting two lesions; DCBE allowed to detect 50/59 (84.7%) lesions. MRI allowed to detect 42/59 (71.1%) lesions. DCBE showed sensibility, specificity, PPV, NPV, and accuracy of respectively 84.7, 93.7, 98.0, 62.5, and 86.6%, MRI of 71.1, 83.3, 93.3, 46.8, and 74.6%.DCBE is more accurate than unenhanced MRI in the diagnosis of bowel endometriosis, and should be preferred in the preoperative management of this disease, since it usually enables a proper surgical planning.Diagnosis of pelvic adhesions in patients with endometrioma: the role of transvaginal ultrasonography.To estimate the diagnostic value of transvaginal ultrasonography in the detection of pelvic adhesions in women suspected of having endometriomas at ultrasonography.Prospective observational study.Academic Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology.One hundred thirteen women who underwent surgery for an endometrioma.All patients underwent transvaginal ultrasonography before surgery, and at ultrasonography the presence of fixation of the ovary to the uterus was considered characteristic of the presence of pelvic adhesions.Sensitivity, specificity, and likelihood ratios were calculated with 95% confidence intervals (CIs).The sensitivity and specificity of the fixation to the uterus of at least one ovary were respectively 89% (95% CI 84%-92%) and 90% (95% CI 76%-97%). The likelihood ratio for fixation of at least one ovary to the uterus was 8.92 (95% CI 3.04-26) and for a "normal" ultrasound examination 0.12 (95% CI 0.06-0.23). The pretest probability of pelvic adhesions was 74%, and this probability increased to 96% when fixation of at least one ovary to the uterus was present and fell to 27% when this ultrasonographic finding was absent.Transvaginal ultrasonography seems to be able to detect or exclude the presence of adhesions in women with ultrasonographic suspicion of endometrioma.Diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal ultrasound examination for assigning a specific diagnosis to adnexal masses.To determine the sensitivity and specificity of subjective evaluation of gray-scale and Doppler ultrasound findings (here called pattern recognition) when used by experienced ultrasound examiners with regard to making a specific diagnosis of adnexal masses.Within the framework of a European multicenter study, the International Ovarian Tumor Analysis study, comprising nine ultrasound centers, women with at least one adnexal mass were examined with gray-scale and color Doppler ultrasonography by experienced ultrasound examiners. A standardized examination technique, and standardized terms and definitions were used. Using pattern recognition the examiners classified each mass as benign or malignant and suggested a specific diagnosis (e.g. dermoid cyst or endometrioma). The reference standard was the histology of the surgically removed adnexal tumors.A total of 1066 women were included, of whom 800 had a benign mass and 266 a malignant mass. A specific diagnosis based on ultrasound findings was suggested in 899 (84%) tumors. The specificity was high for all diagnoses (range, 94-100%). The sensitivity was highest for benign teratoma/dermoid cysts (86%, 100/116), hydrosalpinges (86%, 18/21), peritoneal pseudocysts (80%, 4/5) and endometriomas (77%, 153/199), and lowest for functional cysts (17%, 4/24), paraovarian/parasalpingeal cysts (14%, 3/21), benign rare tumors (11%, 1/9), adenofibromas (8%, 3/39), simple cysts (6%, 1/18) and struma ovarii (0%, 0/5). The positive and negative likelihood ratios of pattern recognition with regard to dermoid cysts, hydrosalpinges and endometriomas were 68.2 and 0.14, 38.9 and 0.15, and 33.3 and 0.24, respectively. Dermoid cysts, hydrosalpinges, functional cysts, paraovarian cysts, peritoneal pseudocysts, fibromas/fibrothecomas and simple cysts were never misdiagnosed as malignancies by the ultrasound examiner, whereas more than 10% of inflammatory processes, adenofibromas and rare benign tumors including struma ovarii were misdiagnosed as malignancies.Using subjective evaluation of gray-scale and Doppler ultrasound findings it is possible to make an almost conclusive diagnosis of a dermoid cyst, endometrioma and hydrosalpinx. Many other adnexal pathologies can be recognized but not confidently confirmed or excluded.Endometriosis: contribution of 3.0-T pelvic MR imaging in preoperative assessment--initial results.To determine the accuracy of 3.0-T pelvic magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in the preoperative assessment of endometriosis and to evaluate colon wall involvement after intrarectal gel administration.Institutional review board approval for this study was obtained, and each patient gave written informed consent. Forty-one consecutive patients with clinical suspicion of endometriosis underwent pelvic MR imaging at 3.0 T before surgery. Single-shot and high-spatial-resolution axial T2-weighted, sagittal fat-suppressed T2-weighted, and axial fat-suppressed T1-weighted sequences were performed. T2-weighted sequences were repeated after the rectum was filled with ultrasonographic (US) gel. Two blinded readers interpreted images independently. Image quality was scored by using a four-point scale. Detailed mapping of deep endometriosis was performed. Colon wall infiltration was graded (none, serosa, muscularis, submucosa, mucosa). MR imaging results were compared with surgical and pathologic findings. Interobserver agreement was assessed by using kappa statistics. Nonparametric tests were performed to compare colon wall infiltration scores without and those with US gel and between observers.Twenty-seven of 41 patients had deep endometriosis at surgery and histopathologic examination. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy for the diagnosis of deep endometriosis at MR imaging were 96.3% (26 of 27), 100% (14 of 14), 100% (26 of 26), 93.3% (14 of 15), and 97.6% (40 of 41), respectively. kappa Values ranged from 0.65 to 1.0, depending on the location of deep endometriosis. Colon wall infiltration assessment by both readers correlated well with pathologic findings (Spearman coefficient, >0.93), although median wall involvement scores were lower at pathologic examination than for both readers both before (P = .042 and P = .011) and after (P = .079 and P = .011) intrarectal gel filling.MR imaging of the pelvis at 3.0 T is accurate in the diagnosis and staging of deep endometriosis for the preoperative assessment of patients clinically suspected of having endometriosis.Endometriosis of the posterior cul-de-sac: clinical presentation and findings at transvaginal ultrasound.The purpose of our study was to evaluate the clinical findings and transvaginal ultrasound features of posterior cul-de-sac endometriosis.A retrospective search of cases over a 13-year period was performed and yielded 25 patients with posterior cul-de-sac endometriosis. The diagnosis of posterior cul-de-sac endometriosis was confirmed by histology (n = 13), conventional barium enema (n = 13), colonoscopy (n = 8), CT (n = 8), MRI (n = 17), diagnostic laparoscopy (n = 14), and laparotomy (n = 13). All patients underwent transvaginal and abdominal ultrasound including power Doppler examination. Two radiologists working in consensus analyzed the clinical data and reviewed the imaging studies.All 25 patients presented with lower abdominal pain that was cyclic in six patients. Eleven patients were unintended childless. Rectal discomfort was mentioned by 17 patients, two of whom also reported rectal blood loss. At physical examination, eight patients had a palpable mass in the posterior cul-de-sac. Transvaginal ultrasound detected one or more hypoechoic masses in the posterior cul-de-sac in all 25 patients. All masses were solid, noncompressible, and localized on the serosal surface of the rectosigmoid with sparing of mucosa and submucosa. The lesions had a rounded or ovoid shape and a mean sagittal diameter of 37 mm with vascularity. The masses had a spiculated or tethering contour in 19 patients. Abdominal ultrasound detected thick-walled adnexal cysts in 11 patients, hydronephrosis in eight, and involvement of the ileocecal region in five.Patients with endometriosis of the posterior cul-de-sac frequently present with atypical noncyclic symptoms. The transvaginal ultrasound features characteristic of posterior cul-de-sac endometriosis are a solid, often spiculated, noncompressible mass near the posterior cul-de-sac that is localized at the serosal surface of the rectosigmoid, spares the mucosa and submucosa, and is vascular.Diagnosis of the most frequent benign ovarian cysts: is ultrasonography accurate and reproducible?To evaluate the reproducibility and the accuracy of B-mode ultrasonographic features of three different kinds of benign ovarian cysts: ovarian endometrioma, mature teratoma, and serous cyst.Digitally stored B-mode sonographic images of 98 women submitted to surgery for the presence of an adnexal mass were evaluated by five different examiners with different degrees of experience. The histological type of each mass was predicted on the basis of the B-mode typical benign findings, as in the case of endometrioma (groundglass endocystic pattern), cystic teratoma (echogenic pattern with or without acoustic shadow), and serous cyst (anechoic cyst without endocystic vegetations). To assess the reproducibility of the B-mode findings, intraobserver and interobserver agreements were calculated using the kappa index.The intraobserver agreement was good or very good for all examiners and for all patterns (kappa = 0.71-1) except for the dermoid cyst, which showed moderate agreement (kappa = 0.42) for the highly experienced operator. The interobserver agreement was good for all experts for endometrioma (kappa = 0.66-0.78) and for serous cyst (kappa = 0.82-1), whereas it was moderate or good for cystic teratoma (kappa = 0.51-0.72). Interobserver agreement between experts and highly experienced operators was fair (kappa = 0.33-0.36) for teratoma and good or very good for endometrioma (kappa = 0.70-0.83) and serous cyst (kappa = 0.76-0.82). For different kinds of cysts, the accuracy was comparable among different operators.Typical features of benign masses using grayscale transvaginal ultrasonography are reproducible even in moderately experienced examiners, although more experience was associated with better interobserver agreement. The diagnostic performance of different operators with different degrees of experience is similar.Comparison of diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal ultrasound with laparoscopy in the management of patients with adnexal masses.The aims of this study was (a) to compare the diagnostic accuracy of ultrasound examination with laparoscopic findings and both with the gold standard (histology) in the management of benign ovarian lesions, and (b) to assess the feasibility of laparoscopy in their diagnosis and management.Prospective, comparative study (Canadian Task Force Classification II-2). A total of 117 women 15-59 years old were examined at outpatient department and had transvaginal ultrasound assessment. Ninety-eight women (three postmenopausal) with 105 cystic ovarian lesions met inclusion criteria and underwent operative laparoscopy. Histology was performed in all cases.Although laparoscopy showed an overall higher performance compared to transvaginal ultrasound, statistically significant difference was found only in the detection of endometriomas compared to ultrasound (P = 0.004 for sensitivity and P = 0.046 for specificity).Laparoscopy exhibits higher diagnostic accuracy, especially in endometriomas, compared to transvaginal scan. Laparoscopic diagnosis appears to be safe and accurate. Conservative laparoscopic management of benign adnexal masses is safe and with low morbidity.Can transvaginal sonography predict infiltration depth in patients with deep infiltrating endometriosis of the rectum?Patients with deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) of the rectum often benefit from surgical treatment, including disc or segmental bowel resection, in terms of pain relief and treatment of infertility. The aim of the present study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) for preoperative detection of rectal DIE. Furthermore, we aimed to investigate whether TVS can predict infiltration depth based on the distortion of characteristic sonomorphologic features of the rectal wall.Two-hundred patients with symptoms of endometriosis were prospectively assessed by TVS for the presence of rectal DIE before undergoing laparoscopic radical resection of endometriosis including segmental resection of the bowel in affected cases. Sensitivities, specificities, positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV), positive and negative likelihood ratios (LHR) and test accuracies were then calculated for the presence of infiltration of the serosal/smooth muscle (S/M) layer and submucosal/mucosal (MUC) layer as demonstrated by TVS and confirmed by histopathological analysis.Rectal endometriosis was confirmed in 43 out of 195 (22%) cases. The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV, test accuracy and positive and negative LHR of TVS on S/M infiltration were 98%, 99%, 98%, 99%, 99%,150.24 and 0.02, respectively, whereas respective data on MUC involvement were 62%, 96%, 53%, 97%, 93.8%, 16 and 0.4.TVS is a highly valuable tool in detecting rectal endometriosis preoperatively. Within this, S/M endometriotic infiltration can be accurately predicted, whereas TVS is less valuable for detection of MUC involvement.Combination of transvaginal sonography and clinical examination for preoperative diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis.The aim of the present study was to evaluate the accuracy of routine clinical examination (per vaginam, PV) combined with transvaginal sonography (TVS) for presurgical, non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis.Two-hundred women with symptoms suggestive of endometriosis were prospectively assessed by PV and TVS prior to laparoscopy and radical resection of disease and histological confirmation.Prevalence of endometriosis on the right/left (r/l) ovary, r/l uterosacral ligament (USL), pouch of Douglas (POD), vagina, bladder, rectovaginal space (RVS) and rectum was 12%, 13%, 12%, 22%, 15%, 11%, 2%, 4% and 24%. Sensitivities, specificities, positive and negative predictive values and positive and negative likelihood ratios for combined use of TVS and PV resulted in 96/100%, 100/99%, 100/93%, 93/100% and -;0.04/87.0;- for the r/l ovarian endometriosis; 67/84%, 97/86%, 73/62%, 96/95% and 19.56;0.35/5.97;0.19 for the r/l USL disease; 87%, 98%, 90%, 98% and 49.11;0.14 for involvement of the POD; 82%, 99%, 95%, 98% and 145.64;0.18 for vaginal endometriosis; 88%, 99%, 78%, 99% and 84.0;0.13 for endometriosis of the RVS; 75%, 98%, 50%, 99% and 49.0;0.25 for bladder involvement and 96%, 98%, 94%, 99% and 48.56;0.04 for rectal endometriosis.The combination of PV and TVS accurately predicts the presence of endometriosis affecting the ovaries, vagina, rectum, USL, RVS and POD in patients with suspected endometriosis. We suggest the routine combination of PV and TVS as an essential part of the standard primary assessment of pelvic pain patients with suspected endometriosis.Anatomic significance of a positive barium enema in deep infiltrating endometriosis of the large bowel.The anatomopathological significance of a positive double-contrast barium enema (DCBE) for suspicion of deep infiltrating endometriosis of the large bowel was studied. This is a retrospective study of a prospective database.A large-bowel resection was proposed for patients who were suspicious for large-bowel endometriosis and had a positive DCBE. In a series of 73 patients, 71 large-bowel resections were performed. Histology and immunohistochemistry with the monoclonal antibody CD-10 were performed on the resection specimen. Outcome measures were the length of the resected specimen, the largest diameter of the lesion, the positivity of the resection margins, and the degree of infiltration of the large bowel. We also compared the mean largest diameters of the lesions with the degree of infiltration of the large bowel.Between December 1997 and October 2005, 80 patients were suspicious for large-bowel endometriosis: 73 (91%) had positive DCBEs, and 7 (9%) had negative DCBEs. Of the 73 with positive DCBEs, 4 (5%) refused digestive resection and 1 (1.4%) was excluded. Three patients underwent two large-bowel resections because of the presence of bifocal lesions (left and right colon). A total of 71 resections were performed. In case of positive DCBE, the perivisceral fat and the whole muscularis were infiltrated in 100% of cases. The infiltration reached the submucosa and the mucosa respectively in 82% and 18% of cases. A total of 9.9% of resection margins were positive at histology but only focally. The mean largest diameter of the lesions infiltrating the whole thickness of the large bowel was not statistically different from the mean largest diameter of more superficial lesions.Findings of mass effect with indentations and ridging of the mucosa on DCBE in a setting suspicious for large-bowel endometriosis correspond well with pathologic findings of deep infiltration of the large-bowel wall. Clinicians dealing with deep infiltrating endometriosis should be aware of these findings, which could influence their choice of surgical treatment.Diagnosis of complete cul-de-sac obliteration (CCDSO) by the MRI jelly method.To evaluate the usefulness of MRI jelly method (jelly method).Fifty-five patients (32.7 +/- 5 years old) with endometriosis, treated with laparoscopic surgery between January and June 2005 with preoperative MRI using the jelly method. In imaging by the jelly method, 50 mL of jelly used for ultrasound was injected into the vagina, and 150 mL of jelly diluted twice with tap water was injected into the rectum. MRI were inspected for the following seven findings: (Finding 1) Uterine position (anteflexion or retroflexion); (Finding 2) Thickness of the posterior uterine wall (adenomyosis uteri); (Finding 3) Ascites in the Douglas' pouch; (Finding 4) Elevated posterior uterine fornix; (Finding 5) Thickening of the "Haustra"; (Finding 6) Elevated anterior rectal wall; and (Finding 7) Douglas' pouch lesion visualized as a high-intensity area on a T1-weighted image. The latter four findings were enhanced with the jelly method. These seven findings were examined for their correlations with video findings of adhesion during surgery.CCDSO was present in 30 of 55 patients. These seven findings had accuracies of 69.1%, 70.9%, 72.7%, 74.5%, 56.4%, 83.6%, and 81.8% respectively. Findings 6 and 7 showed high accuracy.These two findings could only be obtained using the jelly method, indicating the usefulness of this method for diagnosing CCDSO.Preoperative work-up for patients with deeply infiltrating endometriosis: transvaginal ultrasonography must definitely be the first-line imaging examination.Transvaginal ultrasonography (TVUS) has important advantages compared with transrectal ultrasonography (TRUS): it is less invasive, is cost-effective, is a familiar and well-accepted approach, and anesthesia is not required. We compared the accuracy of TVUS and TRUS for diagnosing rectal wall involvement in patients presenting with histologically proved deeply infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).Prospective study of 134 patients with histologically proved DIE underwent preoperative investigations using both TVUS and TRUS. The radiologist (TVUS) and sonographer (TRUS) were unaware of the clinical findings but knew that DIE was suspected.DIE was confirmed histologically for all the patients. A rectal wall involvement was histologically proved for 75 patients (56%). For the diagnosis of infiltration of the intestinal wall, TVUS and TRUS, respectively, had a sensitivity of 90.7% and 96.0%, a specificity of 96.5% and 100.0%, a positive predictive value of 97.1% and 100.0% and a negative predictive value of 88.9% and 95.2%.TVUS and TRUS have similar degrees of accuracy for predicting intestinal involvement. TVUS must be the first-line imaging process to perform for patients presenting with clinically suspected DIE. The question for the coming years is to define if it is necessary for TRUS to be carried out systematically in cases of clinically suspected DIE.Diagnostic accuracy of physical examination, transvaginal sonography, rectal endoscopic sonography, and magnetic resonance imaging to diagnose deep infiltrating endometriosis.To compare the value of physical examination, transvaginal sonography (TVS), rectal endoscopic sonography (RES), and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) for the assessment of different locations of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).Retrospective longitudinal study.Tertiary university gynecology unit.Ninety-two consecutive patients with clinical evidence of pelvic endometriosis.Physical examination, TVS, RES, and MRI, performed preoperatively.Descriptive statistics, calculation of likelihood ratios (LR(+) and LR(-)) of physical examination, TVS, RES, and MRI for DIE in specific locations confirmed by surgery/histology.The sensitivity and LR(+) and LR(-) values of physical examination, TVS, RES, and MRI were, respectively, 73.5%, 3.3, and 0.34, 78.3%, 2.34, and 0.32, 48.2%, 0.86, and 1.16, and 84.4%, 7.59, and 0.18 for uterosacral ligament endometriosis; 50%, 3.88, and 0.57, 46.7%, 9.64, and 0.56, 6.7%, -, and 0.93, and 80%, 5.51, and 0.23 for vaginal endometriosis; and 46%, 1.67, and 0.75, 93.6%, -, and 0.06, 88.9%, 12.89, and 0.12, and 87.3%, 12.66, and 0.14 for intestinal endometriosis.The MRI performs similarly to TVS and RES for the diagnosis of intestinal endometriosis but has higher sensitivity and likelihood ratios for uterosacral ligament and vaginal endometriosis.A logistic model for the prediction of endometriosis.To develop a model that uses individual and lesion characteristics to help surgeons choose lesions that have a high probability of containing histologically confirmed endometriosis.Secondary analysis of prospectively collected information.Government research hospital in the United States.Healthy women 18-45 years of age, with chronic pelvic pain and possible endometriosis, who were enrolled in a clinical trial.All participants underwent laparoscopy, and information was collected on all visible lesions. Lesion data were randomly allocated to a training and test data set.Predictive logistic regression, with the outcome of interest being histologic diagnosis of endometriosis.After validation, the model was applied to the complete data set, with a sensitivity of 88.4% and specificity of 24.6%. The positive predictive value was 69.2%, and the negative predictive value was 53.3%, equating to correct classification of a lesion of 66.5%. Mixed color; larger width; and location in the ovarian fossa, colon, or appendix were most strongly associated with the presence of endometriosis.This model identified characteristics that indicate high and low probabilities of biopsy-proven endometriosis. It is useful as a guide in choosing appropriate lesions for biopsy, but the improvement using the model is not great enough to replace histologic confirmation of endometriosis.Efficiency of MR imaging to orientate surgical treatment of posterior deep pelvic endometriosis.The purpose of this retrospective study was to evaluate the accuracy of MRI using pelvic-phased-array and endocavitary coils in detecting intestinal wall invasion by an endometriotic nodule.Forty-seven patients (32.1 +/- 4.2 years) who were planned for a surgical cure of deep endometriosis underwent MRI with conventional sequences using both coils. A thin bright layer on T(2)-w with enhancement on post-Gd T(1)-w defined our MR pattern for muscular layer involvement. MR results were correlated with surgical and pathological findings of the removed nodule.MR results for Group 1 (both coils) achieved a sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of 100-63%, 96-92%, 90-70%, 100-85%, and 97-83% for endovaginal coil and phased-array coil, respectively. Group 2 (phased-array coil) had a sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of 73%, 93%, 84%, 88%, and 87% for this coil, respectively.Combined pelvic-phased-array and endovaginal coils are better than phased array alone in the detection of intestinal wall invasion. Easy to perform, it has to be considered as a preoperative staging for deep posterior endometriosis to orientate the surgical management.[Double-contrast barium enema in the diagnosis of intestinal deeply infiltrating endometriosis].to evaluate the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value of double contrast barium enema (DCBE) for the diagnoses of rectum and sigmoid endometriosis.prospective transversal study including 37 patients with suspicion of deep endometriosis. Patients were submitted to DCBE, according to the standard technique described in the literature, and then, to laparoscopy. The results of laparoscopy and the DCBE images were interpreted and compared, based on the histological evaluation. Statistical analysis was done by association (chi2 test) and agreement analyses (Kappa's test).patients' average age was 35.8+/-4.4 years old (age group from 28 to 48 years), 85.6% of them being white and 14.4%, black women. Deep endometriosis was confirmed by laparoscopy and histological exam in all the studied patients. Intestinal endometriosis was confirmed by histological exam in 27 women (72.9%) of them. DCBE demonstrated suggestive radiologic signs of intestinal infiltration by endometriosis in 24 women (64.9%) and no signs in 13 women (35.1%). The method sensitivity was 67.5%, specificity 53.8%, positive predictive value, 77.8% and negative predictive value, 70%. Among the 24 abnormal exams, 16 (43.2%) presented radiologic speculum-type image, 16 (43.2%), an image compatible with stenosis, and four (10.8%), double contour.the DCBE presents high sensitivity and high positive predictive value, in the diagnosis of the rectum and sigmoid endometriosis. Radiologic images speculum and stenosis-type present high sensitivity and positive predictive value for the intestinal infiltration by endometriosis.[MR imaging features of deep pelvic endometriosis: correlation with laparoscopy].Deep pelvic endometriosis is an invalidating disorder affecting the retrocervical region, rectosigmoid colon and urinary bladder generally requiring surgical management. MRI is the preoperative imaging modality of choice. The purpose of this paper is to describe the MR imaging features of deep pelvic endometriosis with laparoscopic correlation.Thirty-five patients with clinical suspicion of deep pelvic endometriosis underwent pelvic MRI. Results of MRI, including morphological and signal characteristics features of the lesions were compared to laparoscopic fidings.Laparoscopy detected lesions of deep pelvic endometriosis of the uterosacral ligaments (n=10), torus uterinum (n=9), rectosigmoid (n=11), Douglas pouch (n=9), recto-vaginal septum (n=6), bladder (n=4) and posterior vaginal cul-de-sac (n=2). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of MRI were assessed for each localization.MRI allows diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis of the bladder, rectosigmoid and Douglas pouch and with lower sensitivity for lesions of the uterosacral ligaments, posterior vaginal cul-de-sac and rectovaginal septum.Susceptibility-weighted MRI of endometrioma: preliminary results.Susceptibility-weighted MRI combines magnitude and phase information from fully velocity-compensated gradient-echo sequences and depicts as signal voids the susceptibility effects caused by local inhomogeneity of the magnetic field. Our objective, based on MRI of 60 pathologically proven ovarian cystic lesions, including 42 endometriomas and 18 nonendometrial cysts, was to evaluate hemosiderin deposition within the walls of endometriomas on susceptibility-weighted MR images. Two radiologists blinded to the final diagnosis retrospectively reviewed the images in consensus.On susceptibility-weighted MR images, punctate or curved linear signal voids along the cyst wall were observed in 39 endometriomas (92.9%) and in no nonendometrial cysts. The signal voids were more prominent on 3-T than on 1.5-T images, reflecting the higher sensitivity of 3-T MRI to magnetic susceptibility effects. Thirty-two endometriomas (76.2%) met definitive MRI criteria, that is, hyperintensity on T1-weighted images and hypointensity on T2-weighted images, and 41 endometriomas (97.6%) were correctly diagnosed with susceptibility-weighted MRI.Diagnostic value of transvaginal 'tenderness-guided' ultrasonography for the prediction of location of deep endometriosis.The aim was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal tenderness-guided ultrasonography in the identification of location of deep endometriosis.Consecutive women scheduled for surgery in our Department for clinically suspected endometriosis were included in this prospective study. All women underwent modified transvaginal ultrasonography using a stand-off in the week before surgery, which also evaluated the painful sites evocated by a gentle pressure of the probe. Five locations of deep endometriosis were considered: vaginal walls, rectovaginal septum, rectosigmoid involvement, uterosacral ligaments and anterior compartment (anterior pouch and/or bladder). Sensitivity, specificity and likelihood ratios (LR+/-) were calculated with 95% confidence intervals (CIs).We included 88 women; surgery associated with histopathological evaluation revealed deep endometriosis in different pelvic locations in 72 patients. With respect to the vaginal walls, transvaginal ultrasonography had a sensitivity of 91% (95% CI, 79-97%), specificity of 89% (95% CI, 81-93%), an LR+ of 8.2 and an LR- of 0.09. For endometriosis of rectovaginal septum, transvaginal ultrasonography had a sensitivity of 74% (95% CI, 64-80%), specificity of 88% (95% CI, 4-8%), an LR+ of 6.2 and an LR- of 0.3. For other locations, the sensitivity was lower (ranging from 67% to 33%) with a comparable specificity.This technique shows a high specificity and sensitivity in the detection of vaginal and rectovaginal endometriosis. Good specificity associated with a lower sensitivity was obtained in the diagnosis of deep endometriosis of uterosacral ligaments, rectosigmoid involvement or anterior deep endometriosis.Double-contrast barium enema and transrectal endoscopic ultrasonography in the diagnosis of intestinal deeply infiltrating endometriosis.To evaluate the sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value, positive predictive value, association, and agreement of double-contrast barium enema (DCBE) and transrectal endoscopic ultrasonography (Tr EUS) in the diagnosis of rectosigmoid colon endometriosis.Prospective nonrandomized (Canadian Task Force classification II-2).University hospital.We evaluated 37 patients with clinically suspected deeply infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) from January 2004 through January 2005.Clinical examination, DCBE, Tr EUS, and laparoscopy for histologic confirmation.Deeply infiltrating endometriosis was confirmed by laparoscopic visualization and by histopathologic examination in all patients. Intestinal endometriosis was observed in 27 patients (72.9%). DCBE showed abnormalities suggestive of bowel endometriosis in 24 patients (64.9%) and Tr EUS in 28 patients (75.7%). Considering the DCBE findings we observed among the 24 abnormal examination results, 16 (42.3%) had spiculation, 16 (42.3%) had circumferential narrowing of the bowel, and 4 (10.8%) had the mass effect sign. For DCBE the sensitivity was 88%, the specificity was 54%, the negative predictive value (NPV) was 70%, and the positive predictive value (PPV) was 78%. For Tr EUS the sensitivity, specificity, NPV, and PPV were 96%, 100%, 90%, and 100%. A significant association of the DCBE and the Tr EUS in the diagnosis of intestinal DIE (p = .017) and a moderate agreement of the methods (kappa = 0.44) was also observed.Our data, although limited by sample size, confirmed that DCBE has a good sensitivity and a low specificity in the diagnosis of intestinal DIE. The Tr EUS proved to have a higher sensitivity and specificity with elevated NPV and PPV. A significant association of the DCBE and the Tr EUS in the diagnosis of intestinal DIE and a moderate agreement of the methods was also observed.Transrectal ultrasound and the diagnosis of rectovaginal endometriosis: a prospective observational study.Rectovaginal endometriosis is a severe form of pelvic endometriosis in which pharmacological treatment is relatively ineffective (Vercellini et al., Fertil Steril. 2005;84:1375-87). Laparoscopic surgical treatment is effective, but has the potential risks of bowel perforation and colostomy formation (Darai et al., Am J Obstet Gynecol. 2005;192:394-400). Transrectal ultrasound scanning can be applied as a preoperative tool to predict the presence of rectovaginal endometriosis and bowel wall involvement (Abrao et al., J Am Assoc Gynecol Laparosc. 2004;11:50-4).Thirty-two women underwent transrectal ultrasound followed by therapeutic laparoscopy. Likelihood ratios and post-test prevalences were calculated with Fagan's normogram. This was then extrapolated with the aid of a mathematical model to a low-risk population.A positive likelihood ratio was found to be 10.89 (95% confidence ratio (CI): 1.62-73.15) and a negative likelihood ratio was found to be 0.24 (95% CI: 0.1-0.57). The pre-test prevalence of rectovaginal endometriosis was 56%. The positive post-test prevalence probability was 93%, and the negative post-test prevalence probability was 23%.Preoperative transrectal ultrasound scanning for rectovaginal endometriosis is an extremely accurate predictive test, and strongly predicts the need for extensive laparoscopic dissection and potential bowel resection.Barium enema evaluation of colonic involvement in endometriosis.The purpose of our study was to define the role of double-contrast barium enema (DCBE) compared with laparoscopy in the diagnosis and local staging of intestinal endometriosis.A search of our radiology database revealed the cases of 234 women who underwent surgical resection for pelvic endometriosis with associated intestinal surgery for intestinal endometriosis. We retrospectively evaluated all preoperative DCBE images for the presence of bowel endometriosis and the number, site (rectum, sigmoid, cecum), and size of the lesions. The radiographic findings at DCBE were retrospectively correlated with those at surgical pathologic examination.DCBE revealed 211 intestinal lesions of bowel endometriosis in 168 (71.8%) of 234 patients with pelvic endometriosis clinically enrolled. Forty (23.8%) of the 168 women had more than one endometriotic bowel nodule (two nodules in 37 cases, three in three cases). Laparoscopy revealed 233 intestinal lesions in 174 (74.3%) of the patients. Fifty-four (31.0%) of 174 women had more than one endometriotic bowel nodule (two nodules in 49 cases, three in five cases). There was 100% correlation between the DCBE and histologic findings as far as site and size of the lesions were concerned. DCBE had a sensitivity of 88.4%, specificity of 93.0%, positive predictive value of 97.5%, negative predictive of 71.0%, and accuracy of 89.5% in the identification of bowel endometriosis.DCBE is helpful in discerning bowel wall involvement in endometriosis, enabling proper surgical planning. DCBE also appears to have a role in the management of endometriosis.Does transvaginal ultrasonography combined with water-contrast in the rectum aid in the diagnosis of rectovaginal endometriosis infiltrating the bowel?The aim of this study was to determine whether adding water-contrast in the rectum during transvaginal ultrasonography (RWC-TVS) improves the diagnosis of rectal infiltration in women with rectovaginal endometriosis.This prospective study included 90 women, with suspect rectovaginal endometriosis, who underwent operative laparoscopy. TVS and RWC-TVS were independently performed by different investigators. RWC-TVS was performed by injecting saline solution into the rectal lumen under ultrasonographic control through a 6-mm catheter. Presence of rectovaginal nodules, presence and degree of rectal infiltration, and the largest diameter of the bowel nodules were evaluated. Ultrasonographic results were compared to surgical and histological findings.Although RWC-TVS had higher accuracy than TVS in diagnosing rectovaginal endometriosis, the difference between the two techniques was not statistically significant. RWC-TVS was significantly more accurate than TVS in determining the presence of endometriotic infiltration reaching at least the muscular layer of the rectal wall. The sensitivity of RWC-TVS in identifying rectal lesions was 97%, the specificity 100%, the positive predictive value 100% and the negative predictive value 91.3%. RWC-TVS caused a higher intensity of pain than TVS.RWC-TVS determines the presence of rectovaginal nodules infiltrating the rectal muscularis propria more accurately than TVS; RWC-TVS could be used when TVS cannot exclude the presence of rectal infiltration.Endorectal ultrasound accuracy in the diagnosis of rectal endometriosis infiltration depth.To evaluate the accuracy of endorectal ultrasound examination to ascertain the deepest rectal layer involved in rectal endometriosis.Retrospective study.Department of obstetrics and gynecology at a university hospital in France.Women presenting with rectal endometriosis who had undergone rectal resection during a 22-month period.Endorectal ultrasonography.The predicted rectal infiltration depth by using endorectal examination was compared with histological findings. The level of agreement was evaluated by using the coefficients of concordance kappa and weighted kappa.Sixteen women were included in the study. Rectal resection was segmental in 14 cases and was limited in 2 cases. The agreement between 2 examinations was considered good in 9 cases (56%). Endorectal ultrasound overestimated the depth of infiltration in 5 cases and underestimated it in 2 cases. The coefficients of concordance kappa (95% confidence interval) and weighted kappa (95% confidence interval) were, respectively, 0.17 (0-0.34) and 0.22 (0.04-0.4), corresponding to poor concordance between the endorectal ultrasonography and histological examination.Accuracy in the prediction of rectal-layer involvement in endorectal ultrasonography appears to be limited. This information should not be considered sufficient when selecting the type of rectal-resection procedure.Transvaginal ultrasonography combined with water-contrast in the rectum in the diagnosis of rectovaginal endometriosis infiltrating the bowel.This prospective study evaluated the efficacy of transvaginal ultrasonography combined with water-contrast in the rectum (RWC-TVS) in the diagnosis of rectal infiltration in 35 women with rectovaginal endometriosis; ultrasonographic findings were compared with surgery and histology. The sensitivity of RWC-TVS in identifying rectal infiltration reaching at least the muscular layer was 100%, the specificity was 85.7%, the positive predictive value was 91.3%, and the negative predictive value was 100%. In 4 of 5 (80.0%) nodules reaching the submucosa, the depth of infiltration was underestimated by RWC-TVS. The RWC-TVS reliably determined the largest diameter of the endometriotic nodules and was well tolerated by the patients.Accuracy of transvaginal sonography and rectal endoscopic sonography in the diagnosis of deep infiltrating endometriosis.To compare the accuracy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) and rectal endoscopic sonography (RES) for the diagnosis of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE), with respect to surgical and histological findings.This was a longitudinal study of 81 consecutive patients referred for surgical management of DIE, who underwent both TVS and RES preoperatively. The diagnostic criteria were identical for TVS and RES, and were based on visualization of hypoechoic areas in specific locations (uterosacral ligaments, vagina, rectovaginal septum and intestine). We calculated the sensitivity, specificity, predictive values and accuracy of TVS and RES for the diagnosis of DIE.Endometriosis was confirmed histologically in 80/81 (98.7%) patients. Endometriomas and DIE were present in 43.2% and 97.5% of the women, respectively. For the diagnosis of DIE overall, TVS and RES, respectively, had a sensitivity of 87.3% and 74.7%, a positive predictive value of 98.6% and 98.3%, and an accuracy of 86.4% and 74%. For the diagnosis of uterosacral endometriosis, they had a sensitivity of 80.8% and 46.6%, a specificity of 75% and 50.0%, a positive predictive value of 96.7% and 89.5% and a negative predictive value of 30% and 9.3%. For the diagnosis of intestinal endometriosis, they had a sensitivity of 92.6% and 88.9%, a specificity of 100% and 92.6%, a positive predictive value of 100% and 96% and a negative predictive value of 87% and 80.6%.TVS is apparently more accurate than is RES for predicting DIE in specific locations, and should thus be the first-line imaging technique in this setting.Comparison between clinical examination, transvaginal sonography and magnetic resonance imaging for the diagnosis of deep endometriosis.Deeply infiltrating endometriosis affecting the retrocervical region and the rectosigmoid generally requires surgical treatment. Clinical examination, transvaginal ultrasonography (TVUS) and pelvic magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) are useful in the preoperative diagnosis of the involvement of these sites. The objective of this study was to evaluate the capacity of digital vaginal examination, TVUS and MRI to diagnose rectosigmoid and retrocervical involvement.A total of 104 patients with clinically suspected endometriosis were submitted to clinical examination, pelvic MRI and TVUS until 3 months prior to videolaparoscopy and the findings of these methods were matched with histopathological confirmation of endometriosis.Endometriosis was histologically confirmed in 98 of 104 (94.2%) patients. With respect to the rectosigmoid and retrocervical sites, respectively, digital vaginal examination had a sensitivity of 72 and 68%, specificity of 54 and 46%, positive predictive value (PPV) of 63 and 45%, negative predictive value (NPV) of 64 and 69% and accuracy of 63 and 55%. For TVUS, sensitivity was 98 and 95%, specificity 100 and 98%, PPV 100 and 98%, NPV 98 and 97% and accuracy 99 and 97%. MRI had a sensitivity of 83 and 76%, specificity of 98 and 68%, PPV of 98 and 61%, NPV of 85 and 81% and accuracy of 90 and 71%.TVUS had better sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and accuracy in cases of deep retrocervical and rectosigmoid endometriosis when compared with MRI and digital vaginal examination, confirming that it is an important preoperative examination for the definition of surgical strategies."Tenderness-guided" transvaginal ultrasonography: a new method for the detection of deep endometriosis in patients with chronic pelvic pain.To determine the accuracy of transvaginal ultrasonography (TVUS) using a modified "tenderness-guided" approach in the diagnosis of deep endometriosis of the cul-de-sac, retrocervical region, and rectovaginal septum.Prospective study.Academic department of obstetrics and gynecology.Fifty women scheduled for laparoscopy for chronic pelvic pain.All patients underwent TVUS. The modified tenderness-guided approach consisted of TVUS combined with the introduction of 12 mL of ultrasound transmission gel (instead of the usual 4 mL) in the probe cover to create a stand-off to visualize the near-field area. The posterior fornix was evaluated accurately with an up-and-down sliding movement of the probe. In addition, when the patient indicated that tenderness was evoked by the probe's pressure, the sliding movement was stopped, and particular attention was paid to the painful site for detection of endometriosis lesions.Sensitivity, specificity, and kappa values.Using this approach, we obtained a specificity of 95% with a sensitivity of 90%, associated with a very high kappa value of 0.86 (95% CI, 0.56-0.91).Our new TVUS approach appears to be an accurate, inexpensive, and less invasive method for the diagnosis of deep endometriosis.Nodular endometriosis: dynamic MR imaging.In this study we aimed to investigate the value of contrast enhanced dynamic MR imaging (DMI) in the diagnosis of nodular abdominal endometriosis.Fourteen patients with surgically and pathologically proven endometriosis were examined with DMI. The patients were 22-54 years old (mean age 30.8 years). The dynamic MR studies of these patients were retrospectively reviewed by two radiologists who were aware of the clinical data. Nodular masses showing enhancement were evaluated for size, margins, and signal intensity on T1- and T2-weighted MR sequences. The protocol was tailored to selectively determine the diagnostic utility of signal intensity time course analysis for the behavior of nodular endometriosis and endometrial tissue, in DMI. Contrast-enhanced DMI was performed and the time-intensity curves of the lesions and the uterine endometrial tissue of each patient were compared. Mean enhancement values were calculated. Each DMI was evaluated for signal intensity value.In 8 (57%) of 14 patients, we found endometriosis in the abdominal wall. All patients with abdominal wall endometriosis had pelvic surgical operation history. Diameter of nodular endometriosis determined in the abdominus muscle ranged between 3 and 40 mm. Of eight cases, five had only one lesion and three had multiple lesions. Remaining 6 (43%) cases had deep pelvic endometriosis located in the uterosacral ligaments (n = 3), rectosigmoid (n = 2), and rectovaginal septum (n = 1). Diameter of pelvic endometriosis ranged between 9 and 53 mm. Noncontrast mean signal intensity of endometriosis and endometrial tissue were 280 +/- 73 and 216 +/- 20, respectively. The mean values of both endometriosis and normal endometrial tissue were calculated for each patient examined with five-slice DMI. All of the curves showed significant correlation. The lesion showed significant enhancement in the course of time similar to the endometrial tissue in all patients.Our study was inspired from the fact that endometriosis is the ectopic endometrial tissue and we thought that endometrial tissue and endometriomas should have similar vascularity. In this way imaging with MR, getting the time-intensity curves and experiencing the correlation between the endometriosis and endometrial tissue may support the diagnosis in the cases with suspected endometriosis. This first study shows that the ectopic nodular endometriosis can easily be identified with dynamic MRI. It may be used to differentiate nodular endometriosis from the other pathologic conditions of abdominal wall and pelvis.Accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging and rectal endoscopic sonography for the prediction of location of deep pelvic endometriosis.We compared the accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and rectal endoscopic sonography (RES) for the diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis (DPE), with respect to surgical and histological findings.Longitudinal study of 88 consecutive patients referred for surgical management of DPE, who underwent both MRI and RES pre operatively. The diagnostic criteria were identical for MRI and RES and were based on visualization of hypointense/hypoechoic areas in specific locations. DPE was diagnosed when at least one site was involved. We calculated the sensitivity, specificity, predictive values, accuracy and 95% confidence interval of MRI and RES for DPE.DPE and endometriomas were present in 97.7 and 39.7% of women, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of MRI and RES, respectively, were 84.8 and 45.6%, 88.8 and 40%, 98.5 and 87.8% and 40 and 8.5% for uterosacral endometriosis; 77.7 and 7.4%, 70% and 100, 85.3 and 100% and 89.7 and 70.9% for vaginal endometriosis and 88.3 and 90%, 92.8 and 89.3%, 96.4 and 94.7% and 78.8 and 80.6% for colorectal endometriosis.MRI is more accurate than RES for the diagnosis of uterosacral and vaginal endometriosis, whereas the two methods are similarly accurate for colorectal endometriosis.Multislice CT enteroclysis in the diagnosis of bowel endometriosis.This prospective study aims to evaluate the efficacy of multislice computed tomography combined with colon distension by water enteroclysis (MSCTe) in determining the presence and depth of bowel endometriotic lesions. Ninety-eight women with symptoms suggestive of colorectal endometriosis underwent MSCTe; locations, number of nodule/s, size of the nodule/s and depth of bowel wall infiltration were determined. Independently from the findings of MSCTe, all women underwent laparoscopy. MSCTe findings were compared with surgical and histological results. Abnormal findings suggestive of bowel endometriotic nodules were detected by MSCTe in 75 of the 76 patients with bowel endometriosis. MSCTe identified 110 (94.8%) of the 116 bowel endometriotic nodules removed at surgery; 6 nodules missed at MSCTe were located on the rectum. MSCTe correctly determined the degree of infiltration of the bowel wall in all of the 34 serosal bowel nodules identified at MSCTe. In six nodules reaching the submucosa, the depth of infiltration was underestimated by MSCTe. MSCTe had a sensitivity of 98.7%, a specificity of 100%, a positive predictive value of 100% and a negative predictive value of 95.7% in identifying women with bowel endometriosis. MSCTe is effective in determining the presence and depth of bowel endometriotic lesions.Assessment of pelvic endometriosis: correlation of US and MRI with laparoscopic findings.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the contribution of ultrasound (US) and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in the diagnosis and local staging of endometriosis by comparing results with laparoscopic findings.We evaluated 36 consecutive women with suspected or clinically diagnosed endometriosis. Thirty-two out of 36 patients met the following inclusion criteria: transabdominal and endocavitary (US) examination and MR imaging, followed by laparoscopy performed within 2 weeks. US and MR findings were classified based on location, number and morphology (small nodules, large nodules, laminar lesions, cystic lesions, complex lesions, adhesions, cul-de-sac obliteration).Laparoscopy, considered the gold standard, identified 143 lesions in 32 patients. US detected 101 lesions, and MR detected 92 lesions, which were subsequently divided by morphologic appearance. Sensitivity and specificity of the two imaging techniques in the recognition of the different locations were 58% and 25%, respectively, for US and 56% and 50%, respectively, for MR imaging. Results of the two techniques in the different locations examined were similar, with the exception of lesions in the rectovaginal septum, which were better detected by US, and for adhesions and cul-de-sac obliteration, which were more easily detected by MR.Both US and MR are accurate in the diagnosis of endometriosis. There are no significant differences in staging of pelvic endometriosis between US and MR. US examination is the primary evaluation in cases of suspected disease and for the rectovaginal septum. MR examination is recommended for correct classification in doubtful cases and in cases of suspected extrapelvic lesions and adhesions.Endorectal ultrasonography in predicting rectal wall infiltration in patients with deep pelvic endometriosis: a modern tool for an ancient disease.This study evaluated the validity of endorectal ultrasonography in predicting rectal infiltration in patients with deep pelvic endometriosis.Patients were recruited consecutively in the Department of Surgical Gynecology of Diaconesses Hospital from April 1996 to July 2003. Inclusion criteria were the suspicion of deep pelvic endometriosis on the basis of outpatient history and/or clinical symptoms with a mass palpable on bimanual examination that might infiltrate the rectal wall. There were no exclusion criteria. Endorectal ultrasonography was performed by the same investigator with a 7.5-MHz to 10-MHz rigid probe, producing a 360 degrees view of the rectal wall and adjacent areas. We used surgical and histopathologic findings as the "gold standard" to evaluate the validity of endorectal ultrasonography.This study was based on 37 patients (mean age, 35.8 (range, 26-46) years) who underwent surgery. The time between endorectal ultrasonography and surgery ranged from 4 to 529 (mean, 88.7) days. Eight patients had endometriosis nodules penetrating the rectal wall. Endorectal ultrasonography showed sensitivity, specificity, a positive predictive value, and a negative predictive value of 87.5, 97, 87.5, and 97 percent, respectively, in the diagnosis of infiltration of the rectal wall by endometriosis.Endorectal ultrasonography is a reliable technique for visualizing rectal infiltration in patients with deep pelvic endometriosis. It should be more widely used by gynecologists because knowing about rectal infiltration before surgery is fundamental to defining the best possible surgical approach.The use of ultrasound-based 'soft markers' for the prediction of pelvic pathology in women with chronic pelvic pain--can we reduce the need for laparoscopy?To assess the accuracy of new transvaginal ultrasound-scan-based markers and to compare them to conventional ultrasound methods used in the detection of common pelvic pathology in women with chronic pelvic pain (CPP).A prospective observational study.Teaching hospital.A total of 120 consecutive women with CPP undergoing transvaginal ultrasonography before either diagnostic or operative laparoscopy.Anatomical abnormalities, e.g. endometrioma or hydrosalpinx (hard markers), were documented. The woman was then assessed for the presence or absence of 'soft markers' (reduced ovarian mobility and site-specific pelvic tenderness).Presence or absence of pelvic pathology noted during laparoscopy.Seventy women had pelvic pathology, of whom 51 had endometriosis alone, 7 both endometriosis and pelvic adhesions, 6 pelvic adhesions, 1 hydrosalpinx with endometriosis and 5 hydrosalpinx and pelvic adhesions. The likelihood ratio for the hard markers was infinity (specificity was 100%), for the soft makers 1.9 (95% CI 1.2-3.1) and for a 'normal' ultrasound 0.18 (0.09-0.34). The pre-test probability of pelvic disease in our population of women with CPP was 58%, and this probability of disease was raised to 100% with the presence of hard markers and to 73% with the presence of soft markers. The pre-test probability of 58% fell to 20% when ultrasound finding was found to be normal.This new approach improves the detection and exclusion of significant pathology in women with CPP and may lead to a reduction in the number of unnecessary laparoscopies carried out on women with CPP.Role of EUS and EUS-guided FNA in the diagnosis of symptomatic rectosigmoid endometriosis.Rectosigmoid endometriosis is an underrecognized cause of GI symptoms in women. Pelvic magnetic resonance imaging and CT have a low sensitivity in making this diagnosis. The role of EUS and EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) in the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis in symptomatic patients is not well studied.A review of medical records identified 5 women who were diagnosed with rectosigmoid endometriosis by EUS and EUS-FNA over a period of 1 year.Five women with nonspecific GI complaints underwent EUS examination of a rectosigmoid subepithelial mass found on colonoscopy. EUS revealed a hypoechoic lesion infiltrating the muscularis propria and the serosa of the rectal wall, and extending outside the rectal wall, findings consistent with rectosigmoid endometriosis. This diagnosis was confirmed by EUS-FNA, surgical exploration, and/or the patient's clinical course.EUS and EUS-FNA are noninvasive, sensitive techniques for the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis in symptomatic patients.Value of endorectal ultrasonography for diagnosing rectovaginal septal endometriosis infiltrating the rectum.Rectovaginal septal endometriosis (RVSE) can pose serious therapeutic problems when there is infiltration of the rectal septum (which occurs in approximately half of the cases). The aim of this study was to assess the value of endoscopic ultrasonography in diagnosing rectal wall involvement by pelvic endometriosis.A prospective study was carried out from May 1998 to March 2003 at a single hospital center. The 30 patients included in the study presented with suspected RVSE and underwent systematic anorectal endoscopic ultrasonographic exploration prior to the surgical intervention. The endoscopic ultrasonography was carried out under general anesthesia with a 7.5-MHz miniprobe equipped with a distal balloon.The anorectal endoscopic ultrasonographic examination (EUS) showed the presence of endometriosis in the rectovaginal septum in 26 patients (88 %), in the uterosacral ligaments in 10 patients (33 %), and in the ovaries in two patients (6 %). At EUS, the nodules were infiltrating the rectal wall in 17 patients (56 %). The surgical exploration demonstrated endometriosis in the rectovaginal septum in 26 cases, the uterosacral ligaments in 22 cases, and the ovaries in 16 cases. The rectal wall was completely infiltrated in 12 cases and only partly in four cases, and intestinal tract resection was required in 10 cases. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive value of anorectal endoscopic ultrasonography as a means of diagnosing endometriosis of the rectovaginal septum and infiltration of the rectal wall were found to be 96 %, 100 %, 100 % and 83 %, and 92 %, 66 %, 64 % and 92 %, respectively; and the diagnostic accuracy was at 96 % and 80 %, respectively. The sensitivity for detecting nodules in the uterosacral ligaments or in the ovaries was 42 % and 14 %, respectively, leading to diagnostic accuracy rates of 56 % and 53 %.In terms of its sensitivity and its negative predictive value, anorectal endoscopic ultrasonography is a very effective means of detecting endometriosis of the rectovaginal septum and assessing possible infiltration of the rectal wall. However, this method is not as accurate for nodules located far from the EUS probe, as is the case with the uterosacral ligaments and ovaries.A novel technique using magnetic resonance imaging jelly for evaluation of rectovaginal endometriosis.To evaluate the usefulness of the magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) jelly method as a preoperative diagnostic means for patients with rectovaginal endometriosis.Prospective study.University hospital.Thirty one patients with suspected rectovaginal endometriosis based on clinical symptoms and the results of preoperative pelvic, rectal, and ultrasonographic examinations, who were scheduled to undergo laparoscopic surgery.Before surgery, jelly for ultrasonography was injected into the vagina and rectum for MRI. The MRI findings were compared with findings obtained through laparoscopic surgery and histopathologic examination of the removed tissues.The complete cul-de-sac obliteration and deep lesion confirmed at the time of the laparoscopic surgery were evaluated by the MRI jelly method.For detecting the presence of complete obliteration of the cul-de-sac, the accuracy of the diagnosis of rectovaginal endometriosis attained using the MRI jelly method was sensitivity 90.9% and specificity 77.8%. For the presence of a deep lesion, the sensitivity was 94.1% and specificity 100%.The condition of the cul-de-sac could be imaged clearly via the MRI jelly method. Not only rectovaginal endometriosis presenting with deep lesions, but also complete cul-de-sac obliteration alone could be diagnosed preoperatively at a high rate."Kissing ovaries": a sonographic sign of moderate to severe endometriosis.To evaluate whether the presence of kissing ovaries at ultrasound is a marker for endometriosis and whether it correlates with the severity of the disease.Prospective observational study.Gynecologic departments of two university hospitals.A total of 722 consecutive premenopausal women who had laparoscopic surgery for an adnexal mass or suspected pelvic endometriosis.Preoperative ultrasound evaluation and laparoscopic surgery.Diagnostic and predictive value of ultrasound identification of kissing ovaries in the detection of endometriosis.Kissing ovaries were diagnosed at ultrasound and confirmed laparoscopically in 32 patients. Of these, 27 had moderate to severe endometriosis and five others had benign adnexal masses. Bowel (18.5% vs. 2.5%) and fallopian tube (92.6% vs. 33%) endometriosis were significantly more frequent in patients with kissing ovaries than in patients without kissing ovaries. In infertile patients (n = 145), kissing ovaries were associated with a higher proportion of women with fallopian tube obstruction (80% vs. 8.6%). Considering patients with moderate to severe endometriosis (n = 189), the median (range) revised American Fertility Society score (74 [32-148] vs. 35 [16-146]) and the operative time (115 minutes [65-245 minutes] vs. 50 [15-180 minutes]) were significantly higher in patients with than in those without kissing ovaries.The detection of kissing ovaries at ultrasound is strongly associated with the presence of endometriosis and is a marker of the most severe form of this disease.[Value of pelvic MRI in the preoperative diagnosis of endometriosis].To determine the value of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the pelvis in the preoperative diagnosis of endometriosis.Over a period of 8 months, preoperative MRI of the pelvis were obtained in 13 patients with suspected endometriosis (mean patient age 34.6 years; range 25 - 47 years).In 9 of 13 patients (69 %), the diagnosis of endometriosis was made by MRI and confirmed by laparoscopy in 8 cases. In 2 of 13 patients, endometriotic lesions were detectable by laparoscopy only. In the remaining 2 patients, no endometriosis was visible on MRI or by laparoscopy. MRI was able to visualize a total of 19 endometriotic lesions, with 14 (74 %) confirmed by histopathologic examination following laparoscopy. Five of these 19 lesions (26 %) visible on MRI were not seen by laparoscopy. Using laparoscopy and subsequent histopathologic examination, 27 endometriotic lesions were diagnosed, with 13 (48 %) not seen on the preoperative MRI.MRI and laparoscopy are complementary diagnostic tools that will best document the full extent of endometriosis when combined. MRI can visualize additional lesions inaccessible to laparoscopy. Thus, MRI of the pelvis should used preoperatively for surgical treatment planning.Accuracy of rectal endoscopic ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of rectal involvement for patients presenting with deeply infiltrating endometriosis.To compare the accuracy of rectal endoscopic ultrasonography (REU) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) for predicting rectal wall involvement in patients presenting histologically proven deeply infiltrating endometriosis (DIE).This was a retrospective study of a continuous series of 81 patients presenting histologically proven DIE who underwent preoperative investigations using both REU and MRI. The sonographer and the radiologist, who were unaware of the clinical findings and patient history, but knew that DIE was suspected, were asked whether there was involvement of the digestive wall.Rectal DIE was confirmed histologically in 34 of the 81 (42%) patients. For the diagnosis of rectal involvement, sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive value for REU were 97.1%, 89.4%, 86.8% and 97.7% and for MRI they were 76.5%, 97.9%, 96.3% and 85.2%.The sensitivity and negative predictive value of REU were higher than those of MRI suggesting that REU performs better than MRI in the diagnosis of rectal involvement for patients presenting with DIE. Prospective studies with a large number of patients are needed in order to validate these preliminary results.Diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal sonography for deep pelvic endometriosis.To determine the accuracy of transvaginal sonography (TVS) for the diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis.In a prospective study, 142 women with clinical signs of endometriosis underwent TVS followed by surgical and histopathological investigations. The presence and extent of endometriosis involving the uterosacral ligaments, vagina, rectovaginal septum, intestines, bladder and ovaries shown by TVS were compared with surgical and histological findings. The sensitivity, specificity, predictive values and accuracy of TVS for predicting deep pelvic endometriosis were assessed.Ovarian and deep pelvic endometriosis were found by surgery and histology in respectively 83 (58.5%) and 79 (55.6%) of the 142 patients. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of TVS for the diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis were 78.5%, 95.2%, 95.4% and 77.9%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of TVS for endometriotic involvement of the uterosacral ligaments, vagina, rectovaginal septum and intestines were 70.6% and 95.9%, 29.4% and 100%, 28.6% and 99.3%, and 87.2% and 96.8%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of TVS for bladder involvement were 71.4% and 100%, respectively.TVS accurately diagnoses intestinal and bladder endometriosis, but is less accurate for uterosacral, vaginal and rectovaginal septum involvement.Deep pelvic endometriosis: MR imaging for diagnosis and prediction of extension of disease.To prospectively evaluate the accuracy of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging for the preoperative diagnosis of deep pelvic endometriosis and extension of the disease.One hundred ninety-five patients (mean age, 34.2 years; range, 20-71 years) who were suspected of having pelvic endometriosis were recruited at two institutions. Two experienced radiologists evaluated the MR images independently. Deep pelvic endometriosis was defined as implants or tissue masses that appeared as hypointense areas and/or hyperintense foci on T1- or T2-weighted MR images in the following locations: torus uterinus, uterosacral ligaments (USLs), vagina, rectovaginal septum, rectosigmoid, and bladder. MR imaging results were compared with surgical and pathologic findings. Sensitivity, specificity, predictive values, and accuracy of MR imaging for prediction of deep pelvic endometriosis were assessed.Pelvic endometriosis was confirmed at pathologic examination in 163 (83.6%) of 195 patients. Endometriomas, peritoneal lesions, and deep pelvic endometriosis were diagnosed on the basis of surgical findings, alone or combined with pathologic findings, in 111 (68.1%), 83 (50.9%), and 103 (63.2%) of 163 patients, respectively. Torus uterinus and USL were the most frequent sites of deep pelvic endometriosis. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of MR imaging for deep pelvic endometriosis were 90.3% (93 of 103), 91% (84 of 92), 92.1% (93 of 101), 89% (84 of 94), and 90.8% (177 of 195), respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy, respectively, of MR imaging for the diagnosis of endometriosis in specific sites were as follows: USL, 76% (57 of 75), 83.3% (100 of 120), and 80.5% (157 of 195); vagina, 76% (16 of 21), 95.4% (166 of 174), and 93.3% (182 of 195); rectovaginal septum, 80% (eight of 10), 97.8% (181 of 185), and 96.9% (189 of 195); rectosigmoid, 88% (53 of 60), 97.8% (132 of 135), and 94.9% (185 of 195); and bladder, 88% (14 of 16), 98.9% (177 of 179), and 97.9% (191 of 195).MR imaging demonstrates high accuracy in prediction of deep pelvic endometriosis in specific locations.Sonographic assessment of non-malignant ovarian cysts: does sonohistology exist?Transvaginal ultrasound (TVU) is feasible and accurate in the differentiation between non-malignant and malignant ovarian abnormalities. However, despite the clinical relevance, the accuracy of TVU in the differentiation between the many different non-malignant cysts is unknown.Between 1992 and 2002, all women who had surgery at our centre because of a non-malignant ovarian cyst were included prospectively in this study. The sonographic characteristics as well as the expected histological diagnosis (the 'sonohistological diagnosis') were evaluated pre-operatively. This diagnosis was compared with the histopathological diagnosis, and diagnostic parameters [with 95% confidence interval (CI)] of the sonohistological diagnosis were calculated. Logistic models, with the sonographic characteristics as variables, were constructed for each histopathological diagnosis.A total of 406 women were included consecutively. The overall diagnostic accuracy of the sonohistological diagnosis was 60% (95% CI 0.56-0.65). Only in cases of simple ovarian cysts did the diagnostic accuracy of the respective logistic model exceed that of the sonohistological diagnosis (0.88 versus 0.81, P < 0.01). The diagnostic accuracy of the sonohistological diagnosis for endometriotic and dermoid ovarian cysts was significantly better compared with the respective logistic model (0.84 versus 0.71, P < 0.01 and 0.87 versus 0.82, P = 0.03, respectively).In approximately half of the non-malignant ovarian cysts, TVU is capable of distinguishing between the different histopathological diagnoses of non-malignant ovarian masses. Only in the diagnosis of simple ovarian cysts might use of the logistic models be helpful.Rectal endoscopic ultrasound with a radial probe in the assessment of rectovaginal endometriosis.To evaluate the accuracy of rectal endoscopic ultrasound and to evaluate endometriosis in the rectovaginal septum, rectum, and sigmoid walls.Validation of diagnostic test (Canadian Task Force classification II-1).Tertiary care hospital.Thirty-two consecutive women clinically suspected of having rectovaginal septum endometriosis without previous surgical treatment.Colonoscopy, transrectal ultrasound, and rectal endoscopic ultrasound, followed by laparoscopy or laparotomy.The disease was classified according to 1996 standards of the American Society of Reproductive Medicine. Images obtained by colonoscopy, endoscopic ultrasound, and surgery and histologic findings were compared. In 6 patients endometriosis infiltrated bowel muscularis wall, in 20 it infiltrated rectovaginal septum, and in the remaining 6 there was no evidence of lesions. In all women in whom infiltration of the intestinal wall was suspected, rectal endoscopic ultrasound and colonoscopy confirmed the lesions (sensitivity 100%, specificity 67%).Endoscopic ultrasound was useful in preoperative assessment of women with endometriosis.Staging of pelvic endometriosis based on MRI findings versus laparoscopic classification according to the American Fertility Society.Preoperative staging of pelvic endometriosis helps the gynecologist plan therapy and offers a prognosis to patients. We compared a staging system of pelvic endometriosis based on magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) findings with the American Fertility Society (AFS) laparoscopic classification.Forty-four consecutive females with clinically suspected endometriosis underwent MRI examination to demonstrate the presence of endometriomas and pelvic implants. Laparoscopy was performed within 2 weeks. An MRI score was developed to classify endometriosis into four classes comparable to those of AFS laparoscopic staging. Concordance between MRI and laparoscopic classification was evaluated with kappa statistics.Laparoscopy confirmed 60 of 61 endometriomas detected by MRI. Implants were discovered in 20 of 44 patients with MRI and in 23 of 44 with laparoscopy. MRI detected 50 endometrial implants of 65 detected by laparoscopy (76.9%). With regard to endometriosis staging, we obtained a concordance between MRI and AFS classification in 42 of 44 patients (kappa = 0.913).Although MRI has limitations such as suboptimal depiction of small implants and adhesions, this technique is very useful to guide laparoscopy. Moreover, the optimal concordance (95%) between our proposed MRI staging and the AFS laparoscopic classification demonstrated a new advantage of MRI in preoperative staging of endometriosis.Transvaginal sonography and rectal endoscopic sonography for the assessment of pelvic endometriosis: a preliminary comparison.Endometriosis and possible rectal involvement are difficult to assess by physical examination. Previous studies have shown the diagnostic value of magnetic resonance imaging and rectal endoscopic sonography (RES) in this setting, but not that of transvaginal sonography (TVS). The aims of this study were to compare the accuracy of TVS and RES for the diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis, and to compare the results with histological findings.In a prospective study, 30 consecutive patients referred with clinical signs of endometriosis underwent TVS and RES; the images were interpreted blindly with regard to physical findings.Endometriosis was confirmed histologically in 28 (93%) of the 30 patients. Endometriomas were also present in 67% of cases. For the diagnosis of uterosacral endometriosis, the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of TVS and RES were 75 and 75%, 83 and 67, 95 and 90%, and 45 and 40% respectively. For the diagnosis of rectosigmoid endometriosis, the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of TVS and RES were 95 and 82%, 100 and 88%, 100 and 95%, and 89 and 64% respectively.Despite the large proportion of our patients who had intestinal endometriosis, representing a possible source of bias, our results suggest that TVS is as efficient as RES for detecting posterior pelvic endometriosis and should therefore be used as the first-line examination.Sonovaginography is a new technique for assessing rectovaginal endometriosis.To evaluate the efficacy of a new technique, the sonovaginography, for the assessment of rectovaginal endometriosis.Prospective study.University hospital.Forty-six women were scheduled for laparotomic or laparoscopic surgery because of rectovaginal endometriosis suspected on the basis of patient history and/or clinical examination.Before surgery, all the women underwent transvaginal ultrasonography and then sonovaginography. The latter is based on transvaginal ultrasonography combined with the introduction of saline solution to the vagina that creates an acoustic window between the transvaginal probe and the surrounding structures of the vagina. Ultrasound findings were compared with the results of surgical exploration and histological examination.We assessed the accuracy of transvaginal ultrasonography and of sonovaginography for the detection and the location and extension assessment of rectovaginal endometriotic lesions, as well as compared patient compliance between the procedures.Sonovaginography diagnosed rectovaginal endometriosis more accurately than did transvaginal ultrasonography, with a sensitivity and specificity of 90.6% and 85.7%, respectively, whereas the transvaginal ultrasonography has shown a sensitivity and specificity of 43.7% and 50%, respectively. Patient discomfort did not differ significantly between the procedures.Sonovaginography is a reliable and simple method for the assessment of rectovaginal endometriosis and provides information on location, extension, and infiltration of the lesions, which are important factors in selecting the kind of surgery.Diagnostic accuracy of laparoscopy, magnetic resonance imaging, and histopathologic examination for the detection of endometriosis.To evaluate the utility of fat-suppressed magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the diagnosis of endometriosis.A prospective clinical trial.A government research hospital.Forty-eight women with pelvic pain.Magnetic resonance imaging followed by surgical excision and pathologic diagnosis of endometriosis.Presence and extent of endometriosis suggested by preoperative MRIs compared with surgical inspection and biopsy.A preoperative MRI in 46 women detected fewer endometriosis lesions than histopathology or laparoscopy (78 vs. 101 vs. 150). Few MRI lesions correlated with those identified by laparoscopy (50 of 150) or pathology (38 of 101). Of 42 women with surgically diagnosed endometriosis, 28 had at least one corresponding abnormality on MRI, 5 had abnormalities that didn't correlate with surgical findings, and 9 had normal MRIs. The sensitivity of MRI in detecting biopsy-proven endometriosis for any woman was 69% (25 of 36), and the specificity was 75%.Although MRI identifies fewer areas of endometriosis than seen at surgery, it suggested endometriosis in 75% of those with at least mild disease. Only 67% of lesions identified at surgery contained histologic evidence of endometriosis.Validation study of nonsurgical diagnosis of endometriosis.To determine whether the surgical diagnosis of endometriosis can be predicted using symptoms, signs, and ultrasound findings.Prospective study (study sample); retrospective record review (test sample).Hospital of Desio (study sample) and Mangiagalli Hospital (test sample), Italy.Ninety women scheduled to undergo laparoscopy or laparotomy (study sample); 120 women who underwent laparoscopy (test sample).The study sample group was interviewed before surgery about infertility and dysmenorrhea, dyspareunia, and noncyclic pelvic pain and each member had a pelvic examination and a transvaginal ultrasound. At surgery, endometriosis was noted. For the test sample, the same information was abstracted from medical records after laparoscopy.The ability of symptoms, signs, and ultrasound to predict endometriosis at surgery. A classification tree was developed with the study sample and evaluated with the test sample.Ovarian endometriosis, but not nonovarian endometriosis, could be reliably predicted with noninvasive tools. Ultrasound and examination best predicted ovarian endometriosis, correctly classifying 100% of cases with no false positive diagnoses in the study sample. Similar results were found in the test sample.Noninvasive tools may be used to identify women with ovarian, but not nonovarian endometriosis, with excellent agreement with surgical diagnosis.[Diagnostic value of transvaginal ultrasound in the detection of ovarian endometriosis].The aim of the study was to estimate of efficiency of endovaginal ultrasonography in diagnosis of ovarian endometriosis. The study was performed in 59 women with ovarian tumors. Ultrasound examinations were performed with Aloka 2000 using 5.0 MHz transducers. The endovaginal ultrasonography is very useful in diagnosis of ovarian endometriosis, showing sensitivity--90%, specificity--68%, positive predictive value--75%, negative predictive value--86%. Ultrasound examination is an important tool in noninvasive diagnostic procedure of adnexal pathology.The characterization of common ovarian cysts in premenopausal women.The evaluation of the predictive value of transvaginal ultrasound in the assessment of benign adnexal pathology in premenopausal women, based on the recognition of characteristic morphologic patterns particular to endometriotic and dermoid ovarian cysts.This was a prospective study. All premenopausal women undergoing surgery for a suspected ovarian cyst underwent a transvaginal ultrasound examination in the week prior to surgery. Between June 1997 and January 2000, 132 women underwent surgery for a suspected ovarian endometrioma or dermoid cyst. The endpoints were either the direct visualization of the cyst wall and contents at surgery, or the histologic evaluation of removed tissues.Of 83 suspected endometriomas (11 bilateral), 80 were confirmed at surgery and of 68 suspected benign cystic teratomas (eight bilateral), 66 were confirmed by histology. The positive predictive value of transvaginal ultrasonography for the diagnosis of endometrioma and dermoid cysts was 96.4% and 97.1%, respectively. The false positive rates were 3.8% and 3.0%, respectively. There were no malignancies in either group.Based on the recognition of characteristic ultrasound patterns alone, the positive predictive value of transvaginal ultrasonography for the diagnosis of these common, benign cysts in premenopausal women is very high and can be used reliably to select women for appropriate surgery.[Comparison of endoscopic ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging in severe pelvic endometriosis].Deep pelvic endometriosis may lead to severe pain, the treatment of which may require complete surgical resection of lesions. Digestive infiltration is a difficult therapeutic problem. Preoperative diagnosis is difficult and digestive infiltration may remain unknown with incomplete resection and sometimes repeated surgery. Both magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and endoscopic ultrasonography are able to detect rectosigmoid infiltration but their usefulness in the preoperative staging is still to be evaluated. The aim of this work was to evaluate and compare both techniques in the preoperative detection of deep pelvic endometriosis, particularly digestive infiltration.From 1996 to 1998, 48 women with painful deep pelvic endometriosis had preoperative imaging exploration with endoscopic ultrasonography and MRI, and were operated on in order to attempt complete endometriosis resection. Patients were proposed for laparoscopic resection if endoscopic ultrasonography and/or MRI did not reveal digestive infiltration or for open resection if endoscopic ultrasonography and/or MRI were positive for digestive infiltration.Endoscopic ultrasonography and/or MRI led to suspicion of digestive endometriosis in 16 patients. Surgical resection was performed in 12 and digestive wall invasion was histologically demonstrated. At final follow-up, all patients had a dramatic decrease of their symptoms. The remaining 4 patients refused digestive resection and had only laparoscopic gynecologic resection. Infiltration although not histologically proven was very likely both on operative findings and clinical evolution. Digestive infiltration was preoperatively excluded in the 32 other patients. All had a laparoscopic treatment without digestive resection and pain diminished in all patients. In the 12 patients group who had digestive resection, digestive infiltration was correctly diagnosed by endoscopic ultrasonography in all cases (no false negative) whereas MRI, even with the use of endocoil antenna, led to correct diagnosis in 8 out of 12 cases. When endoscopic ultrasonography was negative for digestive infiltration, laparoscopic resection of lesions at surgery appeared complete in all cases. For the 16 patients with presumed digestive infiltration, sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography and MRI was 100 and 75% respectively, with a 100% specificity in both cases. MRI appeared very accurate for the detection of ovarian endometriotic locations. MRI was more sensitive but less specific than endoscopic ultrasonography for the diagnosis of isolated endometriotic recto-vaginal septum and utero-sacral ligaments lesions.Endoscopic ultrasonography was the best technique for the diagnosis of digestive endometriotic infiltration, which complicates the therapeutic strategy. MRI, however, allows more complete staging of other pelvic endometriotic lesions.Role of color Doppler ultrasonography in the diagnosis of endometriotic cyst.We studied the role of color Doppler ultrasonography in the distinction between endometriomas and other adnexal masses. Three hundred and fifty-two ovarian lesions were studied, comparing sonographic diagnosis with pathologic findings. On color Doppler sonography, an endometriotic cyst usually appeared as a cystic lesion with diffuse internal echoes and low vascularization. The sensitivity and specificity of color Doppler transvaginal sonography in detecting endometriotic cysts were 91.8% and 95.3%, respectively. The positive and negative predictive values were 95.5% and 91.5%, respectively. In our experience, transvaginal sonography with color Doppler interrogation is a useful technique in the diagnosis of pathologic ovarian conditions, including cystic endometriosis.Rectosigmoid endometriosis: endoscopic ultrasound features and clinical implications.The main area of the gastrointestinal tract affected by deep pelvic endometriosis is the rectosigmoid colon in 3-37% of cases. Due to the risk of infiltration and the clinical symptoms of endometriosis, with pain and infertility, the condition may require surgical resection. Preoperative imaging diagnosis of rectosigmoid involvement is therefore important. Rectal endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), which is already used for the staging of anorectal carcinoma and submucosal lesions, may be a promising technique for this indication. The present study was conducted in order to describe the endosonographic appearance of rectosigmoid endometriosis, and to define the potential relevance of the technique to the choice of resection method.Between 1993 and 1997, 46 women (mean age 31) with deep pelvic endometriosis underwent imaging investigations and surgical resection. The clinical and imaging findings, and the surgical and histological features identified--mainly with regard to infiltration of the rectal wall--were compared retrospectively. The impact of the EUS findings on the decision on whether or not to carry out resection, either by laparoscopy or open abdominal surgery, was also examined.When there was deep pelvic endometriosis with suspected rectal wall infiltration, EUS showed normal anatomy in nine patients, endometriotic lesions without rectal wall infiltration in 12, and typical rectal infiltration in 25. The lesions were confirmed by the surgical findings during therapeutic laparoscopy (n = 22) and laparotomy (n = 25), as well as by clinical follow-up. Rectal wall infiltration, demonstrated in all cases using EUS, had initially been suspected on the basis of clinical examinations, rectoscopy, barium enema, computed tomography, and magnetic resonance imaging in 62%, 50%, 33%, 67% and 66% of cases, respectively.EUS is a simple and noninvasive technique capable of correctly diagnosing rectal wall infiltration in deep pelvic endometriosis. It may be helpful in determining the choice between laparoscopy and laparotomy when complete resection is indicated.Transvaginal ultrasonography combined with pelvic examination in the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma.The aim of this retrospective study was to evaluate the efficacy of TVS and TVS combined with pelvic examination for the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma. Three hundred and five ovarian masses of 244 patients with either pre-operative or post-operative diagnosis of ovarian tumor and received TVS between January 1, 1996 and December 31, 1998 were included in the study. Of 305 masses, 221 endometriomas of 164 patients were diagnosed histologically. The efficacy of TVS was 84.9 per cent with a sensitivity of 92.3 per cent and specificity of 70.2 per cent. LR+ and LR- were 3.1 and 0.1 respectively. The combination of TVS and pelvic examination with either positive test had a higher sensitivity (98.8%) but lower specificity (26.6%). This combination dramatically improved NPV (97.5%) and LR- (0.05), whereas, the combination with both positive tests had a sensitivity of 78.1 per cent, and specificity of 81.5 per cent. LR+ and LR- were not different from those using TVS alone. In conclusion, the study has shown the role of TVS in the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma. The combination of TVS and pelvic examination may be useful in ruling out the disease. However, a further prospective study should be performed to confirm the efficacy of the combination.Magnetic resonance imaging characteristics of deep endometriosis.The aim of this study was to describe magnetic resonance (MR) imaging findings in histopathologically proven deep endometriosis infiltrating the uterosacral ligaments, the pouch of Douglas, the rectum or the bladder. Twenty patients presenting with a clinical suspicion of deep endometriosis underwent preoperative MR imaging. Sagittal and axial fast T2- and axial T1-weighted spin echo MR sequences were performed. Four patients had post-contrast images. MR results, including morphology and signal intensity of each lesion, were compared to intraoperative gross appearance and histopathology. Histopathology diagnosed 24 lesions of deep endometriosis in the uterosacral ligaments (n = 12), the pouch of Douglas (n = 2), the rectum (n = 3), the bladder (n = 7). Uterosacral ligaments with deep endometriosis were statistically different from normal uterosacral ligaments for proximal nodularity (P = 0.001). There was no difference in signal intensity between normal and abnormal uterosacral ligaments. Contrast-enhanced SE images in four patients with detrusor invasion showed an interruption of the hypointense detrusor by the enhancing bladder endometriosis. Rectal endometriosis was missed in two of three patients and showed non-specific rectal wall thickening in one patient. It is concluded that MR imaging can diagnose deep endometriosis of uterosacral ligaments, the bladder and the pouch of Douglas, but lacks sensitivity in detecting rectal endometriosis without rectal distension.Endometriomas: diagnostic performance of US.To determine the diagnostic performance of specific ultrasonographic (US) features in discriminating endometriomas from other adnexal masses.Two sonologists independently reviewed the sonograms of 252 adnexal masses in 226 women and recorded US features by using a standardized checklist. The diagnostic performance of specific US features and overall reviewer impression in discriminating endometriomas from other adnexal masses were evaluated.There were 40 endometriomas. Diffuse low-level internal echoes were present in 38 (95%) endometriomas and 40 (19%) nonendometriomas (positive likelihood ratio, 5). The positive likelihood ratio for the diagnosis of endometrioma increased to 8 if masses with neoplastic features at gray-scale US were excluded, allowing identification of 30 endometriomas (75%). The presence of multilocularity or hyperechoic wall foci further increased the positive likelihood ratio to 48, allowing the identification of 18 endometriomas (45%).An adnexal mass with diffuse low-level internal echoes and absence of particular neoplastic features is highly likely to be an endometrioma if multilocularity or hyperechoic wall foci are present. A patient with a mass with diffuse low-level internal echoes and other US features may benefit from additional imaging.Results and role of rectal endoscopic ultrasonography for patients with deep pelvic endometriosis.The objective of this work was to assess the advantages and the role of rectal endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) when establishing evidence of infiltration of the rectal wall in patients with proven deep pelvic endometriosis. To this end we performed a retrospective study between July 1993 and December 1996 of a continuous series of 38 patients who presented with deep pelvic endometriosis which was confirmed histologically. The EUS results were considered normal in nine cases (23.7%). In 12 cases (31.6%) EUS revealed an image compatible with infiltration of the uterosacral ligaments and/or the rectovaginal septum without any associated bowel infiltration. In 17 cases (44.7%) EUS revealed an image compatible with deep infiltration of the intestinal wall. Sixteen of these 17 patients underwent laparotomy with bowel resection. The histological results confirmed in each of these 16 patients (100%) that there was deep infiltration of the intestinal wall by endometriotic lesions. The seventeenth patient refused such major surgery by laparotomy, and underwent partial laparoscopy due to the risk of bowel injury. For the 21 patients with no EUS evidence of rectal infiltration complete laparoscopic surgical exeresis was achieved in every case (100%) without broaching the intestinal wall. These preliminary results enable us to state that EUS, which is a simple and non-invasive technique, provides a reliable indication as to the presence of deep bowel infiltration in patients with retroperitoneal endometriotic lesions. EUS used pre-operatively enables patients to be selected for treatment via laparotomy or by laparoscopic surgery.The diagnosis of endometriomas using colour Doppler energy imaging.We studied the role of colour Doppler energy (CDE) (or power Doppler) imaging in the differentiation between endometriomas and other adnexal masses in premenopausal non-pregnant women. A total of 170 consecutive patients with persistent adnexal masses was submitted to B-mode transvaginal ultrasonography associated with CDE imaging evaluation. Plasma concentrations of CA125 were measured before surgery. Using CDE imaging evaluation of vessel distribution, the occurrence of one of the following findings was considered to indicate the likely presence of endometrioma: (i) a round-shaped homogeneous hypoechoic 'tissue' of low-level echoes without papillary proliferations associated with 'poor' vascularization; (ii) a round-shaped homogeneous hypoechoic 'tissue' of low-level echoes with an echogenic portion in which no flow was detected. The overall agreement between the test result and the actual outcome was calculated using the k index. The CDE imaging evaluation was more accurate in the diagnosis of endometriomas compared with B-mode ultrasonography alone (k = 0.88 and 0.80 respectively). According to the logistic regression equation obtained, the probability of the presence of endometrioma varied between a minimum of 1.4% for patients with no risk factors to a maximum of 95.6% for patients with two risk factors (CDE result and value of CA125 >25 IU/ml).The role of transvaginal ultrasonography in the detection of pelvic pathologies in the infertility workup.To assess the efficiency of transvaginal ultrasonography (TVUS) in the screening of pelvic pathologies in the initial workup of infertile women, we carried out a prospective comparison of sonographic diagnosis with laparoscopic and pathological findings. Between February 1994 and April 1995, 133 premenopausal non-pregnant women underwent TVUS on the day before laparoscopy. The efficiency of TVUS in detecting pelvic pathologies was 90.2% with a sensitivity of 86.2%, a specificity of 97.8% and positive and negative predictive values of 98.6 and 78.8% respectively. If the six false-negative cases with a histological diagnosis of minimal endometriosis were defined as 'normal pelvis', sensitivity and specificity could be corrected to 92.5 and 98.6% respectively. Endometriomas were diagnosed by TVUS with an efficiency of 96.4%, with a sensitivity and a specificity of 90 and 96.7 % and with positive and negative predictive values of 75 and 99.1% respectively. The sensitivity of vaginal sonographic characterization of pelvic adhesions was 61.1% with a specificity and positive predictive value of 98.2 and 84.6%. The negative predictive value of TVUS was 94.1%. These data suggest that it is not possible to characterize pelvic adhesions, especially filmy adhesions, with acceptable accuracy. However, in the initial workup of infertile women, if the patient is young, if both hysterosalpingography and TVUS are negative, laparoscopy could be postponed. In couples with severe male factor infertility and for whom in-vitro fertilization or intracytoplasmic sperm injection is the treatment of choice, laparoscopy might be avoided where the TVUS is negative.Transrectal ultrasonography in the assessment of rectovaginal endometriosis.To evaluate the validity of transrectal ultrasonography in the assessment of rectovaginal endometriosis.We compared the findings of transrectal ultrasonographic examination performed before surgery with the operative and pathologic findings in 140 women who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy for suspected endometriosis. The ultrasonographer was asked to investigate whether any deep endometriotic lesions were present in the rectovaginal septum and to define the lateral extension on the basis of involvement of the uterosacral ligaments. In addition, infiltration of the rectal and vaginal walls was evaluated.Thirty-four women had endometriosis infiltrating the rectovaginal septum confirmed by combined operative and pathologic findings. Ultrasonography showed a sensitivity and specificity of 97% and 96%, respectively, in the diagnosis of the presence of rectovaginal endometriosis. The sonographer identified infiltration of the rectal and vaginal walls correctly in all cases in whom it was present, but also reported rectal infiltration in three cases not confirmed by the surgeon and pathologist. The sensitivity and specificity in the diagnosis of uterosacral ligament infiltration were 80% and 97%, respectively.If our preliminary results are confirmed by a larger series, transrectal ultrasonography will be considered a valid diagnostic tool in the evaluation of rectovaginal endometriosis.Is routine diagnostic laparoscopy for infertility still justified? A pilot study assessing the use of hysterosalpingo-contrast sonography and magnetic resonance imaging.We assessed the value of hysterosalpingo-contrast sonography (HyCoSy) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) as alternatives to laparoscopy and dye insufflation with or without hysteroscopy in the investigation of infertility. A total of 19 women had all three procedures, in addition, one became pregnant after HyCoSy alone. The findings were: uterine fibroids (n = 5), minimal-mild endometriosis (n = 4) and moderate-severe endometriosis (n = 3) including one case of bilateral endometriomas, endometrial polyp (n = 1), polycystic ovaries (n = 2), bilateral dermoid cysts (n = 1), haemorrhagic corpus luteal cyst (n = 1) and minimal adhesions (n = 3). At laparoscopy, 31/37 tubes were patent and there was 84% concordance with the tubal patency findings at HyCoSy. The uterine fibroids and ovarian cysts were detected using transvaginal scanning; the endometrial polyp and a congenital uterine anomaly were identified using HyCoSy. These findings were detected using MRI, but in addition the technique distinguished the dermoid cysts from the endometriomas, identified the two other cases of moderate-severe endometriosis, fibroids <2 cm (n = 2) and adenomyosis (n = 5), and interpreted the haemorrhagic corpus luteum as an endometrioma. Our data suggest that women with normal HyCoSy and MRI findings have a normal pelvis and may not need routine surgical investigation.Transvaginal ultrasound and computed tomography combined with clinical parameters and CA-125 determinations in the differential diagnosis of persistent ovarian cysts in premenopausal women.The purpose of this prospective study was to compare the accuracy of computed tomography (CT) and transvaginal ultrasonography in the differential diagnosis of persistent cystic ovarian lesions. The candidates for this study were 161 premenopausal non-pregnant women with an adnexal mass. After a 3-month follow-up, 83 masses persisted and were examined by both techniques before surgery. We also evaluated the CA-125 plasma levels. The CT and ultrasonographic diagnoses were then compared with the histopathological diagnosis. The overall agreement between the test results and the actual outcome was calculated by means of the kappa statistic. Transvaginal ultrasonography has a closer accuracy in the diagnosis of serous cysts and serous cystadenoma, ovarian carcinoma and endometrioma (value of kappa: 0.78, 0.73 and 0.80, respectively) than CT, even if the latter is associated with clinical and biochemical parameters such as patient's age and CA-125 plasma levels. Only in the diagnosis of cystic teratoma, is transvaginal ultrasonography less accurate than CT. In conclusion, in premenopausal women, transvaginal ultrasonography remains a cost-effective method in the diagnosis of most cystic ovarian lesions.Endoluminal ultrasound diagnosis and operative management of rectal endometriosis.Endorectal ultrasound was performed in patients with endometriosis to evaluate the role of this technique for rectal wall involvement and to evaluate the position of preoperative diagnosis in the operative management of rectal endometriosis.Sixteen patients with suspected fixation of endometriomas to the rectal wall during bimanual examination were included in the study. Endorectal ultrasound was performed using a real time unit with a 7.5 MHz endorectal transducer. The probe was introduced via a rectoscope into the rectum up to the rectosigmoid.Endometriosis was confirmed histopathologically in all patients. In six patients rectal wall involvement was diagnosed, in two patients endometriomas were adjacent to the rectal wall, and in eight patients rectal wall involvement could be excluded. Preoperative diagnosis was confirmed in all patients during operation. Laparotomy was performed in those patients with preoperatively diagnosed rectal wall involvement, whereas the remaining patients were treated laparoscopically. Endometriomas with rectal wall involvement were treated in five of six patients with resection of the affected bowel predominantly by low anterior resection.Preoperative endorectal ultrasound is a reliable technique to visualize perirectal endometriomas and to assess rectal wall involvement. Based on preoperative endosonographic diagnosis, an operative management was established with laparotomy and resection of the affected bowel in cases of rectal wall involvement.The role of transvaginal ultrasonography combined with color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler in the diagnosis of endometrioma.To assess the diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal ultrasonography alone and combined with color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler in differentiating ovarian endometriomas from other nonendometriotic masses.Prospective study with pathological confirmation of sonographic diagnosis.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology at a university hospital.A series of 78 consecutive patients diagnosed as having an adnexal mass and scheduled for surgery, between January 1995 and March 1996.Transvaginal ultrasonography and color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler was performed before surgery in all patients. A total of 82 masses were diagnosed (four patients had bilateral masses). CA-125 plasma levels were measured in all patients. Ultrasound diagnosis was compared with definitive histopathological diagnosis.The presence of a round-shaped homogeneous cyst with low-level echoes was considered as sonographic diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma. The typical vascular pattern from endometrioma was considered as "pericystic flow at the level of the ovarian hilius." The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were calculated for transvaginal ultrasonography alone and combined with color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler.Twenty-seven (32.9%) of the 82 masses were proven to be ovarian endometriomas. Morphological assessment diagnosed correctly 24 (88.9%) of 27 endometriomas (false-positive rate: 9%). Typical flow pattern was present in 90.5% of endometriomas (false-positive rate: 80%). CA-125 levels in patients with endometrioma (45.6 +/- 6.3 U/mL; mean +/- SEM) were significantly higher than in patients with nonendometriotic masses (26.5 +/- 5.5 U/mL). The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of transvaginal ultrasonography alone and combined with color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler were 88.9%, 91%, 84.2%, and 94.5%, and 76.2%, 88.9%, 82.4%, and 82.4%, respectively. For CA-125 levels, using a cutoff > or = 35 U/mL, these figures were 79.3%, 84.6%, 79.3%, and 84.6%, respectively.The use of color velocity imaging and pulsed Doppler does not improve the diagnostic accuracy of transvaginal ultrasonography alone in the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma.Evaluation of endometriosis in uterosacral ligaments by transrectal ultrasonography.Uterosacral ligaments are one of the common targets of pelvic endometriosis, which is usually clinically rather than surgically diagnosed. This study was performed to determine if uterosacral ligaments infiltrated by endometriosis could be detected by transrectal ultrasonography. Uterosacral ligaments in non-endometriosis subjects (n = 64) were observed as low echoic homogeneous arcs in both sides of the uterine cervix. Patients who had endometriosis (n = 29) on the ligaments showed thick and irregularly-shaped uterosacral ligaments by the transrectal ultrasound examination. The results also suggested that the thickness of uterosacral ligaments was associated with the clinical symptoms. Transrectal ultrasonography may provide quantitative information to manage patients with infiltrating endometriosis.Tumor markers and transvaginal ultrasonography in the diagnosis of endometrioma.To evaluate the accuracy of CA 19.9 plasma levels (with or without CA 125 levels) combined with transvaginal ultrasonography in the differential diagnosis of endometrioma.One hundred eighteen consecutive premenopausal nonpregnant women had laparoscopy or laparotomy between November 1994 and November 1995 because of the presence of a persistent adnexal mass. They underwent transvaginal ultrasonography and measurement of CA 19.9 and CA 125 plasma levels within 2 days before surgery. The ultrasonographic impression and the tumor marker values were compared with the histopathologic diagnosis. The overall agreement between the test result and the actual outcome was calculated using the kappa statistic.Transvaginal ultrasonography had a strong agreement between test result and surgery (kappa value 0.84), whereas the combined methods were associated with a lower kappa value (range 0.24-0.80).Transvaginal ultrasonography used alone is the most cost-effective method in the preoperative differential diagnosis of endometrioma.Transvaginal ultrasonography combined with CA-125 plasma levels in the diagnosis of endometrioma.To assess the role of transvaginal ultrasonography combined with CA-125 plasma levels in the diagnosis of endometrioma.Prospective study with pathological confirmation of the diagnosis.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology of the University of Cagliari, Italy.One hundred one consecutive premenopausal nonpregnant women submitted to laparoscopy or laparotomy, from November 1993 to October 1994, because of the presence of an adnexal mass.Within 2 days before surgery all patients underwent transvaginal ultrasonography and evaluation of CA-125 plasma levels. The ultrasonographic impression and the CA-125 value were then compared with the histopathological diagnosis.The overall agreement between the test result and the actual outcome was calculated using the kappa index for the transvaginal ultrasonography used alone and for the combination of transvaginal ultrasonography and CA-125 values, for each chosen cutoff and range.Transvaginal ultrasonography has a strong agreement between test and surgery (kappa value 0.76) whereas the combined use of the two methods is associated with a lower kappa index, ranging from 0.40 to 0.69.Transvaginal ultrasonography used alone has a better predictive capacity in differentiating endometrioma from other adnexal masses than combined methods.A comparative study between pelvic ultrasonography and laparoscopy in the detection of pelvic pathology in the initial workup of subfertile women.This study was conducted prospectively from June 1992 to September 1993, we evaluated 115 patients attending our infertility clinic for the first time to determine the correlation between abdominal ultrasound and laparoscopy in the detection of pelvic pathology in the initial workup of subfertile women, depicting laparoscopy as the gold standard. Normal ultrasound scans were reported in 80 women (69.56% of total) 58 of whom had also normal pelvic findings at laparoscopy. The remaining 22 patients with normal ultrasound scans had abnormal laparoscopic findings in the pelvis giving a false negative rate of 27.50 per cent. These were primarily related to; endometriosis with adhesions (10), filmy adnexal adhesions (5), omental and bowl adhesions (5), and hydrosalpinx (2). Thirty five women (30.44% of the total) had abnormal scans. Pelvic pathologies were confirmed in 30 at laparoscopy. The remaining five had a normal pelvis (three retroverted uteri, and two functional ovarian cyst had disappeared at time of laparoscopy) giving a false positive rate of 14.29 per cent for ultrasound scans. Statistical analysis revealed that abdominal ultrasound scan in the detection of pelvic pathology in the initial workup of subfertile women has a sensitivity of 57.69 per cent, specificity of 92.06 per cent, positive predictive value of 85.71 per cent with negative predictive value of 72.50 per cent and accuracy rate of 76.52 per cent. We conclude that the use of abdominal ultrasound in the detection of pelvic pathology in the initial workup of subfertile women is not an appropriate routine screening test as it has low efficiency in detecting the pelvic pathologies many of which are the causes of infertility.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)The potential value of magnetic resonance imaging in infertility.The potential value of magnetic resonance imaging as a diagnostic tool in infertility was investigated. Twenty-six women with primary or secondary infertility and symptoms of dysmenorrhoea or menorrhagia were studied prospectively using conventional T1- and T2-weighted spin-echo techniques. Positive diagnoses were obtained in 20 of 26 (76.9%) patients. Of these, 18 (69.2%) had lesions likely to be significantly contributing to infertility. Adenomyosis was detected in 14 patients (53.8%) with 11 showing the diffuse pattern while three had discrete adenomyomas. Cystic lesions typical of endometriosis were detected in seven patients (26.9%), four of these also had evidence of adenomyosis. The endometriotic lesions were also seen at laparoscopy in each case. Five patients (19.2%) had leiomyomas, one in a patient with adenomyosis and endometriosis and one in a patient with endometriosis alone. Only one patient had submucous leiomyomas causing significant distortion of the endometrial mucosa likely to affect fertility. Magnetic resonance imaging is valuable in the investigation of unexplained infertility where it provides a high diagnostic yield particularly if uterine pathology is suspected.The role of endovaginal ultrasound in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian cysts.Endometriomas have a prevalence of 24% among all ovarian cysts. Various sonographic features have been proposed to identify endometriomas. Although the visualization of ovarian masses with low-level internal echoes is suggestive for the endometriotic origin of the cyst, no data are yet available on the specificity of endovaginal ultrasonography in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian masses. To address this issue, the sensitivity, specificity, negative and positive predictive values of endovaginal ultrasonography in comparison with pathology were calculated for each visualized cyst. The study population (n = 251) consisted of all premenopausal non pregnant women submitted to laparotomy or laparoscopy between May 1991 and March 1993 at the Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology of the University of Cagliari. Within one week before surgery, all patients underwent endovaginal ultrasonography and 93 ovarian cysts were visualized. After the scan, the physician gave prospective impressions as to the presence of endometriomas using the visualization of round-shaped homogeneous hypoechoic "tissue" of low-level echoes within the ovary as characteristic ultrasonographic finding. Ultrasonographic impression was compared with histopathological diagnosis. Out of 93 adnexal masses detected by ultrasound, 31 were suspected to be endometriomas and the diagnosis was confirmed in 24. The sensitivity and the specificity of endovaginal ultrasonography in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian cysts were 83% and 89%, respectively. This specificity (89%) is comparable with that obtainable with magnetic resonance imaging (91%).Role of transvaginal sonography in the detection of endometriomata.Endometriosis is a common cause of pelvic pain and infertility in young women. Transvaginal sonography is major means for diagnosing ovarian In our study, we scanned 60 patients with endometriomata who underwent laparotomy or laparoscopy. We compared preoperative ultrasonographic diagnosis with histological reports. The sonographic criteria for the diagnosis of endometriomata were (1) cystic structure with low, homogeneous echogenicity and (2) thick cystic wall with regular margins. In 50 patients, sonography suggested an endometrioma. In 47 cases, the diagnosis was correct. The false-positive cases were all caused by cystic teratomas with a homogeneous sonographic pattern. Ten false-negative cases were diagnosed by ultra-sonography as functional ovarian cysts (5), teratomas (3), and benign ovarian cystoma (1). Only 1 case of a 5-mm endometrioma was demonstrated by laparoscopy but not by TVS. The sensitivity of TVS for diagnosing endometriomata was 82.4% and specificity 97.7%; the positive and negative predictive values were 94% and 92.8%, respectively. The diagnostic accuracy of TVS was 93%. In our experience, TVS is a very specific means for diagnosing endometriomata when the typical pattern is detected; however, the sensitivity of the technique needs to be improved.[Studies on diagnosis of endometriosis by magnetic resonance imaging by means of fat saturation technique].It is difficult to distinguish a small endometrial implant from adipose tissue by magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). I assessed the usefulness of fat saturated MRI in detecting small endometrial implants by comparing it with conventional MRI. Seventy-four patients with clinically suspected endometriosis were referred for MRI. In every patient, laparoscopy or laparotomy was performed. MRI was performed with a 1.5T superconducting magnet with spin echo T1, T2 and fat saturated T1 weighted images. Surgery revealed a normal pelvis in 6 patients, endometriosis in 65, and cystic lesions in three others. With fat saturated MRI, overall sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 87.7%, 66.7%, 95.0% and 42.9%, respectively. At surgery, 160 pigmented lesions of endometriosis were detected. Conventional MRI permitted identification of almost all ovarian endometriomas > 10mm in diameter, as with fat saturated MRI. With conventional MRI, 18 endometrial implant lesions < 10mm in diameter were detected. Including those detected by fat saturated MRI, altogether 42 lesions were detected. Conventional MRI demonstrated only 3 lesions among the 48 blueberry spots, but the additional fat saturated MRI technique increased the detection rate to 21 out of 48. Fat saturated MRI can therefore be used for detecting small endometrial implants.Endometriosis: appearance and detection with conventional and contrast-enhanced fat-suppressed spin-echo techniques.Suspected pelvic endometriosis was prospectively evaluated in 31 women with T1- and T2-weighted conventional spin-echo (CSE) magnetic resonance imaging alone and in combination with T1-weighted fat-suppressed (T1FS) and gadolinium-enhanced T1FS (Gd-T1FS) spin-echo techniques. Images were grouped for interpretation and comparison as follows: (a) CSE alone, (b) CSE/T1FS, and (c) CSE/T1FS/Gd-T1FS. All patients underwent surgery within 3 months of imaging, and 21 patients were found to have endometriosis: 59 endometriomas (26 large and 33 small) and 51 sites of implants were seen. With CSE images, 23 large and six small endometriomas were detected. With CSE/T1FS images, 25 large and 14 small endometriomas were identified. With CSE/T1FS/Gd-T1FS images, 24 large and 14 small endometriomas were detected and ill-defined areas of enhancement were noted in 22 sites throughout the pelvis. These corresponded to endometriotic implants seen at surgery in 14 sites. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy, respectively, for the detection of endometriosis were 76%, 60%, and 71% for CSE, 86%, 50%, and 74% for CSE/T1FS, and 81%, 50%, and 71% for CSE/T1FS/Gd-T1FS images. No significant differences (P > .1) between image combinations for correctly identifying patients with and without endometriosis were seen. The difference in sensitivity between CSE and CSE/T1FS and between CSE and CSE/T1FS/Gd-T1FS images for detecting small endometriomas was significant (P = .03).Comparison of transvaginal sonography and bimanual pelvic examination in patients with laparoscopically confirmed endometriosis.To determine the usefulness of noninvasive clinical tests to diagnose symptomatic endometriosis, we retrospectively reviewed the medical records of 91 patients with chronic pelvic pain and laparoscopically confirmed endometriosis. Thirty-seven women (41%) had pelvic peritoneal endometrial implants with adhesions; in 44 (48%) the ovaries were also affected, and in 10 (11%) the disease involved both the uterus and ovaries. Seventy-nine (87%) women had dysmenorrhea, dyspareunia, or both. Forty-three (47%) had a normal bimanual pelvic examination and 37 (41%) an unremarkable transvaginal sonographic evaluation (no significant difference). The women were divided into two groups: group 1, in whom the disease extended to the ovaries and uterus, and group 2, those in whom only peritoneal implants and adhesions were present. In group 1, 48 women (89%) had an abnormal ultrasonographic evaluation compared with only 4 (11%) in group 2 (p <0.001). Our findings indicate that bimanual pelvic examination and transvaginal sonography are equally accurate in detecting endometriosis; however, when the uterine surface and ovaries are involved, the latter is more informative. Therefore, patients with chronic pelvic pain, especially pain related to menstruation or coitus, should be evaluated laparoscopically to diagnose mild endometriosis adequately.Efficacy of hysterosalpingography in evaluating endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common disease in young women being evaluated for infertility. Although endometriosis may cause tubal abnormalities on hysterosalpingography, efficacy of radiographic evaluation in this disease is not clear. We reviewed the radiographic and laparoscopic examinations in 50 women being studied for infertility. Laparoscopy was normal in 15 women and showed endometriosis in 35 patients. Endometriosis was staged at laparoscopy using the classification of the American Fertility Society. Radiographic examinations were reviewed blindly and tubal status noted in each patient. Criteria for tubal abnormality included incomplete or absent filling and ampullary dilatation or convolution. Radiographic efficacy was determined by correlating the tubal appearance to the severity and location of endometriosis. A total of 98 tubes were correlated but only 10 (10%) were felt to be involved by endometriosis based on laparoscopic findings. Radiologic sensitivity was 40% (4 of 10) and specificity was 83% (73 of 88). Positive predictive value was 21% (4 of 19) due to 15 false-positive diagnoses in tubes uninvolved by endometriosis. In conclusion, endometriosis, regardless of its severity, rarely causes radiographic abnormalities on hysterosalpingography because of the location of disease in the pelvis.Diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis: fat-suppressed T1-weighted vs conventional MR images.The purpose of this study was to compare fat-suppressed T1-weighted with conventional MR images for the diagnosis of endometriosis, focusing on the detectability of peritoneal implants, and to evaluate the usefulness of MR imaging in predicting the severity of disease.We analyzed the MR images of 31 patients with clinically suspected endometriosis. Laparoscopy confirmed no evidence of disease in two and endometriosis in 29. Conventional T1- and T2-weighted images and supplementary axial fat-suppressed images were obtained in all patients. In both groups, detection of endometriotic lesions with MR imaging was compared with detection at laparoscopy. Only the findings on fat-suppressed images were used to evaluate the usefulness of MR imaging in predicting the severity of disease. Early stages of disease included stages I and II; advanced stages of disease included stages III and IV.Diagnostic accuracy was higher with fat-suppressed imaging (77%) than with conventional imaging (55%) (p = .06). The overall sensitivity in detecting peritoneal implants was significantly higher with fat-suppressed imaging (61%) than with conventional imaging (27%) (p < .01). The disease was likely to be at an early stage when MR images showed peritoneal implants that were 5 mm or less in maximum diameter. The disease was likely to be at an advanced stage when MR images showed an endometrial cyst that was larger than 1.5 cm.Our results show that fat-suppressed MR imaging is more accurate in the diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis and is better for predicting the severity of disease than conventional MR imaging is.Scoring system for prediction of ovarian endometriosis based on transvaginal color and pulsed Doppler sonography.To develop a new noninvasive scoring system using clinical signs and symptoms, CA-125 levels, sonographic findings, and transvaginal color and pulsed Doppler parameters for preoperative recognition of ovarian endometriosis.A 5-year prospective study in patients undergoing laparotomy and laparoscopy.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, University of Zagreb, Sveti Duh Hospital, Zagreb, Croatia.Six hundred fifty-six benign and malignant adnexal masses, among which 103 were surgically proved to be ovarian endometriosis.All patients undergoing laparotomy and laparoscopy were examined by transvaginal ultrasonography with color Doppler imaging. Serum levels of CA-125 were measured the day before surgery.The total score was applied in all patients with adnexal masses.The scoring system proved to be very useful in distinguishing ovarian endometriosis from other benign and malignant ovarian lesions, with a sensitivity of 99.02% and a specificity of 99.64%, compared with morphological scoring system's sensitivity of 83.91% and specificity of 97.12%.The new noninvasive scoring system improves significantly the ability to discriminate between endometriosis and other benign and malignant ovarian entities.Diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis by magnetic resonance imaging using "fat-saturation" technique.To assess the usefulness of fat-saturated magnetic resonance (MR) imaging for detecting small endometrial implants.Prospective evaluation by conventional and fat-saturated MR imaging.Shimane Medical University Hospital, Izumo, Japan.Fifty-one consecutive patients with clinically suspected pelvic endometriosis.Magnetic resonance images < 2 weeks before laparoscopy or laparotomy.The location, number, and size of lesions.Surgery revealed a normal pelvis in 5 patients, endometriosis in 44 (42 with pigmented lesions and 2 with nonpigmented lesions and adhesions), and other cystic lesions in 2. With fat-saturated MR imaging, overall sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 89%, 71%, 95%, and 50%, respectively. At surgery, 122 pigmented lesions of endometriosis were detected. Conventional MR images indicated lesions of endometriosis in 74. When fat-saturated images were used, 103 lesions were detected. With conventional MR images, only one of 34 small endometrial implants (2 to 3 mm in diameter) was detected. However, the addition of fat-saturated images increased the detection rate to 15 of 34, and all lesions > 4 mm in diameter.Conventional MR imaging for detecting small endometrial implants was improved by addition of the fat-saturation technique. Therefore, fat-saturation MR imaging is an acceptable for detecting small endometriomas.Adnexal masses: comparison of specificity of endovaginal US and pelvic MR imaging.In a prospective study, 32 women with suspected pelvic masses at physical examination underwent both endovaginal ultrasound (US) and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging to compare their ability in diagnosis of adnexal masses. Criteria for the diagnosis of various types of adnexal masses with MR imaging and endovaginal US were prospectively defined, and the ability of either modality to allow a specific diagnosis was assessed. For each modality, measures of sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were obtained. Results indicated higher diagnostic capability of endovaginal US for simple cysts (five of five), hemorrhagic cysts (eight of nine), endometriomas (nine of 14), and ovarian carcinomas (three of three). MR imaging demonstrated higher diagnostic capability for dermoids (three of three). MR imaging and endovaginal US showed equal diagnostic capability for pedunculated fibroids (two of two). For all masses, observers, and observations, the overall sensitivity of endovaginal US was 76% versus 49% for MR imaging, and the overall accuracy of endovaginal US was 83% versus 70% for MR imaging. The authors suggest that endovaginal US is a better modality than MR imaging for the assessment of suspected pelvic masses.Characterization of hemorrhagic adnexal lesions with MR imaging: blinded reader study.To assess the performance of published criteria for differentiation of endometriomas from other hemorrhagic adnexal lesions with magnetic resonance (MR) imaging, 74 lesions with pathologic proof in 46 patients were evaluated by means of a 1.5-T system with use of conventional T1-weighted and either T2-weighted spin-echo (SE) or fast SE sequences. The MR images were independently presented to each of three blinded readers, and receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis was performed. The criterion of a cyst with high signal intensity on short repetition time (TR)/echo time (TE) images and shading on long TR/TE images had a mean sensitivity of 68%, mean specificity of 83%, and mean accuracy of 76% for diagnosis of endometrioma. Ancillary findings previously reported to be suggestive of endometrioma (eg, low-signal-intensity rims, adhesions, bowel tethering, and implants) were proved inaccurate and showed low interobserver agreement. ROC analysis showed similar area measurements among the three radiologists for diagnosis of endometrioma. MR imaging had only moderate accuracy in distinction of endometriomas from other hemorrhagic adnexal lesions.Pelvic endometriosis: detection and diagnosis with chemical shift MR imaging.Fat-saturation magnetic resonance (MR) imaging for detection and characterization of pelvic endometriosis was prospectively investigated in 35 women with a clinical diagnosis of the disease. Large endometrioma was diagnosed when the lesion was larger than 1 cm in diameter and hyperintense on T1- and T2-weighted images. Small endometrioma was diagnosed when a well-demarcated hyperintense lesion less than 1 cm in diameter was seen on T1-weighted or fat-saturated T1-weighted images. Surgery performed after MR imaging revealed a normal pelvis in six patients, endometriosis in 26 (33 large and 19 small endometriomas), and other cystic lesions in three. Conventional T1- and T2-weighted imaging accurately demonstrated 27 of 33 large endometriomas and two of 19 small endometriomas. Fat-saturation T1-weighted imaging in combination with conventional technique accurately demonstrated 30 of 33 large and nine of 19 small endometriomas. Diagnostic accuracy was improved with addition of fat-saturated images, so their use together with conventional images is recommended in assessment of endometriosis.The efficiency of transvaginal ultrasonography in the diagnosis of endometrioma.To assess the efficiency of transvaginal ultrasonography in the screening of endometriomas and in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian masses.Prospective study with surgical and pathological confirmation of the sonographic diagnosis.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology at the University of Cagliari, Cagliari, Italy.All premenopausal nonpregnant women (n = 236) submitted to laparotomy or laparoscopy from May 1991 to December 1992.Transvaginal ultrasonographic examinations were done within 1 week before surgery. Ultrasonographic diagnosis was compared with surgical and histopathological findings.The visualization of round-shaped homogeneous hypoechoic "tissue" of low-level echoes within the ovary was chosen as characteristic ultrasonographic finding of endometrioma. Sensitivity, specificity, and predicted values were calculated for each visualized ovary (group A) to assess the efficiency in the screening, and for each visualized cyst (group B) to assess the efficiency in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian masses.Four hundred twenty-three of 466 ovaries were visualized. Of the 82 visualized cysts, 27 were suspected to be endometriomas, and the diagnosis was confirmed by pathology in 21. The sensitivity and the specificity were 75% and 99%, respectively, in group A, and 84% and 90%, respectively, in group B.The study demonstrates that transvaginal ultrasonography has an efficiency of 88% in differentiating endometriomas from other ovarian masses with a specificity of 90%.Endometriosis: appearance and detection at MR imaging.Thirty-nine magnetic resonance (MR) studies were performed on 31 women with surgically proved endometriosis. A total of 88 endometriotic lesions ranging in size from 0.2 to 7.5 cm were detected on 24 of 30 MR images of women. The signal intensities ranged from hyperintense on all pulse sequences (41 of 88) to hypointense on all sequences (24 of 88); the remainder demonstrated signal intensities corresponding to the appearances of acute, subacute, and chronic hematomas. Hypointense or signal-void rims on both T1- and T2-weighted images were detected in 35 lesions. Identification of the disease with MR imaging versus concurrent surgery was compared for 76 sites in 19 patients. Findings were true-positive in 24 cases, false-negative in ten, true-negative in 32, and false-positive in seven, resulting in an MR sensitivity of 71% and specificity of 82%. Adhesions obscured the disease at laparoscopy in three patients. MR imaging cannot be used as a substitute for laparoscopy in the definitive diagnosis or staging of endometriosis. However, it can be used to monitor treatment response in place of laparoscopy once a diagnosis is firmly established.Pelvic endometriosis: MR imaging.The value of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging at 0.35 T in detecting, characterizing, and staging pelvic endometriosis was prospectively investigated in 30 consecutive women in whom this disease was clinically suspected. MR findings were correlated with the results of laparoscopy (13 women) and laparotomy (17 women). Surgical examination revealed a normal pelvis in five patients and endometriosis in 25. Three of the five normal cases and 16 of the 25 cases of endometriosis were correctly identified with MR imaging (sensitivity, 64%; specificity, 60%; accuracy, 63%). MR imaging demonstrated seven of eight endometriomas but only 14 of 29 adhesions and only six of 45 endometrial implants. While MR imaging demonstrated endometriomas, ovarian adhesions, and extraperitoneal endometrial implants, it could not accurately depict extraovarian endometrial adhesions and intraperitoneal endometrial implants. In addition, MR imaging findings did not correlate with the surgically determined severity of the disease. These limitations indicate that MR imaging cannot be used as the primary modality in the detection, characterization, and staging of endometriosis; laparoscopy remains the procedure of choice.Ultrasound as a diagnostic aid in endometriosis.Endometriosis detection by US with laparoscopic correlation.Endometriosis is a common cause of female infertility. It may affect as many as 40% of infertile women and may be the sole contributing factor to infertility in 15%. A study was undertaken to determine the usefulness of the routine pelvic ultrasound (US) examination in the detection of endometriosis by correlating pelvic US findings with laparoscopic findings in 85 patients who underwent both examinations. Forty-eight patients (56.5%) had no laparoscopic evidence of endometriosis, and 37 patients (43.6%) had endometriosis. Eight of the patients had abnormal sonograms; of these patients, only four had sonographic abnormalities that corresponded to laparoscopically identified endometriosis. Thus, US was successful in detecting endometriosis in only four (10.8%) of 37 patients. US is neither sensitive nor specific in diagnosing endometriosis. Furthermore, we believe that US does not have a significant role in the diagnosis or management of endometriosis in patients in whom a pelvic mass or other obvious pelvic abnormality is not suspected.Double-contrast enema in pelvic endometriosis.The radiographic findings on barium enema in 42 patients with endometriosis were reviewed and correlated with those at surgical and laparoscopic examination. Radiographic abnormalities were detected in 27 patients. In nine patients, purely extrinsic mass effect was identified; bowel wall involvement in these patients was not present at laparoscopy. In 16 of 18 patients subsequently shown to have bowel wall involvement, mass effect with fine mucosal crenulation was identified. Annular or polypoid involvement was also noted. Mass effect with crenulation, although not entirely specific, appears to be a characteristic finding in patients with bowel wall involvement due to endometriosis.